(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Image zoom Credit: Karwai Tang/WireImageImage zoom Credit: Karwai Tang/WireImage...”
“Image zoomImage zoom Credit: HGL/GC ImagesIn June, the couple made their first public post-wedding appearance at a friend’s nuptials in Stockholm, Sweden.”
“Sitting right in front of them was actor Bradley Cooper.”
“Also on Friday, Pippa’s mother, Carole Middleton, and brother, James Middleton, were spotted at Center Court cheering on their family friend Roger Federer, who advanced to the men’s finals after beating Tomáš Berdych.”
“Image zoomImage zoomThe newlyweds were spotted holding hands and smiling as they shared loving embraces.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Her designer one-piece, which retails for $490, is nearly sold out!”
“Pippa served up major style inspiration once again, this time opting for a cream-colored Isabel Marant Étoile dress, white fedora and tan wedges.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge‘s younger sister, 33, and Matthews, 41, were all smiles on Friday at Center Court as they watched American player Sam Querrey’s match against Marin Cilic.”
“Pippa Middleton made her third appearance at Wimbledon, but on Day 11 of the tennis tournament, she was accompanied by husband James Matthews.”


"Image scaling credit: Karwai Tang / wireimageimage scaling credit: Karwai Tang / wireimageimage..."
The couple made their debut at a friend's wedding in Stockholm, Sweden, in June
"Sitting in front of them is actor Bradley Cooper."
Also on Friday, Pippa's mother, Carol Middleton, and brother, James Middleton, cheered their family friend Roger Federer at the center court, who made it to the men's final after beating Tom ash Berdych
"The newlyweds held hands and hugged each other with a smile on their face."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Her designer piece, retail $490, almost sold out!"
"Pippa once again provided the main style inspiration, this time choosing the beige Isabel malante dress, the white fedora hat and the tan slope heel."
The Duchess of Cambridge's 33 year old sister and Matthews, 41, both smile as they watch Sam clay vs. Malin siliqi at the Center Stadium on Friday
Pippa Middleton made her third appearance at Wimbledon, but on the 11th day of the tournament she was accompanied by her husband, James Matthews



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's the fight she's been waiting for her whole life," he continued.”
“...feels the pressure of her situation more than she ever has before...”
“Weiss added She s in a position where if she doesn t step up soon and come up with a big win for her side she s going to lose this fight before it even begins I think she really...”
“Talking about Daenerys, co-creator D.B.”
“It's just the two of them in a small space, standing near each other, and us just watching that and feeling the heat of it," Benioff said.”
“So much of it is not from dialogue or anything we wrote.”
“"There's conflict and it's conflict between powerful people and then to make it all even more complicated, they're starting to be attracted to each other.”
“...convince Dany to become an ally while Daenerys wants Jon to bend the knee...”
“Addressing the conflict between Kit Harington and Emilia Clarke s characters on the show Benioff said in the HBO produced Inside the Episode that Jon Snow is there for political reasons he wants to get dragon glass and if possible...”
“By ANINEW DELHI: The ‘Game of Thrones’ executive producer, David Benioff, has recently spoken on Jon Snow and Daenerys Targaryen’s “complicated” attraction.”


"It's the fight she's been waiting for all her life," he continued
“…… More than ever, I can feel the pressure of my situation... "
"Wes added that if she doesn't come out quickly and win a big win for her team, she will lose the game before it starts, and I think she really..."
"Talk about Denise, CO creator D.B."
"It's just that they're standing in a narrow space, very close, and we're just watching and feeling the heat," Benioff said
"So much doesn't come from conversations or anything we write."
"There are conflicts between powerful people, and then they make things more complicated, and they start to attract each other."
“… Convince Dany to be an ally, and danelis wants Jon to bend his knees... "
"Speaking of the conflict between the roles of kit Harrington and Amelia Clark in the show, Benioff said in the HBO production episode that Jon Snow was there for political reasons and he wanted dragon glass, if possible..."
New Delhi: David Benioff, executive producer of the game of thrones, recently talked about the "complex" charms of Jon Snow and Denise tangglien



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Shannon has shown off her new size 4 figure multiple times, stepping into a red-hot revenge dress, which served as motivation for her to attend ex Mike “Sugar Bear” Thompson’s wedding, and even sporting a fitted one-piece red bathing suit for a Baywatch-inspired photo shoot.”
“For her outing, Shannon was all smiles, dressed in athletic wear with a gray long-sleeve shirt and patterned form-fitting leggings.”
“...to a size 4Mama June Keeps Weight Loss Promise as She Maintains Her Figure 7 Months After Dropping 300-Lbs.”
“Mama June: From Not to Hot — and still hot!”
“Mama June Shannon vowed to “never going back” to being overweight and she appears to have kept her word.”
“The reality star, 38, was spotted in Atlanta, Georgia, on Monday, showing off her trim figure seven months after revealing she dropped 300 lbs.”
“...in a drastic body transformation.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: MEGA“I can promise you I’m never going back to that size.”
“Normally when I walk through the streets, everybody notices me, and now it’s like nobody [does].”Image zoom Credit: Larry Busacca/Getty Images for GLAAD; Paras Griffin/Getty ImagesInstead, she’s been flaunting her body with her new wardrobe.”


"Shannon showed her size 4 figure many times and put on a red revenge dress, which became the motivation for her to attend the former Michael" sweet bear "Thompson wedding. She even wore a red swimsuit that fitted her body and took photos Inspired by Baywatch."
"When we went for an outing, Shannon was smiling, wearing a sportswear, a gray long sleeve shirt and slim leggings."
“…… At 4mA, June kept her weight-loss promise because she was in shape seven months after losing 300 pounds
"Mom Joan: never hot to hot - and still hot!"
Joan Shannon's mother swore she would never be overweight again. She seemed to keep her promise
The 38 year old reality star was photographed in Atlanta, Georgia, on Monday, showing off her slim figure seven months after losing 300 pounds
“… In a dramatic physical transformation. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Image zooming L / C: Mega" I can assure you that I will never go back to that size
"Usually when I walk on the street, everyone notices me, but now it's like nobody notices me." Photo source: Larry Busacca / Getty Images for GLAAD; Paras Griffin / Getty Images steady, who has been showing off her body with her new wardrobe



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nearly 150 powerful men in industries ranging from media to tech have been accused of sexual misconduct (ranging verbal harassment to rape) from since film producer Harvey Weinstein was accused in October.”
“The piece argued, "This urge to send men to the slaughterhouse instead of helping women be more autonomous helps the enemies of sexual freedom."”
“Earlier this month, fellow French film icon Catherine Deneuve, 74, apologized publicly after she joined 99 other prominent female writers, entertainers, historians, journalists, curators, academics and intellectuals in signing an open letter in Parisian newspaper Le Monde likening the #MeToo movement to a "witch hunt."”
“In reality, this harms them more than it helps."”
“Then later they say they were harassed.”
“Bardot believes,"There are a lot of actresses who tease producers in order to get roles.”
“This kind of compliment is nice."”
“And I always found it charming when someone told me I was beautiful or I had a cute (butt).”
“Me, I was never the victim of sexual harassment.”
“She added, "It takes away from important themes that need to be discussed.”


"Since filmmaker Harvey Weinstein was charged in October, nearly 150 powerful men from media to technology have been charged with sexual misconduct (from verbal harassment to rape)," he said
"This impulse to send men to slaughterhouses rather than to help women become more autonomous helps the enemies of sexual freedom," the article argues
Earlier this month, 74 year old French film icon Catherine Deneuve signed an open letter with 99 other well-known female writers, artists, historians, journalists, curators, scholars and intellectuals in Le Monde, Paris, comparing the "meto movement" to "political persecution" and then apologized publicly
"In fact, it hurt them more than it helped them."
"Later they said they were harassed."
"There are a lot of actresses who tease producers to get the part," bardo says
"It's a good compliment."
"When people tell me I'm beautiful or I have a cute butt, I always feel charming."
"I, I've never been a victim of sexual harassment."
"It will free us from the important topics that need to be discussed," she added



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Be sure to subscribe to our YouTube channel for fun, exclusive videos with your favorite stars.”
“RELATED: Here's Why Everyone Thought Drake and Rihanna Were So in LoveLove J-14?”
“In a now deleted Snapchat, RiRi is seen walking around the party, playing with the kids in a ball pit and laughing with friends.”
“Drake was also caught on video hanging out and enjoying the day.”
“The one thing that didn't happen is any interaction between the two – publicly at least.”
“To be honest, we're not totally surprised.”
“What would YOU do if you ran into an ex at an intimate gathering?”
“Probably the same thing these two did and that is avoid each other at all costs.”
“RELATED: Drake Admits That He Still Loves RihannaThe Shade Room posted a few seconds of the footage with the caption, "#PressPlay #Rihanna and #Drake were spotted at a kids party today!”
“They arrived separately, Riri came with her bestie.”


"Be sure to subscribe to our YouTube channel and watch interesting exclusive videos with your favorite stars."
"Related report: that's why people think Drake and Rihanna love each other so much, j-14?"
"In a deleted snapchat, you can see Riri walking around the party, playing in the ball pit with the children and laughing with friends."
"Drake was also caught hanging out in the video and enjoying the day."
"The only thing that didn't happen was any interaction between the two - at least publicly."
"To be honest, we're not completely surprised."
"What would you do if you met your ex at an intimate party?"
"Maybe the two did the same thing, and that's to avoid each other at all costs."
"Related report: Drake admits that he still loves Rihanna." shadow room "posted a video for a few seconds titled:" press play, "" Rihanna and Drake were found at a children's party today! "
"They're coming apart. Riley's coming with her bridesmaid."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There were millions of balloons, rounds of shots, and even a steamy makeout sesh.”
“February 14, 2019: The Sweetest V-Day SurpriseAhead of Sophie's 23rd birthday on February 21, Joe served up major fiancé goals by throwing his future wife a surprise Valentine's Day birthday party.”
“We are still waiting on cute couple pics from inside the event, Jophie!”
“The couple did, however, attend the Marc Jacobs after party together following the gala.”
“While both Joe and Sophie attended the 2017 Met Gala, they did not pose together on the red carpet (cue tears!).”
“May 1, 2017: No Pictures!”
“They were spotted walking through Charles de Gaulle Airport hand in hand and attended shows together throughout the trip.”
“March 6, 2017: Front Row for Fashion WeekGetty ImagesA few months after going public with their relationship, the pair touched down in Paris for fashion week.”
“Safe to say the world went wild.”
“January 1, 2017: An Insta-Official CoupleThe couple presumably rang in the new year together in Miami and Sophie made their relationship Instagram-official when she posted a photo of Joe smoking a cigar on her account.”


"There are millions of balloons, round after round of shooting, and even a steaming masquerade party."
"February 14, 2019: before Sophie's 23rd birthday on February 21, the sweetest Valentine's day surprise, Joe presents a surprise Valentine's day birthday party for his fiancee's major goal."
"We're still waiting for the lovely couple photos inside the event, joffy!"
However, the couple did attend mark Jacobs' wedding party after the party
"Although both Joe and Sophie attended the 2017 blind date party, they didn't take a picture on the red carpet (hint of tears!)."
"May 1, 2017: no photos!"
"They were found walking hand in hand through Charles de Gaulle Airport, all the way to the show."
"March 6, 2017: front page photo of Fashion Weekly: a few months after their public love affair, they landed at fashion week in Paris."
"To be sure, the world is going crazy."
"January 1, 2017: an instagram official said the couple might spend New Year's day together in Miami, and Sophie posted a photo of Joe smoking a cigar on instagram, making their relationship an official record."



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[[423611884, C]]”
“So yeah, Cher rocked the awards show — and then everyone in the world cheered.”
“Drake s history making night sort of took a back seat to what was happening onstage like his shout out to Vanessa Hudgens but what else can you expect when Miley Cyrus makes her return to the stage with an...”
“...emotional Malibu performance Bruno Mars is pure magic with his 24K moves and Cher makes us believe in life after love...”
“Here are the biggest jaw droppers from the 2017 Billboard Music Awards Billboard Music Awards 2017 Red Carpet Arrivals Bondage Babe Nicki Minaj raised more than a few eyebrows with her 9 minute long opener that was chock full of...”
“BDSM imagery...”
“From the face mask to the grinding and sexual costumes, the rapper wanted to make a statement with her performance — and she did.”
“Hopefully there weren't any kids watching.”
“[[423609414, C]]Winged Goddess: A chandelier rose from the floor and revealed the Grammy winner Celine Dion, who basically had wings on.”
“Then the big-voiced diva made our spines tingle with her performance of her beloved, 20-year-old song "My Heart Will Go On."”


“[[423611884，C]]”
"Yes, Cher shocked the award ceremony, and then people all over the world cheered."
"Drake's history making night was a little bit behind the scenes, like he yelled at Vanessa Hudgens, but when Miley Cyrus was carrying a..." Back on the stage, what else can you expect? "
“… Emotional Malibu shows Bruno Mars is pure magic with his 24K action and Cher makes us believe in life after love... "
"The following is the biggest chin drop at the 2017 Billboard Music Awards 2017 red carpet award ceremony. The shackled baby Nicki Minaj raised more than a few eyebrows with her 9-minute opening speech, which was full of..."
"BDSM image..."
"From masks to frosts and sex clothes, rappers want to express themselves with her performance - she did it."
"I hope there are no children watching."
"[[423609414, C]] goddess with wings: a chandelier rises from the floor, revealing Grammy award winning chairman Lynn Dion, who basically has wings."
"Then, the vocal singer sang her beloved, 20-year-old song" my heart will continue ", which made our spine tingle."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He revealed she spends a lot of time with him when he's recording music.”
“Because I’m really not, so she helps organize my schedule around seeing her!"”
“Instagram/Safaa MalikAnd the other selfie on Christmas!”
“Instagram/Gigi HadidSafaa Malik also posted this ~festive~ selfie on her Instagram story on Christmas Eve.”
“Instagram/Gigi HadidMama Hadid also built one!”
“*Beyoncé voice* We built gingerbread housesssssss.”
“Instagram/Gigi HadidUh, Gigi, the wings are blocking your face!”
“Instagram/Gigi HadidShe also posted this ~angelic~ selfie of her and her boo.”
“This selfie of Gigi, Zayn, and Safaa is adorable AF and shows just how much Gigi is part of the Malik fam.”
“The photos consisted of lots of selfies in Christmas PJs (bless), the aforementioned gingerbread houses, and lots of holiday filters.”


"He revealed that when he recorded music, she would spend a lot of time with him."
"Because I'm not really, she arranged a meeting schedule for me!"
"Instagram / Safaa malikand and another self portrait of Christmas!"
"Instagram / Gigi Hadid Safaa Malik also released this ~ professional ~ self portrait in the instagram story on Christmas Eve."
"Instagram / Gigi hadidmama Hadid also built one!"
"* voice of Beyonce * we built gingerbread house."
"Instagram / Gigi, hadiduh, Gigi, wings block your face!"
"Instagram / Gigi Hadid she also released this ~ angelic ~ self portrait of her and her boo."
"This lovely selfie of Gigi, zayn and Safaa shows that Gigi is a member of the Malik family."
"These photos include a lot of self portraits in Christmas pajamas (blessings), the gingerbread house mentioned earlier, and a lot of holiday filters."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Otherwise, we'd like to take a charitable donation, to the Children's Hospital or a pet [or] whatever you want.’ That's our new tradition.”Speaking of traditions, there’s another custom Kunis enjoys -- Monday nights with The Bachelor and its various spinoffs!”
“They don't even know what they're expecting; they're just expecting stuff.”“We've told our parents, ‘We're begging you -- if you have to give her something, pick one gift.”
“There's enough a**holes in this world!” Kunis says.”
““Yeah, we're not gonna raise a**holes.”
““When it is really hot outside, we go to the library and read books.”Library visits are important for the kids, with Kunis and Kutcher endeavoring to raise open-minded children.”
““We have a public library card everywhere we go,” Kunis continues.”
“We used to be like, ‘What's the coolest club?’ and [now] I'm like, ‘Let me tell you about the zoo in Atlanta and the bouncy house.’ There's not one kid activity that I haven't done yet with my child!"”
““Because that's what we do.”
““I can write you a book on kid-friendly activities anywhere in the world,” she says.”
“The sequel -- which also stars Susan Sarandon, Christine Baranski and Cheryl Hines as well as returning co-stars Kristen Bell and Kathryn Hahn -- hits theaters on Nov. 3., and Kunis made the most of her downtime from the set with fun family activities.”


"Otherwise, we are willing to accept a charitable donation to a children's hospital or pet (or anything you want) This is our new tradition. "Speaking of tradition, Kunis also likes another custom - Monday night with Bachelors and their derivatives!"
"They don't even know what they're expecting; they're just expecting something." "We told our parents," we're begging - if you have to give her something, choose a gift. "
"There are enough loopholes in the world! "Kunis said
"Yes, we won't dig a hole."
"When it's hot outside, we go to the library to read." It's important for children to visit the library. Kunis and Kutcher strive to cultivate open-minded children
"We have a public library card everywhere we go," Kunis continued
"We used to say," what's the coolest club? "? And I thought, "let me tell you about the zoo and the bouncing house in Atlanta." No child's activity is what my child and I haven't done yet! "
"Because that's what we do."
"I can write you a book about child friendly activities around the world," she said
The sequel, starring Susan Sarandon, Christina baransky and Cheryl Hayes, and co starring Christine bell and Katherine Hahn, was released on November 3. Kunis made full use of the interesting family activities during his break time on the set



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“An exception is the high-kicking Daredevil, with Charlie Cox’s blind lawyer/crimefighter banishing all memory of Ben Affleck's turn donning the red jumpsuit in 2003.”
“Netflix The 50 best TV shows on Netflix UK Daredevil Netflix’s Marvel shows tend towards the overlong and turgid.”
“Tom Payne, who plays Jesus, told Digital Spy: “I think when Carl died last year and Chandler left, I think that was a moment for him of: ‘OK, where does this leave Rick?”
“It was time for me to come home.”Other sources, however, have suggested that Lincoln’s decision to leave runs deeper – and may have been a consequence of former showrunner Scott Gimple unexpectedly writing his on-screen son Chandler Riggs out of the show during its eighth season.”
“It was that simple.”
“Speaking to EW Radio, he said: “I have two young children, and I live in a different country, and they become less portable as they get older.”
“...decision stemmed from wanting to spend more time with his family back in the UK having been forced to continually relocate to Georgia for filming since the show began...”
“...film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here The British actor explained that his...”
“...the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in...”
“My relationship with Mr Rick Grimes is far from over Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week Please enter your email address Please enter a valid email address Please enter a valid email address SIGN UP Thanks for signing up to...”


"One exception is the high kick bold, with Charlie Cox's blind lawyer / criminal erasing all memories, Ben Affleck's turn to wear a Red Jumpsuit in 2003."
"Netflix, the top 50 best TV show in the UK, and the bold, Netflix's surprise shows tend to be super long and exaggerated."
Tom Payne, who plays Jesus, told Digital Spy: "I think when Carl died last year and Chandler left, I think it was a moment for him: 'well, what's left of this for Rick?"
"It's time for me to go home." However, other sources believe that Lincoln's decision to leave has a deeper meaning - probably because former presenter Scott gimple unexpectedly wrote about his son Chandler rigs on screen in season 8
"It's that simple."
"I have two children, I live in different countries, and their portability is getting worse as they get older," he told EW radio
“…… This decision stems from his desire to spend more time with his family in the UK. Since the beginning of the show, he has been forced to move to Georgia constantly to shoot... "
“… Send the movie music TV broadcast directly to your in box every week. The independent wants to email you about the offers and updates. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list to agree to the terms. Here, the British actor explains his... "
“… Independent culture communication verifyerrors information verifyerrors information verifyerrors information verifyerrors independent culture would like to inform you by e-mail about promotional activities and updates. Please check the box. If you would like to contact us, please read our complete mailing list. Agree terms here. Independent culture communication is the best... "
"My relationship with Mr. Rick Grimes is no more than the best movie music TV broadcast of independent cultural communication. It's sent directly to your mailbox every week. Please enter your email address. Please enter a valid email address. Please enter a valid email address to register. Thank you for registering..."



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The Arrangement” Season 2 premieres March 11 on E!”
“...many things not being said Henderson says...”
“...to keep up the ruse so she can keep her relationship with Kyle Josh Henderson but that relationship is going to get a lot more complicated...”
““One of the lines we’re exploring this season is when you’re coming from a place of anger and revenge, how sustainable is that?,” creator Jonathan Abrahams tells Variety.”
““It’s so much about emotion and passion in that world, and there’s so much emotion and passion between Megan and Kyle, but how sustainable is that?”
“For a while that s the thing that s worth fighting for but then you have to ask if you can ever get back to that While Megan and Kyle are moving forward in their relationship and contract by planning a wedding Evangelista says the honeymoon phase of their relationship...”
“...is over and now they are faced with questions of trust and whether or not the fantasy can withstand time...”
“There’s also the question of whose vision this wedding truly is, given that it was just one of many milestones she promised to mark when she signed the relationship agreement in the first place.”
““It’s not Megan’s vision, it’s not Kyle’s vision, it’s something else,” Evangelista says.”
““There’s always this other force around them, so it’s this young girl having incredible moments, something she’s fantasized about her whole life, and it’s out of her control in a lot of ways.”


The second season of arrangement premiered on March 11
“…… Henderson said a lot that he didn't say... "
“… Continue the trick so she can maintain her relationship with Kyle Josh Henderson, but it's going to get more complicated... "
"One of the lines we're going to explore this season is, how sustainable is it when you come from a place full of anger and revenge? "Creator Jonathan Abraham told variety
"There's so much emotion and passion in that world, so much emotion and passion between Megan and Kyle, but how sustainable is that?"
"There was a time when it was worth fighting for, but you have to ask if you can go back when Megan and Kyle move forward in their relationship and contract and plan the wedding." Evangelista said the honeymoon phase of their relationship
“…… It's over. Now they are faced with the problem of trust, and whether the fantasy can stand the test of time... "
"There's another question, whose vision is this wedding, because it's just one of the many milestones she promised to commemorate when she signed the love agreement."
"It's not Megan's illusion, it's not Kyle's illusion, it's something else," Evangelista said
"There is always another power around them, so this young girl has incredible moments, which she has been dreaming about all her life, and many aspects are beyond her control."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let’s just hope that he’ll manage to make Selena Gomez’s mom see him the way his own mother does if he is indeed a changed young man.”
“AdvertisementShe wrote that he is maturing beautifully and wise.”
“Before breaking her leg, Pattie also posted a photo of her and her son, and she captioned it saying that she is proud of her young man and of what he became.”
“#blessed’She posted more pics some of them showing luxurious baths, and she explained to her fans that these baths were helping her with the pain and all the discomfort.”
“My foot has been on an adventure this trip!”
“I had to take a few boats and seaplanes to get it looked at / treated, but I had awesome helpers and a cool wheelchair made for sand.”
“Despite the injury, the upbeat mom continued, ‘Almost all I got are foot pics lol!”
“Of that I am sure…’ she posted.”
“‘Okay so yeah, I broke my foot on the first day of vacation  but there are worse places to be hurt ;).”
“A post shared by Justin Bieber (@justinbieber) on Jan 20, 2018 at 4:11am PSTAfter Justin’s post, Pattie also posted a pic of her broken foot on her social media account and she made sure to explain to her 1.9 million fans what exactly had happened there.”


"I hope he can make Selena Gomez's mother treat him like his own mother, if he is really a changed young man."
"She wrote that he was maturing beautifully and wisely."
"Before breaking her leg, Patty posted a picture of her and her son, and she said in the title that she was proud of her young man and the man he had become."
"Blessed" she posted more photos, some of which showed luxurious bathtubs, which she explained to her fans helped relieve her pain and all her discomfort
"I've been risking my feet on this trip!"
"I had to take a few boats and a seaplane to see / treat it, but I had a great assistant and a cool beach wheelchair."
"Despite the injury, the optimistic mother continued," I get almost all the footprints, ha ha! "
"I'm sure..." She posted that
"Well, yes, I broke my foot on the first day of the holiday, but there were worse injuries."
"Justin Bieber (@ justinbieber) shared a post at 4:11 a.m. on January 20, 2018. After Justin's post, Patty also posted a photo of her broken foot on her social media account. She must explain to 1.9 million fans what happened there."



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Ariana Grande Wraps European Tour, Pens Sweet Message Thanking Fans for 'Wiping My Tears Away' This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“For more from Grande, watch the clip below.”
“The event made millions, with $324,000 going to each of the victims' families.”
“MORE: Families of Victims at Ariana Grande Manchester Concert Will Receive $324,000 EachGrande raised money for the victims and their families shortly thereafter at the “One Love Manchester” benefit concert.”
“The attack killed 22 people.”
“She has been on the road with her Dangerous Woman tour for months, only briefly taking a break after the tragic bombing that took place in May following her concert in Manchester, England.”
“Australia in September...”
“I love you and thank you for understanding WATCH Manchester Arena to Reopen With Benefit Concert 4 Months After Bombing at Ariana Grande Show Instagram Stories Grande is next set to appear in Beijing Shanghai and Guangzhou Shi China through the end of August before traveling to New Zealand and...”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Ariana Grande finished her European tour and wrote a sweet message of thanks to the fans for" drying my tears. ". The video is not available because we are unable to load the sponsor's information. "
"For more information about Grande, watch the clip below."
"Millions of dollars were made and 324000 dollars were donated to the families of every victim."
"More: the families of the victims of Ariana Grande Manchester concert will receive $324000, and soon after that, at the" one love Manchester "charity concert, each brand will raise funds for the victims and their families."
"The attack killed 22 people."
"She has been on the road for months with the dangerous women tour, only to take a short break after the tragic bombing that followed her concert in Manchester, England, in May."
"Australia in September..."
"I love you and thank you for your understanding of watching the Manchester arena reopen a charity concert 4 months after the Ariana bombings to perform Instagram Stories Grande the next step will be in Beijing, Shanghai and Guangzhou, China at the end of August, then to New Zealand and..."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A rep for Masterson has previously denied the allegations of sexual assault.”
“The That ’70s Show alum is currently under investigation by the Los Angeles Police Department and the Los Angeles County District Attorney.”
““After discussing with the producers, we’ve decided to write Danny Masterson off of The Ranch.”
“Yesterday was his last day of work, and we’ll make new episodes in 2018 without him,” the streaming service said in a statement.”
““Yesterday was his last day of work, we’ll make new episodes in 2018 without him.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I am obviously very disappointed in Netflix’s decision to write my character off of The Ranch,” Masterson said in a statement via his rep obtained by PEOPLE.”
““From day one, I have denied the outrageous allegations against me.”
“Law enforcement investigated these claims more than 15 years ago and determined them to be without merit.”
“I have never been charged with a crime, let alone convicted of one.”
“In this country, you are presumed innocent until proven guilty.”


"A representative of Masterson previously denied the sexual assault charges."
"The '70s alumni is currently under investigation by the LAPD and the Los Angeles County Attorney."
"After discussing with the producers, we decided to remove Denny Masterson from the ranch."
"Yesterday was his last day at work, and without him, we will be producing a new series in 2018," the streaming service said in a statement
"Yesterday was his last day at work, and we're going to make a new series in 2018 without him." Get push notification of news, special topics, etc
"Obviously, I'm very disappointed with Netflix's decision to take my character off the ranch," Masterson said in a statement
"From the first day, I denied the shameless charges against me."
"Law enforcement investigated these claims more than 15 years ago and found them groundless."
"I've never been charged with a crime, let alone convicted."
In this country, you are considered innocent until proven guilty



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...their home s aesthetic of light colors and woods and soft and natural colors And there s one other comfortable and practical piece of nursery furniture the new mom of three cherishes greatly her glider...”
“Included in the message was a photo of Psalm, bundled up in blankets while lying in a see-through acrylic crib.”
“Kardashian West and Beyoncé share a sense of style or that it extends to their little ones sleep spaces...”
“While introducing her newborn son to the world — and revealing she and Kanye West have named him Psalm — the new mom of four also proved she loves a good hand-me-down.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Friday, a week after announcing her son’s arrival via surrogate, Kardashian West shared the first photo of her baby boy in the form of a text conversation with her husband.”
““Beautiful Mother’s Day with the arrival of our fourth child.”
“We are blessed beyond measure.”
“We have everything we need,” the message read.”
“The reality star previously opened up to Architectural Digest about her now-16-month-old daughter Chicago‘s nursery, including the unique crib she has seen a lot of use out of already with son Saint, 3 and daughter North, 6 next month.”


“… Their home is light color and wood aesthetics, soft and natural color, and a comfortable and practical child care furniture. The new mother of three cherishes her glider very much
There was a picture of a psalm lying in a transparent acrylic crib wrapped in a blanket
"Kardashian West and Beyonce share a sense of style, or that style extends to their children's sleeping space..."
"While introducing her new born son to the world - she and Kanye West named him Psalm - the new mother of four also proves that she loves a good successor."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"On Friday, Kardashian West announced her son's arrival through a surrogate mother. A week later, she shared her son's first photo with her husband in the form of a text message conversation."
"With the arrival of our fourth child, mother's Day is wonderful."
"Our happiness is immeasurable."
"We have everything we need," the message read
"The reality TV star has previously disclosed to architectural digest the situation of her 16-month-old daughter's Chicago nursery, including the unique crib that she saw next month's three-year-old son saint and six-year-old daughter north already have many uses."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts over on Twitter @CelebMix.”
“Are you excited for new music from Cheryl this year?”
“I can’t tell you the name of her track but it has been influenced by her son Bear.”He also added that the track will feel “very special and meaningful”.”
“Speaking to The Sun, Naughty Boy said; “Cheryl has got back in the studio just after having a baby and it’s still very personal, but she is a real artist and a perfectionist.”
“The tot will turn 1 on March 22nd and it looks like his first year has been a big inspiration to his mother.”
“...by her baby boy Bear...”
“And while Cheryl has kept quiet on what her new music has been inspired by or what genre she is gearing towards producer Naughty Boy whose real name is Shahid Khan has revealed to The Sun newspaper that the Fight For This Love hitmaker s new single has been inspired...”
“Since January Chezza has been recording and writing with Naughty Boy, ex Girls Aloud bandmate Nicola Roberts, and 2017 X Factor champions Rak-Su as she looks to create a new sound.”
“Cheryl last released an LP back in 2014; The top-ten hit ‘Only Human‘.”
“Her return to the recording studio was confirmed by hit record producer Naughty Boy who has been enlisted by the former X Factor judge for her comeback.”


"Please be here Twitter@CelebMix Tell us what you think on the Internet. "
"Are you excited about Cheryl's new music this year?"
"I can't tell you the name of her repertoire, but it's influenced by her son bear." He added that the track would make people feel "very special and meaningful."
"Cheryl came back to the studio as soon as she had a baby. It's very personal, but she's a real artist and perfectionist," the naughty boy told the sun
"The child will turn 1 on March 22, and it seems that his first year is a great inspiration for his mother."
“… Her baby bear... "
"Cheryl has always been silent about her new music inspiration, and has not disclosed the style of the naughty boy (real name Shahid Khan), the producer she is brewing, but she told the sun that the inspiration for fighting for this new single of love killer comes from..."
"Since January, chezza has been recording and writing with naughty boy, former girl band partner Nicola Roberts and 2017 X factor champion Rak Su, hoping to create a new voice."
"Cheryl's last album was released in 2014; the top ten hit song was only humans."
"Her return to the studio has been confirmed by the popular record producer naughty boy, who has been called back by the former X factor judges."



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out just how great Dylan and Brenda look:Courtesy of Instagram/DylanSprouseRelated:– Riverdale Fans Want Cole and Dylan Sprouse to Be EVIL TWINS– People Think Lili Reinhart and Cole Sprouse Are Dating After Source Says They Kissed at Comic-ConCheck This Out:”
“Remember Jason Earles' recent wedding, or that High School Musical fan-made reunion trailer?).”
“The Suite Life shows aren't the only recent reunions that had us feeling nostalgic.”
“And while both Dylan and his brother Cole have already said that a Suite Life reboot is probably not in the cards for them, we're glad to see that various castmates are still down to hang.”
“We've been loving all the recent throwbacks and reunions of our favorite Disney Channel classics over the past few years.”
“He captioned the sweet pic with, "Look who I ran into!"”
“On Thursday (September 21), Dylan posted to his Instagram Story a selfie of himself with Brenda sitting in a car together.”
“Needless to say, we're having some feels about it.”
“On top of that, they proved that they're still totally friends with a mini Suite reunion.”
“Dylan Sprouse and Brenda Song go way back being that they were former co-stars on the Disney show The Suite Life of Zack and Cody.”


"See how great Dylan and Brenda are: it's my pleasure instagram / Dylan sprout related: - Riverdale fans want Cole and Dylan sprout to be evil twins - people think Lili Reinhart and Cole sprout are on a blind date because the source said they were kissing at the comic book convention. Look at this:
"Remember Jason Earles' recent wedding, or the reunion Trailer made by that high school musical fan?"
"The suite life show isn't the only party that has made us nostalgic lately."
"Although Dylan and his brother Cole have already said that they may not intend to start their suite life again, we are glad to see that all kinds of caster partners are still up in the air."
"Over the past few years, we've enjoyed all the recent remakes and reunions of our favorite Disney Classic channel."
He added a title to the lovely photo: "look who I met!"
"On Thursday (September 21), Dylan posted a self portrait of himself sitting in the car with Brenda on instagram."
"Needless to say, we have some feelings about it."
"In addition, they have proved that they are still full friends of Mini Suite parties."
"The history of Dylan spruce and Brenda song can be traced back to the fact that they co starred in the Disney Show Zach and Cody's Suite Life."



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She kept in the background, but seemed great.””
““It was a scheduled taping,” the source said.”
“Kylie Jenner may be keeping an extremely low profile as she prepares to welcome her first child, but she stepped out this weekend for a special double date with her boyfriend Travis Scott, sister Kendall Jenner and Kendall’s beau Blake Griffin.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“An onlooker confirms to PEOPLE that Kendall, 21, and Kylie, 20, spent Sunday evening at Universal Studios’ Halloween Horror Nights in Hollywood, accompanied by Scott, 25, and Griffin, 28.”
“The foursome was also joined by Jordyn Woods, 20, and Hailey Baldwin, 20.”
““Kylie and Kendall were both extremely loving and cuddly with their boyfriends,” the onlooker says.”
““Both couples had their arms around each other, and the girls were really sweet with their guys.”
“Travis and Kylie were especially cute and lovey-dovey.”
“Kendall and Blake had a blast going through the mazes together While there were certain rides pregnant Kylie couldn t go on she made sure Travis went ahead and had fun says the onlooker adding that the reality star kept her belly under wraps in a big hoodie and leggings...”


"She's been behind the scenes, but it looks great."
"This is a scheduled recording," the source said
"Kelly Jenner may keep a very low profile when preparing for her first child, but this weekend she had a special double date with her boyfriend Travis Scott, sister Kendall Jenner and Kendall's boyfriend Blake Griffin."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A bystander has confirmed that Kendall, 21, and Kylie, 20, were accompanied by Scott, 25, and Griffin, same as below, 28 years old Griffin, who spent the night on Halloween on Universal Studio Hollywood Sunday night."
"Joining the Quartet are 20-year-old Jordan woods and 20-year-old Haley Baldwin."
"Kelly and Kendall love their boyfriends very much, and they're cute," bystanders said
"The two couples are holding each other. The girls are so kind to their men."
"Travis and Kelly are very cute."
"Kendall and Blake had an explosive experience going through the maze together, while some pregnant Kelly couldn't go on. She made sure Travis kept going and had fun," said onlookers, adding that the reality TV star kept her belly wrapped in a big Hoodie and gaiters... "



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See more of the adorable family in the video below.”
“#Unicorn #RyRy #5 #podiumgame."”
“And even though daddy still struggles to do your hair, the responsibility as your father stays front and center for me every single day!”
“"Love everything about you!”
“Couldn't have imagined a more ferocious, creative, confident, joyous, caring and spontaneous little girl to call my daughter," he wrote.”
“"5 years ago you changed our world!”
“InstagramEarlier in the day, the Golden State Warriors star dedicated a sweet Instagram post to his caring little girl!”
“InstagramInstagramRELATED: Steph Curry Celebrates With Adorable Daughters Riley & Ryan After Golden State Warriors Win NBA ChampionshipAyesha also shared a selfie with Steph, captioning the pic, "Parents of a 2 and 5-year-old."”
“InstagramRELATED: Steph Curry's Adorable Daughters Riley and Ryan Steal the Show at Warriors Championship ParadeRiley's birthday party also featured a gorgeous-looking unicorn cake and "magical drinks," including "unicorn water," aka raspberry peach lemonade with a splash of grenadine.”
“InstagramInstagramIn another adorable snap, Riley's 2-year-old sister, Ryan, is seen wearing a light-pink dress, just like her big sis, and a unicorn headband.”


"You can see more lovely families in the video below."
"# Unicorn # ryry # 5 # podium game."
"Even if dad is still trying to help you do your hair, as your dad's responsibility is in front and center of me every day!"
"Love you all!"
"I didn't expect a more fierce, creative, confident, happy, caring, spontaneous little girl to call my daughter," he wrote
"You changed our world five years ago!"
"In the days of instagram earlier, the star of Golden State Warriors dedicated a sweet instagram post to his sweet little girl!"
"Instagram instagram related: after the Golden State Warriors won the NBA championship, Stephen curry celebrated with his lovely daughters Riley and Ryan. Payesha also shared with Stephen a self portrait titled "the parents of a two - and five-year-old."
Instagr amRELATED:Steph Curry The lovely daughters Riley and Ryan made their debut at the paraderiley's birthday party at the warriors championship. They also featured a gorgeous Unicorn cake and "magic drink", including "unicorn water", also known as raspberry peach lemonade, and a little pomegranate syrup
"Another lovely picture from instagramin shows Riley's 2-year-old sister, Ryan, in a light pink dress, just like her big sister, wearing a unicorn headband."



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the hospital too soon not until she s officially freaked out But the doula will be there as our advocate and as someone who has gone through this many more times than we have she added...”
“Let s bounce on a ball let s walk down the street RELATED VIDEO Scandal s Katie Lowes Describes Kerry Washington in Three Words Lowes 36 explained to Fit Pregnancy and Baby that she doesn t want to rush to...”
“You’re okay; let’s do another lap around the house.”
“So we want someone who is able to say, ‘This is normal.”
“...going into labor so she can come over and help us go through the early stage She added My husband and I are both actors we re obviously dramatic...”
“The actress previously revealed her birth plan for the October cover story of Fit Pregnancy and Baby explaining I wanted a doula because it s my first baby and I want to be able to call her when I m...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Lowes announced her pregnancy with husband Adam Shapiro in May, joking to Jimmy Kimmel that the then-parents-to-be — who wed in 2012 — had “zero names” in mind for their son on the way.”
“We’re happy & healthy!” the new mom shared on Twitter and Instagram.”


“… It's too early for the hospital, unless she's officially scared, but doula will be our advocate, as a person who has experienced more than us, she added
"Let's bounce on a ball Let's walk on the street scandal related video s Katie Lois uses three words to describe Kelly Watson. Lois's 36 year old explanation is suitable for pregnancy and baby, she doesn't want to rush..."
"You're OK. Let's go round the house again."
"So we want someone to say," it's normal. "
“…… When we were in labor, she would come to help us through the early stages, she added, "my husband and I are both actors, we are obviously very dramatic..."
"The actress revealed her birth plan in October's cover story healthy pregnancy and baby. She explained that I want to have a doula because this is my first child and I want to call her when I'm pregnant..."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
In May of this year, Lois announced that she was pregnant with her husband Adam Shapiro. She joked to Jimi Kimmel that the parents to be (they got married in 2012) had "zero" on their son's name at the wedding
"We are happy and healthy! "New mom shared it on Twitter and instagram."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...lot of the songs are sad The May issue of British GQ will be available on April 5”
“Putting aside her frustrations with the music industry Dua Lipa is in the process of writing music for her new album and according to her it is all about dance crying She says It is a pop album that you re going to be able to dance to but a...”
“She is credited to all but two songs on her album as her own words.”
“She says, “For a male artist, people instantly assume they write their own music, but for women, they assume it’s all manufactured.”Dua Lipa understands the stuff she is saying considering she does not play any instruments while she sings, but she does write all of her own songs.”
“In an interview with British GQ, she says, “For a female artist, it takes a lot more to be taken seriously if you’re not sat down at a piano or with a guitar, you know.” She also added her perspective on the music industry for males.”
“The 22-year-old artist is taking the music industry by storm and is not okay with the underlying sexism within the industry.”
“Dua Lipa points out the underlying sexism in the music industry and wants some new rules put in place for female artists.”


“…… A lot of songs are sad. The British GQ may issue on April 5
"Despite her dissatisfaction with the music industry, Dua LiPA is making music for her new album, which is a pop album, according to her. You can dance, but..."
"Except for two songs in the album, she wrote her own words."
"For a male artist, people immediately think they made music, but for a woman, they think it's all man-made," she said Du alipa understood what she said because she didn't play any musical instruments when she sang, but she did write all the songs herself
In an interview with GQ, she said: "for a female artist, if you're not sitting in front of the piano or guitar, you know, you need to take it more seriously." She also added her views on the male music industry
"The 22-year-old artist is setting off a storm in the music industry and does not agree with the potential sexism in the music industry."
"Du alipa pointed out the potential sexism in the music industry and wanted to make some new rules for female artists."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I hope that we take action to figure out how to prevent this from ever happening again.””
“It was very secure, it felt so safe to be there, and it was one of the favorite festivals I’ve played.”
““I’ve had the song in my pocket for the last few years and I never knew when to release it,” says Morris.”
“The song, “Dear Hate,” was a prayer of belief in the power of healing and hope in the face of obscene violence.”
““It was a really emotional day to write that song,” Morris says.”
“South Carolina church shooting...”
“It sounds cliche I guess but it just seemed like the least likely place where something this tragic could go down Feeling paralyzed with guilt and sick with inaction Morris then thought of a song she had written more than two years earlier just two days after the 2015 Charleston...”
“You couldn’t even see the edge of the crowd, it was that big.”
““The festival was so fun and well-organized.”
“It’s just insane how relevant the message still is today.”


"I hope we take action to find ways to prevent this from happening again."
"It was very safe at that time, it felt very safe there, it was one of my favorite festivals."
"I've been keeping this song in my pocket for years and I don't know when it will be released," Morris said
"This song" Dear hate "is a prayer song, expressing people's belief in the power and hope of healing in the face of obscene violence
"It's a moving day to write this song," Morris said
"Church shooting in South Carolina..."
"I think it sounds old-fashioned, but this seems to be the least likely place for such a tragedy to happen, paralyzed by guilt, disgusted by inaction. Morris then recalled a song she wrote more than two years ago, two days after the 2015 Charleston Olympics..."
"You can't even see the edge of the crowd, it's that big."
"This festival is very interesting and well organized."
"It's incredible that this message is still so important today."



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“GLOBAL ICONU2 -- WINNER”
“Similarly, Louis Tomlinson has been chosen by fans via social vote for Best U.K. & Ireland Act.”
“In the Best U.S. Act voting category, wildcard nominee Fifth Harmony has been chosen by fans via social vote.”
“...regions...”
“Isle of MTV Malta 2017 The Chainsmokers Live from Isle of MTV Malta 2017 WINNER Foo Fighters Live from Barcelona Spain 2017 BEST LOCAL ACT Bruno Mars U S Little Mix U K Ireland Drake Canada Justin Bieber Canada and Kygo Norway are among those nominated for their respective home...”
“Bellion Julia Michaels Kacy Hill Khalid Kyle Noah Cyrus Petite Meller Rag n Bone Man SZA The Head And The Heart BEST WORLD STAGE Steve Aoki Live from Isle of MTV Malta 2016 Kings of Leon Live from Oude Luxor Theatre Rotterdam The Netherlands 2016 Tomorrowland 2017 DNCE Live from...”
“Fighters Royal Blood The Killers U2 BEST HIP HOP Drake Eminem WINNER Future Kendrick Lamar Post Malone BEST ALTERNATIVE Imagine Dragons Lana Del Rey Lorde The xx Thirty Seconds To Mars WINNER BIGGEST FANS Ariana Grande Justin Bieber Katy Perry Shawn Mendes Taylor Swift BEST PUSH Hailee Steinfeld WINNER Jon...”
“Perry Bon Appetit ft Migos Kendrick Lamar Humble WINNER Kyle iSpy ft Lil Yachty Taylor Swift Look What You Made Me Do BEST LIVE Bruno Mars Coldplay Ed Sheeran WINNER Eminem U2 BEST ELECTRONIC Calvin Harris David Guetta WINNER Major Lazer Martin Garrix The Chainsmokers BEST ROCK Coldplay WINNER Foo...”
“Cyrus Shawn Mendes WINNER Taylor Swift BEST LOOK Dua Lipa Harry Styles Rita Ora Taylor Swift Zayn WINNER BEST NEW Dua Lipa WINNER Julia Michaels Khalid Kyle Rag n Bone Man BEST POP Camila Cabello WINNER Demi Lovato Miley Cyrus Shawn Mendes Taylor Swift BEST VIDEO Foo Fighters Run Katy...”
“BEST SONG Clean Bandit Rockabye ft Sean Paul Anne Marie DJ Khaled Wild Thoughts ft Rihanna Bryson Tiller Ed Sheeran Shape of You Luis Fonsi Daddy Yankee Despacito Remix ft Justin Bieber Shawn Mendes There s Nothing Holdin Me Back WINNER BEST ARTIST Ariana Grande Ed Sheeran Kendrick Lamar Miley...”


"Global iconu2 - winner"
"Similarly, Louis Tomlinson has been voted by the fans for the best British and Irish bill."
"In the best U.S. bill voting category, the wild card nominee fifth harmony was chosen by fans through social voting."
“… Region... "
"2017 MTV Maltese Island 2017 MTV Maltese island live broadcast champion foo fighters live from Barcelona Spain 2017 best local performance Bruno Mars American Hybrid British Ireland Drake Canada Justin Bieber Canada and kigo Norway were nominated in their respective homes..."
"Bellion Julia Michaels kacy Hill Khalid Kyle Noah Cyrus Petite Meller rag n bone man SZA the head and the heart best world stage Steve Aoki live from MTV Maltese 2016 kings of Leon live from Luxor theatre, Rotterdam, Netherlands 2016 tomorrow world 2017 Dnce live from..."
"Champion, royal blood killer, U2 best hip hop singer Drake Eminem award winner, Kendrick Lamar post Malone's best alternative in the future 30 seconds to Mars award winner's biggest fan Arianna grand Justin Bieber Katie Perry Sean Mendes Taylor Swift best promoter Hayley Stanfield award winner Jon... "
“Perry Bon Appetit ft Migos Kendrick Lamar Humble WINNER Kyle iSpy ft Lil Yachty Taylor Swift Look What You Maked Me Do BEST LIVE Bruno Mars Coldplay Ed Sheeran WINNER Eminem U2 BEST ELECTRONIC Calvin Harris David Guetta WINNER Major Lazer Martin Garrix The Chainsmokers BEST ROCK Coldplay WINNER Foo…”
"Cyrus Sean Mendes best look Dewar LiPA Harry style Rita Ola Taylor Swift Zahn best rookie Dewar LiPA best look Julia Michaels Khalid Kyle lager enborn best pop singer Camilla Cabello best look Demi Lovato Millie Cyrus Sean Mendes Taylor Swift best look Pinfu wrestler runs, Katie... "
"Best song" clean robber "rockabye ft Sean Paul Anne Marie DJ Khaled wild things ft Rihanna Bryson tiller ed Sheeran" your shape "Luis Fonsi Daddy Yankee desert Remix Ft Justin Bieber Shawn Mendes there nothing holding Mendes best artist Ariana Grande ed Sheeran Kendrick Lamar Miley..."



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...as well as your skin...”
“Physicians Formula Organic Wear Moisturizer Light to Natural 10 Amazon This moisturizer not only comes in a variety of colors in order to provide a nice lightweight base for your makeup but is also fortified with organic water and other natural ingredients in order to be kind to the earth...”
“This serum makes a smooth canvas of your skin, reducing the appearance of discoloration, pores, and fine lines.”
“Perricone MD No Foundation Foundation Serum, $60, AmazonThis serum is unique in that it acts and behaves as a foundation would, evening your complexion without actually being a foundation.”
“This product also doubles as a primer, so that means more bang for you buck — never a bad thing.”
“Tarte BB Tinted Treatment 12-Hour Primer Broad Spectrum SPF Sunscreen, $48, AmazonTarte is one of my favorite brands that delivers quality product and is also environmentally conscious, so I can't recommend this BB cream enough.”
“It's also extremely lightweight, making it easy to apply and delivering a simple, natural look.”
“In fact, I often use this alone without foundation, since it delivers a beautiful, even complexion.”
“This product completely changed my mind, though, since the fact that it's also a BB cream gave me a wonderful base to work with.”
“I mean, what do they actually do?”


“… And your skin... "
"Doctor's formula organic moisturizer is light to nature 10 Amazon's moisturizer not only has a variety of colors to provide a good lightweight basis for your make-up, but also adds organic water and other natural ingredients to be earth friendly..."
This essence can make your skin smooth and reduce the appearance of discoloration, pores and fine lines.
"Prricond no foundation serum, 60 dollars, Amazon this serum is unique, its behavior and as the basis of behavior, your skin color in the evening, is actually a basis."
"This product also doubles as a primer, so it means better for you - never a bad thing."
"Tarte BB tinted treatment 12 hour primer broad spectrum SPF sunscreen, 48 dollars, Amazon start is one of my favorite brands, providing high-quality products, but also pay attention to environmental protection, so I recommend this BB cream is too much."
"It's also very lightweight, easy to apply, simple and natural in appearance."
"In fact, I often use it alone because it provides a beautiful, even skin tone."
"However, this product completely changed my mind, because it is also BB cream, which gives me a good foundation."
"I mean, what are they doing?"



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Luka Sabbat Is Now Joining Kourtney Kardashian at Family Birthday Parties...”
“Leave it to the oldest Kardashian to set the ultimate co-parenting example.”
“They also received support from Khloe Kardashian, who tweeted that she was "beyond proud of all of them" and praised her sister and Disick for placing their "children before anything else."”
“According to Instagram Stories, and some eagle-eyed fans, the blended family enjoyed dinner together and a movie night on the beach in honor of Mason and Reign.”
“Looks like they all appear to be on good enough terms to enjoy an afternoon in the sun together.”
“Mexico just before Christmas...”
“And Kardashian who is 39 has been spending enough time with Luka Sabbat the 21 year old model influencer actor that he has leveled up to the attending family birthday parties stage and showed up to Mason s Fortnite themed birthday party before the Kardashian Disick family flew down to...”
“...smooth things over...”
“Kardashian wasn t always so approving of the fact that Disick the 35 year old father of her three young children has been dating Richie who turned 20 in August for over a year but it looks like all it takes is a little family vacation down to Mexico to...”
“After your grandma gives you a $3,000 Versace puffer coat for your 9th birthday, what else is there to do besides fly down to Cabo with your brother who shares the same birthday, your mom, your dad, and his girlfriend who is just barely a decade older than you?”


"Related report: Luca Sabat is now at a family birthday party with Courtney Kardashian..."
"Let the oldest Kardashian set an example of parenting together."
They were also supported by Khloe Kardashian, who tweeted that she was "extremely proud of all of them" and praised her sister and desik for putting their "children before everything else."
"According to instagram, the family had dinner with some sharp eyed fans and spent a movie night on the beach in memory of Mason and Rafe."
"It seems that they all get along well and can enjoy the sunshine together for an afternoon."
"Mexico before Christmas..."
"Kardashian, 39, spent enough time with Luca Sabat, a 21-year-old model who influenced the actors, has been promoted to the stage of family birthday parties and flew to He was at Mason's fortnite themed birthday party
“… Let's put things right... "
"Kardashian doesn't always agree with the fact that 35 year old Disick is the father of her three children. She has been dating rich, who turns 20 in August this year, for more than a year, but it seems that she only needs a small family holiday to go to Mexico..."
"On your ninth birthday, your grandmother gave you a $3000 Versace down jacket. What else can you do when your brother, your mother, your father and his girlfriend, who is less than 10 years older than you, fly to cabo?"



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here’s to plenty more to come!”
“I’m not saying the relationship took a while; I’m saying in my life, it took a while to find this.”The two have created a rock solid relationship, and we couldn’t be happier for them on their anniversary.”
“She’s even the voice of Pixar’s bumbling but lovable Dory.”
“She’s beloved by many for her warm, fun-loving style.”
“But the one person who matters most is her wife.”
“In a message she wrote to partner Portia de Rossi on their ninth wedding anniversary, she honored “wife” as her greatest title.”
“On the big day, she posted a photo of the two on the day they got married and captioned the snap, “@PortiadeRossi and I got married 9 years ago today.”
“Being her wife is the greatest thing I am.”How sweet!”
“De Rossi also shared a message to her love, writing, “We’ve been together so long that not only do we look like kids in this picture, but it was taken with a camera!”
“Happy 9th, Thing,” to accompany a photo taken on film.”


"There are many more!"
"I'm not saying it took a while; I'm saying it took a while to find it in my life." We can't be happier on their wedding anniversary because they have built a rock solid relationship
"She's even Pixar's clumsy but lovely voice of Dolly."
"She is loved by a lot of people for her warm and interesting style."
"But the most important thing is her wife."
On the ninth anniversary of their marriage, she wrote a letter to her partner, Portia de Rossi, in which she regarded "wife" as her greatest title
"On the big day, she posted a picture of their wedding day, and wrote under the title of the photo: @ portiade Rossi and I got married nine years ago today."
"Being her wife is my greatest strength." How sweet
De Rossi also sent a message to her lover, she wrote: "we've been together for too long. In this picture, we not only look like children, but also take pictures with cameras!"
"Happy 9, things", take a group photo with me



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...she said.”
“'Looks like someone got their lips done,' commented one follower.”
“Bella told InStyle earlier in the year that she had never had cosmetic facial enhancements and urged her heaters to 'scan' her face for themselves.”
“Her top lip is wayyyy too overdrawn!'”
“But whoever did her makeup f**ked her lips up!”
“Another however agreed they had been overlined but wasn't a fan of the final product: 'i love her..”
“Some defended the younger sister of Gigi Hadid and stated that the makeup artist had just been overdrawn her lips with lip liner'if you see close up pap pic of this looks its very noticeable the overlining,' wrote one.”
“All in the makeup?”
“Others however defended the younger sister of Gigi Hadid and stated that they had just been overdrawn with lip liner.”
“Fans went wild over her new plumped up lookAnd while Bella has continued to state that she hasn't had any fillers as she was too 'scared', some fans didn't seem to agree.”


“…… She said
"It looks like someone's got his lips fixed," commented one of his followers
"Bella told InStyle earlier this year that she had never had a facial and urged her heater to 'scan' her face."
"Her upper lip is exaggerated!"
"But the people who make her up have made her lips dirty!"
"However, another netizen also agrees that they have been over restricted, but they are not fans of the final product:" I love her... "
Some defended Gigi Hadid's sister, saying that the makeup artist had just painted her lips with lip liner, and if you see the texture of this picture, it looks obvious.
"All in make-up?"
Others, however, defended Gigi Hadid's sister, saying they had just been overdrawn by lip liner.
"Fans are crazy about her new plump look. Although Bella continues to say she doesn't have any stuffing because she's too 'scared', some fans seem to disagree."



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She has plenty of adventures ahead of her.”
“Knowing Paul, Story’s life will likely include many unbelievable events.”
“Because the story behind Aaron Paul’s daughter’s name is a doozy.”
“Paul and his wife Lauren welcomed their baby girl into the world in February of 2018.”
“Soon after, the actor announced that his daughter’s name is Story.”
“Paul shared the meaning behind his daughter’s name while appearing on The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon on Friday, March 16th.It turns out that the story behind Story’s name is pretty incredible.”
“It all goes back to Aaron and Lauren’s first date.”
“The two famously met at Coachella, then met up in Las Vegas for an official first date that’s like something you’d only see in a rom-com.”
““We did a dinner and a show and we drove back in this old car that I bought in Vegas,” the actor, who now stars in Hulu’s The Path, said.”
““That night we actually bought our unborn baby a leather jacket, and we went to a chapel to get married.” He paused for dramatic effect, then proceeded to explain, “But the chapel happened to be closed.”


"She has a lot of adventures ahead of her."
"Knowing Paul, the life of the story can include many incredible events."
"Because the story behind the name of Aaron Paul's daughter is ridiculous."
"Paul and his wife Lauren welcomed their baby girl in February 2018."
Soon after, the actor announced that his daughter's name was storry
On Friday, March 16, when Paul appeared in the tonight show starring Jimmy Fallon, he shared the meaning behind his daughter's name. Yes, it turns out that the story behind the name of the story is quite incredible. "
"It all goes back to Alan and Lauren's first date."
"The two met in cochella and went on a formal date in Las Vegas, just like you can only see on ROM com."
"We made a dinner and a show, and we came back in this old car I bought in Las Vegas," said the actor, who now plays in Hulu's the path
"That night, we bought a leather jacket for our unborn child, and we went to a chapel to get married." He pauses to see the dramatic effect, then goes on to explain, "but the chapel happens to be closed."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[5]A third film, titled A Christmas Prince: The Royal Baby was announced by Netflix on March 11, 2019 for a December 5, 2019 release.”
“It was released on Netflix on November 30, 2018.”
“Amber is reluctant to reveal the truth as it would deeply hurt Richard but decides to tell him during a walk.”
“After Richard leaves to check on the animals, Amber searches the late king's desk and discovers a hidden compartment holding documents proving that the Prince was secretly adopted; she hides the documents and takes them back to the palace.”
“Richard then shows Amber a mysterious poem written by his father, and the two almost kiss but are interrupted by the sound of neighing horses.”
“Richard takes Amber to his father's old hunting cabin, where he reveals that after he told his father he was going to renounce the throne they had a fight and that the king died soon after.”
“In pursuit of her story, Amber follows Richard on horseback through the woods, but her horse throws her off and she is nearly attacked by a wolf, only to be saved by the prince.”
“Emily learns the truth about Amber's identity but agrees to keep it secret so long as Amber writes a story that exposes Prince Richard for the good man that he is.”
“During this time Amber learns from Emily that Richard's scheming and jealous cousin Simon is next in line for the throne, which he sorely wants; Amber also encounters Richard's beautiful ex-girlfriend Sophia, who Richard suspects was only interested in him for his future title.”
“Amber becomes attracted to Richard after learning that contrary to rumors he is a compassionate and responsible man, though he is indeed reluctant to take the throne.”


"[5] the third film, Prince Christmas: Royal baby, was announced by Netflix on March 11, 2019 and will be released on December 5, 2019."
"It was released on Netflix on November 30, 2018."
"Amber didn't want to reveal the truth because it would hurt Richard deeply, but decided to tell him when he was walking."
After Richard left to check the animals, amber searched the late king's desk and found a hidden compartment with documents proving that the prince was secretly adopted. She hid the documents and took them back to the palace
Richard showed amber a mysterious poem written by his father. They were about to kiss, but they were interrupted by the hiss of the horse
Richard took amber to his father's former hunting house, where he told his father that he was going to give up the throne. They had a fight, and the king died soon after
In order to pursue her story, amber rode with Richard through the woods, but her horse abandoned her. She was almost attacked by the wolf, and was rescued by the prince
"Emily knew the truth of amber's identity, but agreed to keep it secret as long as amber wrote a story to expose Prince Richard as a good man."
"During this period, amber learned from Emily that Richard's scheming and jealous cousin Simon was the next heir to the throne, and he wanted the throne very much. Amber also met Richard's beautiful ex girlfriend Sophia, and Richard suspected that Sophia was only interested in his future title."
"Amber became interested in Richard after learning that he was a compassionate and responsible man, even though he did not want to succeed to the throne."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I am also so thankful to the fans that have supported me and continue to do so.”The Ranch is now streaming on Netflix.”
““As a result of ongoing discussions, Netflix and the producers have written Danny Masterson out of The Ranch,” Netflix told Us Weekly in a statement in December.”
“Danny Masterson was fired from Netflix’s The Ranch in December and on Friday, June 15, audiences got to see his final episode.”
“Netflix released the first 10 episodes of season 3, and Masterson’s Rooster made his final appearance in the tenth episode, entitled “Change.”In the beginning of the episode, Rooster gets into an argument with Mary’s (Megyn Price) boyfriend Nick and Nick threatens to kill Rooster.”
“However, it’s broken up by Ashton Kutcher’s Colt.”
“Rooster tells Heather (Kelli Goss) about Nick, who then relays the message to Mary – and Mary breaks up with Nick.”
“So, Rooster invites Mary to WrestleMania only to come home and see that Nick has, once again, broken into his place.”
“Nick gives Rooster a duffle bag full of his things and says, “You either take that bag and disappear, or you could just disappear.” He then pulls out a gun and threatens to kill Rooster’s entire family.”
“So, he leaves.”
“It was an exit that audiences knew was coming.”


"I'm also very grateful to the fans who supported me and continue to support me." Ranch is now playing on Netflix
Last December, Netflix told us weekly in a statement: "after constant discussion, Netflix and the producers have driven Denny Masterson out of the ranch."
Denny Masterson was fired from Netflix's ranch last December, and viewers saw his final episode on Friday, June 15
"Netflix released the first 10 episodes of the third season, and Masterson's Rooster made its final appearance in the tenth episode of change. At the beginning of this episode, the rooster and Mary (Megan price) boyfriend Nick had a dispute, Nick threatened to kill the rooster
"But it was broken by Ashton Kutcher's pony."
"Rooster told heather (Kelli Goss) about Nick, and Heather passed the news on to Mary, who broke up with Nick."
"So the rooster invited Mary to the wrestling competition, and when he got home, he found that Nick had broken into his house again."
Nick gave the rooster a bag full of things and said, "you can either take that bag and disappear, or you can disappear." Then he took out his gun and threatened to kill the rooster's family
"So, he left."
"The audience knows it's an exit."



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And I think there’s some truth to that.”
““And one of the journalists present said: It’s not stories plural, it’s all one big story.”
“His son seems made of sterner stuff, but that was still a lot to process for a child.”
“Allen made a living out of joking about his fears of the world beyond the urban sophistication of Manhattan and spent a lifetime in analysis discussing his neuroses.”
“In the meantime he’d been travelling with his mother to places like Sudan, Liberia and Angola on humanitarian missions.”
“At 16 he was enrolled at the prestigious Yale law school.”
“By the time he was 11 the young Farrow was at university studying for a degree, a double major in philosophy and biology.”
“One, named Tam, died of heart failure when Ronan was seven.”
“First off, his mother adopted five more children after the split with Allen, bringing her brood to 14, some of them disabled or suffering from serious illness.”
“These were, to say the least, formative experiences, but there were plenty more to come in Ronan’s childhood.”


"I think it makes sense."
"And a reporter on the scene said: This is not a story, but a big story."
"His son seems to be made up of more severe things, but for a child, it's still a very difficult thing to deal with."
"Alan makes a living by joking about his fear of the world beyond the complexity of Manhattan city and spending his whole life analyzing and discussing his neurosis."
"In the meantime, he has been on humanitarian missions with his mother to Sudan, Liberia and Angola."
"At the age of 16, he was admitted to Yale Law School."
At the age of 11, young Farrow was studying for a double degree in philosophy and biology at university
One of them, Tam, died of heart failure when Ronan was seven years old
"First of all, his mother adopted five more children after breaking up with Allen, bringing her children to 14, some of them disabled or seriously ill."
"These are formative experiences, to say the least, but there are more in Ronan's childhood."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Free CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”
“Stumbleupon Linkedin Comment James Franco s name had not been a part of those nominated for the upcoming 2018 Oscars but it appears as though it doesn t bother the actor much and he is in fact revealed to be...”
“...relieved at the Oscar snub...”
“The nominees for the upcoming 2018 Oscars were just recently revealed last Tuesday and James Franco's name was definitely not on the list.”
“But even with his failure to secure an Oscar nomination for his work on The Disaster Artist which previously earned him awards from the Golden Globes and the SAG Awards a source says that the 39 year old actor is...”
“...more concerned about the snub being correlated to the sexual harassment allegations he has been facing recently...”
“"James is disappointed in not getting an Oscar nomination," a source close to the actor says, "but also very understanding and somewhat relieved.”
“He doesn't want it to look like the snub is correlated with the allegations against him."”
“It should be remembered that on Jan. 11, 2018, five women had accused Franco of sexual misconduct in an article published by The Los Angeles Times.”


Submit
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get top news planned every day, as well as special offers!"
"It happened that LinkedIn commented that James Franco's name is not part of the upcoming 2018 Oscar nomination, but it doesn't seem to cause too much trouble for the actor. In fact, he is..."
“…… I'm relieved that Oscar's indifference... "
"The nominations for the upcoming 2018 Oscars were just announced on Tuesday, and James Franco's name is definitely not on the list."
"But even if he didn't get an Oscar nomination, he worked as a disaster artist, and he previously won the Golden Globe and sag awards, a source said, the 39 year old actor is..."
“…… What's more, the sexual harassment charges he recently faced are related to indifference... "
"James is disappointed that he didn't get the Oscar nomination," a source close to the actor said, "but he also understands and feels a little relieved."
"He doesn't want people to feel that the cold shoulder has something to do with the charges against him."
"It should be remembered that on January 11, 2018, five women accused Franco of sexual misconduct in an article published in the Los Angeles Times."



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"Yes!"”
“He and Ashley Ashley for several months earlier this year after they connected onBachelor Winter Games.”
“Embed Code Restart Why Ashley Iaconetti and Jared Haibon Say They're Different From Every Other Bachelor Couple (Exclusive)Watching it all go down was Kevin, who called it a "slap in the face" after their breakup in March.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Why Ashley Iaconetti and Jared Haibon Say They're Different From Every Other Bachelor Couple (Exclusive) This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“"You're my soulmate and I love you."”
“...she screamed, calling the stunning sparkler "perfect."”
“"So, Ashley, will you marry me?"”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Yes!"
"Earlier this year, he was in touch with Ashley Ashley at the winter games for months."
"Why do Ashley iaconetti and Jared haibon say they're different from other single couples (exclusive) it's Kevin who watched all this fail, calling it a slap in the face after he broke up in March."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Why Ashley iaconetti and Jared haibon say they are different from other single couples (exclusive) this video is not available because we can't load sponsor information."
"You are my soul mate, and I love you."
“…… She screamed, calling the amazing spark "perfect."
"So, Ashley, will you marry me?"



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I was pretty much textbook for all first trimester symptoms, but after battling endometriosis for many years, we are just so beyond thankful to have the chance to become parents.””
““Every time I see this perfect little angel baby, she reminds me of the love I have for her daddy and this brand new love I now have for her,” she shares.”
““She’s the most gorgeous baby ever,” Angela recalls about seeing MacKenlee for the first time.”
“...operating room because it all feels so high stakes surgical but the nervousness fell away when he saw her and heard her cry for the first time Upon meeting their baby girl it was love at first sight for the couple...”
“Our doctor made our gentle cesarean so special by allowing us to play our own music in the operating room letting us witness her being born and giving me the privilege of skin to skin as soon as she was born Matt admits that he was nervous being in the...”
“She was on her way,” Angela shares.”
““We headed to the hospital thinking it was probably false labor — nope.”
“The couple had scheduled a Cesarean section, but little MacKenlee “had other plans of her own” when Angela woke up in labor a week early.”
““As a dad, some of my most special moments so far are when she just lays her little body on my chest and falls asleep.”For Angela, bonding with MacKenlee through nursing has been one of the most amazing moments for the new mom.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"I'm a textbook for almost all the symptoms of early pregnancy, but after years of fighting endometriosis, we're very grateful for the opportunity to be parents."
"Every time I see this perfect little angel baby, she reminds me of my love for her father and my new love for her now," she shared
"She's the most beautiful baby ever," Angela recalled meeting McKinley for the first time
“…… Operating room, because all this makes people feel very nervous, but when he saw her and heard her crying when she first saw their baby girl, the tension disappeared. The couple fell in love at first sight... "
"Our doctor made our mild caesarean section so special. He allowed us to play our own music in the operating room, let us witness her birth, and let me have the right to skin to skin contact after she was born. Matt admitted that he was very nervous in the operating room..."
"She's on the way," Angela said
"We went to the hospital and thought it might be a fake birth - No."
"The couple had planned a caesarean section, but when Angela woke up a week earlier to give birth, McKinley" had a plan of her own. "
"As a father, my most special moment so far is when she put her little body on my chest and fell asleep." For Angela, connecting with McKinley through nursing is one of the most amazing moments for a new mom
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Because it is okay,” and, thanks in part to Ellen, that became a little more true in Hollywood.”
“In an interview with Oprah after the coming out aired, the comedian said she did so “because it’s okay.”
“DeGeneres even explains that the coming-out episode was titled “The Puppy Episode” because “’Ellen Throws Her Career Away’ seemed a little too on the nose.” Actually, that’s not the real reason for the “Puppy Episode” name, but you can see Ellen’s explanation for it below.”
“LGBT issues...”
“To celebrate the 20th anniversary of that historic television moment DeGeneres sat down with Oprah Winfrey Laura Dern and cast members from the show to discuss her choice to come out publicly the backlash she experienced after and the impact that her decision had on the pop culture conversation around...”
“Photo: The Ellen ShowOn April 30, 1997, Ellen DeGeneres came out on her eponymous sitcom, Ellen.”
“Oprah and Laura Dern with Ellen DeGeneres.”


"Because it doesn't matter," and, thanks to Allen, it's more real in Hollywood
In an interview with Oprah after the show, the comedian said she did it "because it doesn't matter."
DeGeneres even explained that the upcoming episode was named "dog episode" because "Alan gave up her career" seems a little too confusing. "In fact, that's not the real reason for the dog episode name, but you can see Allen's explanation below."
"LGBT issues..."
"To celebrate the 20th anniversary of that historic TV moment, DeGeneres sat down with Oprah Winfrey Lara Dean and the crew to discuss her choice of public appearance, the rebound she experienced, and the impact of her decision on the dialogue of pop culture around her..."
Photo: on April 30, 1997, Ellen DeGeneres plays in the sitcom of the same name "Ellen"
"Oprah and Laura Dean and Alan DeGeneres."



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“United in our sadness, we are equally determined, without fear or favor, to support all those rebuilding lives so horribly affected by injury and loss.”Crowds caught glimpses of Queen Elizabeth and Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh, waving from the balcony.”
“Put to the test, the United Kingdom has been resolute in the face of adversity.”
“This year, however, it is difficult to escape a very sombre national mood.”
“She also released a poignant statement via the Royal Family's official Twitter account: “Today is traditionally a day of celebration.”
“This year, though, the tone was a little different: Queen Elizabeth began the day with a moment of silence acknowledging the recent terror attacks in Manchester and London.”
“Ah, to be queen.”
“But royals gotta royal, and as it turns out, there's a good reason for celebrating her birthday twice: The public-facing, formal festivities for a monarch's birthday are always held in the summer because the weather is more likely to be nice.”
“It comes almost two months after the monarch's actual birthday on April 21, which the family celebrates privately.”
“Queen Elizabeth II celebrated her ninety-first birthday again on Saturday, when the royal family gathered at Buckingham Palace to mark the occasion with the annual—and extremely festive—Trooping the Color parade.”


"We are united in grief, free from fear and grace, and we are equally determined to support all those who rebuild lives that have been seriously affected by the damage and loss." The crowd glimpsed Queen Elizabeth and Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh, waving from the balcony
"What has been tested is Britain's determination in adversity."
"This year, however, it's hard to get rid of a very gloomy national mood."
She also issued a poignant statement through the royal family's official twitter account: "today is traditionally a day of celebration."
"This year, however, the tone is a bit different: Queen Elizabeth began the day with a moment of silence, acknowledging the recent terrorist attacks in Manchester and London."
"Ah, be queen."
"But members of the royal family must be members of the royal family, and it turns out that there is a good reason to celebrate her two birthdays: official celebrations of the monarch's birthday for the public are always held in summer, because the weather is more likely to be good."
"It's April 21, the king's real birthday, and nearly two months later, the family celebrated it privately."
On Saturday, Queen Elizabeth II celebrated her 91st birthday again. Members of the royal family gathered at Buckingham Palace to celebrate her 91st birthday with an annual grand parade



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“As we laid behind equipment onstage with some of our road family, bullets flying past... all I could think was 'I never even got to hold my baby.'"”
“Brittany shared a photo of the two near the location of the attack, and reflected on the couple's day meeting with the survivors of the shooting.”
“"Feels surreal being back in Vegas today," she wrote in the caption.”
“"Visiting some of the strongest people we have ever met... fighting the toughest battle of them all... for their lives."”
“"You have helped us try to begin to start the healing process by seeing the strength each one of you have," she continued.”
“"Thank you for today.”
“We will never forget.”
“...vegasstrong RELATED Jason Aldean Katy Perry Keith Urban and More Stars Inspire With These Heartwarming Moments The wife of the country star who is pregnant with the couple s first child opened up last week about the terrifying incident and the moment the gunman opened fire during Aldean s performance...”
“...at the Route 91 Harvest Country Music Festival...”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"When we put down the equipment on the stage with some road families, bullets flew by... All I can think of is' I didn't even hold my baby. '
Brittany shared a photo of the two men near the site of the attack and recalled the days when the couple met with shooting survivors
"It's surreal to be back in Vegas today," she wrote in the title
"Visit some of the strongest people we've ever met... In the hardest fight... For their lives. "
"You have helped us start the healing process by seeing the power of each of you," she continued
"Thank you today."
"We'll never forget."
“…… Jason aldian Katie Perry Keith Urban and more stars related to Vegas strong inspired people with these warm moments. The wife of the country star with the couple's first child disclosed the terrible incident last week and the moment when the shooter shot in aldian's performance... "
“… At the road 91 harvest Country Music Festival



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““There is no timeline for grief or for when God moves in your life in undeniable ways,” she said after her wedding, adding that Capaci “came along EXACTLY when God knew I needed him.””
“Image zoom Credit: Tiffany Thornton/InstagramThornton previously faced criticism for her decision to remarry less than two years after Carney’s death.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Disney Alum Tiffany Thornton Defends Decision to Remarry 2 Years After Husband’s Death“For this child I have prayed, and the Lord has granted the desires of my heart,” the former Sonny with a Chance star captioned her baby news, quoting 1 Samuel 1:27.”
“He was 35.”
“Thornton’s pregnancy comes over two years since the father of her two sons and first husband Christopher Carney died in a tragic car crash in Arkansas in December 2015.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“The soon-to-be mother of three shared the baby news on Instagram Wednesday with an adorable photo of her two kids holding up a sign that read, “New best friend coming Nov. 2018,” on top of a patterned DockATot baby lounger.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Thornton is already mom to two sons from a previous relationship: Kenneth James, 5, and Bentley Cash, 4.”


"There's no timetable for sadness, or God coming into your life in an undeniable way," she said after the wedding She added that cappucci "came just when God knew I needed him."
"Credit for image zooming: Tiffany Thornton / instagram Thornton has been criticized for his decision to remarry less than two years after Carney's death."
"Related video: Disney alumni Tiffany Thornton defends her husband's death after two years of remarriage." for the sake of this child, I pray that God has approved my heart's wish, "former Sonny and opportunity star headline her baby news, quoting Samuel 1:27
"He was 35."
"More than two years before Thornton became pregnant, the father of her two sons and her first husband, Christopher Carney, died in a tragic car accident in Arkansas in December 2015."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"The soon to be mother of three shared baby news on instagram on Wednesday, with her two children holding a sign saying" new best friend will arrive in November 2018 "and a patterned dockatot baby recliner on it."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Thornton is already the mother of two sons, Kenneth James, 5, and Bentley cash, 4."



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And check out highlights from the big show:”
“Chrissy Metz WINNER Daniel Kaluuya Issa Rae Riz Ahmed Yara Shahidi Best Duo Adam Levine Blake Shelton The Voice Daniel Kaluuya Lil Rel Howery Get Out Brian Tyree Henry Lakeith Stanfield Atlanta WINNER Hugh Jackman Dafne Keen Logan Josh Gad Luke Evans Beauty and the Beast Martha Stewart Snoop Dogg...”
“But, more than an awards show, the night proved to be above all a celebration of diversity.”
“Beauty and the Beast took home two of the biggest honors — a testament, said Emma Watson, to the public's love of the film's fearless female protagonist.”
“Daniel Kaluuya won a Golden Popcorn for his performance in the harrowing Get Out, and the awards for Show of the Year and Best Actor in a Show went to Netflix's Stranger Things and the series' Millie Bobbie Brown, respectively.”
“One of the most tender moments of the evening was when the cast of the Fast & Furious franchise accepted the coveted Generation Award, thanking fans for supporting their motley crew for well over a decade.”
“And without further ado here are all the big winners of the night Movie of the Year WINNER Beauty and the Beast Get Out Logan Rogue One A Star Wars Story The Edge of Seventeen Best Actor in a Movie Daniel Kaluuya Get Out WINNER Emma Watson Beauty and the...”
“Beast Hailee Steinfeld The Edge of Seventeen Hugh Jackman Logan James McAvoy Split Taraji P Henson Hidden Figures Show of the Year Atlanta Game of Thrones Insecure Pretty Little Liars WINNER Stranger Things This Is Us Best Actor in a Show Donald Glover Atlanta Emilia Clarke Game of Thrones Gina...”
“Rodriguez Jane the Virgin Jeffrey Dean Morgan The Walking Dead Mandy Moore This Is Us WINNER Millie Bobby Brown Stranger Things Best Fight Against the System Get Out WINNER Hidden Figures Loving Luke Cage Mr...”
“Robot Tearjerker Game of Thrones Hodor s death Grey s Anatomy Meredith tells her children about Derek s death Me Before You Will tells Louisa he can t stay with her Moonlight Paula tells Chiron that she loves him WINNER This Is Us Jack and Randall at karate Next Generation...”


"And see the highlights of large-scale exhibitions:
"Chris Metz best combination award winner Daniel karuya isa ray Ritz Ahmed Yarra shahidi best combination Adam Levin black Sheldon dubbing Daniel karuya Lear ray howry out Brian Terry Henry lekeith Stanfield Atlanta champion Hugh Jackman Dafen Keane Logan Josh gard Lew Mark Evans, the beauty and the beast, Martha Stewart Snoop Dogg... "
"But it turns out that this evening is not just an award ceremony, it's more about celebrating diversity."
Emma Watson said beauty and the beast won two of the biggest honors - a posthumous letter dedicated to the public's love for the fearless heroine in the film
"Daniel karuya won a golden popcorn for his performance in" tragic out ", and the best show of the year and best actor awards went to Netflix's" strange things "and" Millie Bob Brown "respectively
"One of the most tender moments of the night was that the cast of the" fast and angry "series received a coveted generation award, thanking fans for their support for their variegated cast for more than a decade."
"There's no doubt that this is all the big winners of the night movie of the year, winner beauty and beast out Logan hooligan a star wars story 17 best actor edge Daniel karuya out winner Emma Watson beauty and
"Haley Stanfield, the beast, 17-year-old edge Hugh Jackman Logan James McAvoy splits up taraji P. Henson's character of the year" game of power "unsafe little liar winner stranger's business, this is the best actor in the United States Donald Glover, Emily Clark of Atlanta" game of power "Gina..."
"Rodriguez Jane Jeffrey Dean Morgan walking corpse Mandy Moore this is a stranger thing for American champion Millie Bob Brown best confrontation system winner hidden character Mr. Luke cage..."
"Robot lacrimator power game hodol's death Gray's anatomy Meredith told her child Derek's death before I, you will tell Louisa that he can't and her moonlight Paula told Karen that she loves him to win, this is us Jack and Randall in karate next generation..."



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But hey, she’s marrying the prince of Britain — how exciting for her.””
“Life as she knows it is gone.”
““It’s such a transition in her life, and it’s such a huge thing to take on.”
““I feel sorry for her,” Smith said during a talk at the 92nd Street Y in New York City.”
“...sorry for Markle as she will be forced to adhere to tradition and royal custom something his The Crown character Prince Philip was familiar with as he struggled with the same transition Markle is about to confront when he married Queen Elizabeth II played by Foy...”
“She s an actress so that s great she added before Smith jokingly argued Well she s not anymore her life is over RELATED VIDEO The Crown s Matt Smith on Meghan Markle s Transition into Royalty I Feel Sorry for Her Earlier this month Smith expressed that he feels...”
““You love Selena Gomez,” Foy, 33, quipped before Smith double-downed on his decision saying, “She’s playing Meghan Markle!”Image zoomImage zoom Credit: Tommaso Boddi/WireImage; Robert “We love it that they’re getting married, it’s amazing,” Foy told host Andy Cohen.”
“Selena Gomez!” said Smith, who was a guest with his costar Claire Foy.”
“Who’s the singer who goes out with Justin Bieber?”
““Who’s that singer?”


"But, hey, she's going to marry the prince of England - it's exciting for her."
"The life she knew was gone forever."
"It's a turning point in her life and a big event."
"I feel sorry for her," Smith said in a conversation on 92nd street in New York City
“… Sorry, Marcel, because she will be forced to adhere to tradition and royal customs, which is familiar to his crown prince, Prince Philip, because when he married queen Elizabeth II, played by foy, Marcel was facing the same transformation... "
"She's an actress, so it's good that she joked in Smith that she's no longer her life is over correlated with the video crown of Matt Smith on Megan markel's transition to the royal family. I'm sorry for her. Smith said that he felt..."
"You love Serena Gomez," said foy, 33, before Smith took his decision for granted. "She's playing Megan markel! "We love that they're getting married. It's great," foy told host Andy Cohen
"Selena Gomez! "Smith said he was a guest of his partner, Claire foy."
"Who's the singer that's dating Justin Bieber?"
"Who is that singer?"



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“"Hot.”
“It was just a polaroid of himself, with the caption "hooray romano."”
“And it was enough for his fiancée Ariana Grande for life.”
“Grande commented twice under the photo, writing "where the mixtape" and then "this is sick and ur page looks cool never post again."”
“InstagramOf course she's just joking as they did when they were posting Instagrams regularly and commenting on the other's every photo in the summer.”
“The two chose to take a social media break in late July because of the negative comments the couple was receiving.”
“Davidson didn't only post on his page yesterday, either.”
“On Grande's page, Davidson liked her two most recent Instagrams and posted his own comment on her latest photo of herself.”
“He made it clear then that his return to the platform was very temporary and hey, belated like to all the photos Grande posted that he missed.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Hot."
"It's just a Polaroid of his own. It says" long live Romano. "
"It's enough for his fiancee Ariana grand for a lifetime."
Grande commented twice under the photo, wrote "where's the mix tape?" and then wrote "it's sick, your page looks cool, and it won't be posted again."
"Instagram of course, she's just joking, just like they often post instagram and comment on each other's summer photos."
"They chose to rest on social media in late July because the couple received negative comments."
"Davidson didn't post on his website just yesterday."
"On Grand's website, Davidson likes her two recent instagrams and comments on her latest photos."
"He made it clear at the time that his return to the platform was very short, hey, late, just like all the photos he missed released by grand."



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You never know.'”
“'I'm just doing the best that I can, trying not to screw him up for life.”
“'Having a kid at 40 years old is much different than having one at 22, you know, so I'm a little more mature than I was then.”
“He admitted his wife of eight years 'is definitely more evolved than I am, and more patient,'he dished.”
“Earlier this week, Transformers star Josh told Ellen DeGeneres he is the far more patient of the two parents.”
“...with a matching mesh jacket and flats Adorable Axl too wore black jeans and boots but bucked the trend with a cute denim jacket...”
“As the family headed back to their car the adorable fellah grabbed his princess dressed pal and gave her a squeeze Proud mama His 42 year old mother meanwhile beamed with pride as she watched over him Lovely lady The singer looked sexy in all black jeans and a top...”
“Bye!”
“Josh, 44, matched her colors, wearing flat soles, socks, shorts, T-shirt, baseball cap and jacket.”
“The singer looked sexy in all black jeans and a top, with a matching mesh jacket and flats.”


"You'll never know."
"I just try my best not to screw him up."
"Having a baby at 40 is very different from having a baby at 22, you know, so I'm a little more mature than I was then."
"He admitted that his wife, who has been married for eight years," is definitely more mature and patient than I am, "he said
"Earlier this week, transformers star Josh told Alan DeGeneres that he was the more tolerant of the parents."
“… Paired with a mesh jacket and flat shoes, the cute Axl is also wearing black jeans and boots, but the opposite of the trend is a cute denim jacket... "
"When the family came back to the car, the lovely young man grabbed her friend in Princess Costume and gave her a proud mother. His 42 year old mother looked at him and laughed with pride. Lovely lady, the singer looked very sexy in black jeans and top..."
"Goodbye!"
Josh, 44, wore flat shoes, socks, shorts, a T-shirt, a baseball cap and a jacket to match her complexion
The singer looks sexy in all black jeans and top with a mesh jacket and flat shoes



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here’s McGraw and Hill performing their song “Break First” together on “The Tonight Show”:[H/t Eonline]”
“As he explained to Fallon:“We’re doing a barbecue, so I’m in the kitchen, and I forget that he’s coming.”
“In fact, he kind of forgot it was happening.”
“Husband-and-wife country music stars Tim McGraw and Faith Hill sat down with Jimmy Fallon and shared the hilarious story of how McGraw wound up meeting his daughter Gracie’s boyfriend.”
“And he couldn’t have planned it better.”
““I was on the road working,” the singer told the late-night host.”
““They gave me a call and they said, ‘You know, Gracie’s going out on a date.”
“Do you mind if she goes before you meet the guy?”
“'”McGraw joked that he’d already had the Secret Service check out the young man and everything was fine for Gracie go on the date.”
“But once McGraw was back in town the next day, he did want Gracie’s date to stop by just to meet him in person.”


"This is McGraw and Hill's song" break one "on the tonight show: [H / T Eonline]"
"We were having a barbecue, so I was in the kitchen and I forgot he was coming," he explained to Fallon
"In fact, he kind of forgot what happened."
"Couple country music stars Tim McGraw and Faith Hill sat down with Jimmy Fallon to share the funny story of how McGraw finally met his daughter Gracie's boyfriend."
"He couldn't have planned better."
"I work on the road," the singer told the late night host
"They called me and said," you know, Gracie's going out on a date. "
"Do you mind if she leaves before you see that man?"
"McGraw joked that he had the secret service check on the young man and that Gracie was fine on the date."
"But as soon as McGraw returned to town the next day, he did want Gracie's date to visit him, just to see him in person."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“— Cyrus to Liam [src] ””
“He is portrayed by actor Jake Maskall.”
“James Holloway fling Duchess Of Essex ex wife rape mother of his son fling Veruca Popperwell Duchess Of Essex ex wife Allies Liam Henstridge Helena Henstridge Eleanor Henstridge Jasper Frost James Hill Family son with Prudence Penelope Henstridge daughter with Veruca Maribel Henstridge daughter with Veruca The Queen Mother mother...”
“Simon Henstridge older brother Helena Henstridge sister in law Robert Henstridge nephew Wilhelmina Henstridge nephew s wife Liam Henstridge nephew Eleanor Henstridge niece Simon Henstridge II son with Prudence daughter with Veruca daughter with Veruca The Queen Mother mother older wife nephew niece Series Portrayed by Jake Maskall First seen...”
“Stand and Unfold Yourself People are at their best or worst when they have an opportunity to touch greatness...”
“I should know – I've been both.”
“— Cyrus to Liam [src] ”Prince Cyrus Henstridge is a character in the E!”
“...drama soap The Royals.”
“He is the primary antagonist in season 1.”
“He was temporarily the King of England after the death of his older brother, the late King Simon.”


"- Cyrus said to Liam [SRC]"
"He's played by actor Jack maskar."
"The ex-wife of the Duchess of James Holloway Flynn Essex raped his son's mother Flynn veruca popperville, the daughter of the former ally Liam henstridge, Helena henstridge, Eleanor henstridge, the son of Jasper frost James Hill's family, prudence Penelope henstridge Veruca queen mother, daughter of Lynn veruca Maribel henstridge... "
Simon henstridge brother Helena henstridge sister-in-law Robert henstridge nephew William Mina henstridge nephew's wife Liam henstridge nephew Eleanor henstridge nephew Simon henstridge II son and prudence daughter and veruka daughter and veruka mother's eldest wife nephew niece series by Jack muska First of all, I saw... "
"Stand up and show yourself. When people have the opportunity to be great, they are in the best or the worst state..."
"I should know - I've been to both."
"Cyrus said to Liam," Prince Cyrus henstridge is "E!"
"Royal family"
"He was the main opponent in the first season."
After the death of his brother Simon, the late king, he became king of England temporarily



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us here!”
“HollywoodLifers, are you excited for Kelly and Ryan’s Game of Thrones costumes?”
“We look forward to seeing them in all their Game of Thrones glory this Halloween!”
“Although there’s been reports of feuding between Kelly and Ryan, the talented stars have put those rumors to rest and always seem to be having a great time on air together.”
“She previously modeled the hilarious hairy chest swimsuit on the show and it caused some very funny headlines.”
“It doesn’t have to be Halloween for Kelly to get dressed up and get an audience laughing.”
“Although it’s Ryan’s first year as co-host and his first Halloween episode, he appears to be settling in well and we have no doubt he’ll be equally as entertaining!”
“Her antics in the costumes have been a hit and help to make each year memorable for the show.”
“Kelly has impressed with her various costumes in past years and has dressed up as a wide range of characters from Donald Trump to Kim Kardashian.”
“SEE KELLY’S CRAZY HALLOWEEN COSTUMES THROUGHOUT THE YEARS HERE!”


"Tell us!"
"Hollywood actresses, are you excited about Kelly and Ryan's power game costume?"
"We're looking forward to seeing them in all the power games to honor this Halloween!"
"Although there are reports of disagreements between Kelly and Ryan, the talented stars have calmed down these rumors and always seem to have a good time together."
"She imitated the funny hairy breasted swimsuit on the show before, which caused some very funny headlines."
"Kelly doesn't have to dress up for Halloween to make the audience laugh."
"Although this is Ryan's first year as co host and his first Halloween episode, he seems to be well adapted, we have no doubt that he will have the same entertainment!"
"Her antics in costumes are very popular and help make every year's performance memorable."
"Kelly's clothes over the past few years have been impressive. From Donald Trump to Kim Kardashian, she's dressed up in all kinds of roles."
"Look at Kelly's crazy Halloween costumes over the years



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, there is absolutely no truth that the casting of the show is racially motivated, that the houseguests’ behavior is predetermined or that the outcome is controlled in any way.”Scroll through the gallery below for some of the biggest controversies from the show.”
“We share some of the viewers’ concerns about inappropriate behavior and offensive comments, and producers have addressed specific incidents with the houseguests involved.”
“Since the show’s U.S. debut in 2000, the reality series has made headlines for an array of topics.”
“With each season, the disputes behind the scenes only grow.”
“Over the past 20 years, the show has been criticized for racism and discrimination, beginning with an incident that occurred in season 15.”
“In 2013 Aaryn Gries referred to Asian people as squinty eyed called her Black roommate Candice Stewart Aunt Jemima and asked her Korean housemate Helen Kim to go make some rice GinaMarie Zimmerman and Spencer Clawson were also accused of insensitive comments during the season so much so that host...”
“Julie Chen spoke about it on The Talk...”
““It stung,” the host said at the time.”
““I took it personally.”
“The really sad part was it took me back to the ’70s when I was growing up in Queens, when I was 7, being bullied and being called a chink … the year is 2013!”


"However, it is absolutely not true that the cast of the show is racially motivated, that the tenant's behavior is predetermined, or that the result is controlled in any way." Browse the gallery below to see some of the biggest controversies in the play
"Like the audience, we are worried about inappropriate behavior and offensive comments, and the producers have discussed specific events with the relevant tenants."
"Since its premiere in the United States in 2000, the reality TV series has made headlines with a series of topics."
"Every season, the disputes behind the scenes will only intensify."
"For the past 20 years, the show has been criticized for racism and discrimination, starting with an event in season 15."
"In 2013, Aryn Gries said that Asians narrowed their eyes to call her black roommate, aunt Candice Stewart, Jemima, and asked her Korean roommate, Helen Kim, to make some rice. Gina Marie Zimmerman and Spencer Clawson were also accused of making insensitive comments during this season, so that the moderator......"
"Julie Chen talked about it in the conversation..."
"It hurts," the host said at the time
"I said it face to face."
"The saddest thing is that I went back to the 1970s, when I grew up in Queens, when I was seven years old, bullied and called Chinaman This year is 2013! "



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can recreate doll makeup like featured or go for even a more a scarier look with fake blood and colored contact lenses.”
“This next couple have created an awesome costume where one is the dummy and the other is the ventriloquist.”
“Create outfits similar to these, or try your own stylish and spooky ideas.”
“This is such a fun idea since they have given the costumes a Halloween twist by adding fake blood.”
“These two have dressed up as one of the most iconic couples – Barbie and Ken.”
“Then this next costume idea is for you.”
“Barbie and Ken Couples Halloween CostumeAre you a Barbie girl, in a Barbie world?”
“2.”
“Recreate this look or create your own terrifying or nice clown costumes.”
“Costumes like these will be a hit at any party and you will look spooky together and apart.”


"You can recreate baby makeup like close-up, or use fake blood and color contact lenses to create a more frightening look."
"The next couple designed a great costume, one of which was a dummy and the other was a ventriloquist."
"Create clothes similar to these, or try your own fashions and weird ideas."
"It's an interesting idea because they added fake blood to their costumes."
"The two dressed up as one of the most representative couples - Barbie and Ken."
"Then the next fashion idea is for you."
"Barbie and Ken's Halloween costume are you Barbie girl, in Barbie world?"
“2.”
"Recreate the look, or create your own scary or beautiful clown costume."
"Clothes like this will be very popular at any party. It's scary when you're together and apart."



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“There will be 10 episodes in each season, which means we're already guaranteed 20 episodes of the show so far.”
“How many episodes will there be?”
“Who will play Sabrina on the show?”
“The CW, which is the same network that airs Riverdale, were previously attached to the project.”
“The Chilling Adventures of Sabrina will now air on Netflix.”
“Oct 26. pic.twitter.com/uLgXFMLX0t — Chilling Adventures of Sabrina (@sabrinanetflix) July 29, 2018What network will the show be on?”
“Time for CAOS.”
“Sabrina will drop on Netflix on Friday October 26th 2018 - just in time for Halloween weekend.”
“When will The Chilling Adventures Of Sabrina be released?”
“...pic.twitter.com/9n8cznpv2c — RobertoAguirreSacasa (@WriterRAS) April 4, 2018Here's everything you need to know about the new show, from the Netflix release date to who's playing who in the cast...”


"There will be 10 episodes per season, which means we have guaranteed 20 episodes so far."
"How many episodes will there be?"
"Who will play Sabrina on the show?"
"CW is the same network as Riverdale, which was previously associated with the project."
"Sabrina's creepy adventure will now be on Netflix."
"October 26. pic.twitter.com/uLgXFMLX0t -Sabrina Adventure (@ sabrinanetflix) on July 29, 2018, which network will the play be broadcast on? "
"It's Cao's time."
"Sabrina will be landing on Netflix on Friday, October 26, 2018, just in time for the Halloween weekend."
"When will Sabrina's gruesome Adventure Show?"
“... pic.twitter.com/9n8cznpv2c -Robertoaguinacasa (@ writerras) April 4, 2018 about the new show, everything you need to know, from the release date of Netflix to who plays who in the cast... "



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...checked out his beachfront surroundings...”
“Ready for some bikini fun!”
“And Tyga's rumored new love interest Jordan Ozuna has been sending temperatures soaring as she enjoys some fun in the sun.”
“The model, 24, shared an alluring snap of herself completely naked as she lounged on a romantic white bed at her resort, Azulik Tulum.”
“Scroll down for videoCheeky!”
“Tyga's rumored new love interest Jordan Ozuna has been sending temperatures soaring as she enjoys some fun in the sun in Tulum, Mexico'Sleepy baby j': The model captioned the seductive snap'Sleepy baby j,' she captioned the seductive snap.”
“It s not clear if Jordan and Tyga have met up in Tulum and Jordan responded to speculation she was even with the rapper in Mexico by posting on Twitter When you re actually on vaca with girlfriends and this happens As Jordan enjoys some time in her hotel Tyga...”
“...has been living it up with the boys...”
“The rapper has been ATV riding with his pals and soaking up the sun on the beach.”
“Jordan shared a snap of herself rocking a tiny crochet bikini last week as she packed for her trip to Mexico Just the boys As Jordan enjoys some time in her hotel Tyga has been living it up with the boys Contemplative He also shared an introspective snap of himself...”


“… He looked at his seaside environment... "
"Ready to play bikini!"
"And the temperature of tiga's legendary new lover, Jordan ozuna, keeps soaring while enjoying the sunshine."
The 24-year-old model took a stunning picture of herself naked as she strolled on a romantic white bed in the resort of azulik Tulum
"Scroll down to see the video, cheeky!"
"When Jordan ozuna, the legendary new lover of TEGA, enjoys the sunshine in Toulon, Mexico, the temperature keeps soaring. This is a film called" sleepy baby J ": the model adds the title" sleepy baby J "to the attractive snapshot, and she adds the title to the attractive snapshot."
"It's not clear whether Jordan and TEGA met in tulam. Jordan responded to her conjecture that she was even with a Mexican rapper. She tweeted that when you were really in VacA with your girlfriend, Jordan spent some time in TEGA Hotel..."
“… Living with children all the time... "
"Rap singers have been riding horses with their friends on ATV and basking in the sun on the beach."
"Last week, when Jordan was packing for a trip to Mexico, he shared a picture of himself shaking a small Crochet Bikini. The boys enjoyed a period of time in Jordan's hotel. TEGA had been meditating with the boys, and he also shared a picture of his own reflection..."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You have to protect your marriage.””
““It would be a betrayal.”
“The couple welcomed their first child together, a baby girl, according to multiple outlets.”
“Reps for the actors have not commented.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Disobedience actress, 48, revealed she was pregnant in an interview in April with The New York Times while promoting her film.”
““I’ll be showing soon,” she said, adding, “Daniel and I are so happy.”Continued Weisz, “We’re going to have a little human.”
“We can’t wait to meet him or her.”
“It’s all such a mystery.”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”


"You have to protect your marriage."
"It would be a betrayal."
"According to a number of media reports, the couple ushered in their first child, a baby girl."
"The actor's representative didn't comment."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 48 year old disobedient actress revealed in an interview with the New York Times in April that she was pregnant while promoting her film
"I'm going to show up soon," she said, adding, "Daniel and I are so happy." Weitz went on, "we're going to have a little human."
"We can't wait to see him or her."
"It's a mystery." Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs? "
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More from WWD.com:‘Wonder Woman’ Makes History at the Box OfficeWhy ‘Wonder Woman’ Has High-End and Mass-Market Product Appeal...”
““These collections celebrate her as an iconic superhero and empower fans of all kinds to be confident and strong.”Judging from Winfrey’s Instagram videos, this much is clear: She, too, seems to have fallen prey to the “Wonder Woman” mass-market bug.”
““Wonder Woman is a pioneer in many ways including being a fashion icon,” says Soo Koo, Warner Bros. Consumer Products’ chief creative officer.”
“Luxury brands such as Givenchy and Louis Vuitton along with mass-market retailers like Hot Topic and Kohl’s have all created products inspired by the 75-year-old character.”
“Starring Gal Gadot, the film has garnered both high-end and mass-market appeal.”
““Wonder Woman” raked in a whopping $223 million globally when it opened two weeks ago, making it the biggest opening for a film directed by a woman.”
“She then displays pairs of “Wonder Woman” flip-flops, capping off her video series with a shot of the chef preparing some salad.”
“She’s also wearing the signature wrist cuffs as she raves about themed popcorn buckets and cups.”
“By the second video, Winfrey had entered full fangirl mode, going so far as to place the “Wonder Woman” headpiece on her own head.”
““It’s ‘Wonder Woman’ day at my house,” she declared in the first, adding, “I’m having a party for 28 10-year-olds.” She proceeded to outfit a “Wonder Woman” cake with a topper featuring the superhero herself.”


"More from WWD.com Website ● the box office of wonder woman has made a history. Why does wonder woman have the attraction of high-end and mass market products... "
"These series celebrate her as an iconic superhero, making all kinds of fans confident and strong." From Winfrey's instagram video, it's clear that she also seems to be a victim of wonder woman's mass market eavesdropper
"Wonder woman is a pioneer in many ways, including becoming a fashion icon," said soo Koo, chief creative officer of Warner Bros. consumer products
"Luxury brands like Givenchy and Louis Vuitton, as well as mass market retailers like hot topic and Kohl's, have created products inspired by 75 year olds."
"The film, starring Gail gadote, has appeal in both the high end and the mass market."
When "Wonder Woman" was released two weeks ago, the global box office reached 223 million US dollars, becoming the largest box office of female directed films
Then she shows off a pair of wonder woman flip flops and ends her video series with a chef preparing a salad
"She's also wearing her signature wrist cuffs, trumpeting the theme of popcorn buckets and cups."
"By the time of the second video, Winfrey had entered the complete Fangirl mode, and even put the" Wonder Woman "headdress on her head."
"Today is my wonder woman day," she said in her first statement. "I'm going to have a party for 28 10-year-old children." She then put a hat on a wonder woman cake decorated with the superhero himself



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...gospel artist Tasha Cobbs Leonard Top social artist BTS Top touring artist U2 Chart achievement award Camila Cabello Icon award Janet Jackson...”
“...duo group Imagine Dragons Top R B artist Bruno Mars Top rap artist Kendrick Lamar Top country artist Chris Stapleton Top rock artist Imagine Dragons Top Latin artist Ozuna Top dance electronic artist The Chainsmokers Top Christian artist MercyMe Top...”
“...by Kendrick Lamar Top artist Ed Sheeran Top new artist Khalid Top female artist Taylor Swift Top male artist Ed Sheeran Top streaming songs artist Kendrick Lamar Top song sales artist Ed Sheeran Top radio songs artist Ed Sheeran Top...”
“Top Hot 100 song: "Despacito" by Luis Fonsi and Daddy Yankee featuring Justin BieberTop Billboard 200 album: "DAMN."”
“Ed Sheeran, who was not at the show, won big, in categories that included top artist and top male artist, while Janet Jackson won the icon award.”
“LAS VEGAS -- Here are the winners in the top categories at the 2018 Billboard Music Awards, held Sunday at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas.”


“… Evangelical artist Tasha cobs Leonard top social artist BTS top roving artist U2 list achievement award Camilla Cabello idol award Janet Jackson... "
“… Duet group imagine dragons top RB artist Bruno Mars top rap artist Kendrick Lamar top country artist Chris Stapleton top rock artist imagine dragons top Latin artist ozuna top dance electronics artist chainmokers top Christian artist mercyme top... "
“… By Kendrick Lamar top artist ed Sheeran top new artist Khalid top female artist Taylor Swift top male artist ed Sheeran top streaming music artist Kendrick Lamar top song sales artist ed Sheeran top radio song artist ed Sheeran top... "
Top 100 songs: "despacito" by Louis fonsey and Yankee dad on Justin biebertop's billboard 200 Album: "Damn it."
"Ed Sheeran didn't take part in the show. He won awards including top artists and top male artists, while Janet Jackson won the idol award."
"Las Vegas - here are the winners of the 2018 Billboard Music Awards at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas on Sunday."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Stoner, who discussed her fluid sexuality in a Teen Vogue essay published March 30, is set to appear alongside Brigitte Nielsen and Denise Richards in Adi Shankar’s Gods and Secrets, while Ryan isset to appear in the upcoming Netflix series Insatiable.”
“New Jersey while Sprouse currently stars on the hit CW drama Riverdale...”
“Season finale of my life aka disney high reunion celebrating Hayley Kiyoko Montgomery captioned the photo while per PEOPLE Lovato s since expired Instagram Story teased the gathering as a Disney Channel reunion Lovato wrapped the first leg of her Tell Me You Love Me World Tour Monday in Newark...”
“...actor Matthew Scott Montgomery, and Sprouse’s Zack & Cody costar Alyson Stoner.”
“Lovato and Sprouse posed for the shot next to Jessie‘s Debby Ryan, So Random!”
“Five network stars — including Sonny actress Demi Lovato and The Suite Life of Zack & Cody‘s Cole Sprouse — got together Wednesday night at Los Angeles bar No Vacancy to celebrate the release of fellow Disney Channel alum Hayley Kiyoko’s (Lemonade Mouth) new album Expectations.”
“Camp Rock type TV Show network Disney Channel genre MusicFamilyThe forecast is clear: It’s Sonny with a Chance of an adorable Disney Channel reunion.”


In an article in Teen Vogue magazine published on March 30, Stoner discusses her fluid sexual orientation. She will play ADI Shankar's "gods and secrets" with Brigitte Nielsen and Denise Richards, and Ryan isette will play the role of "God and secrets" Isset will play in the upcoming movie
"Riverdale, New Jersey's current hit CW TV series..."
"The last season of my life also known as Disney reunion celebrates Hayley Kiyoko Montgomery titled photos, while everyone Lovato s since expired instagram story teases Lovato packaging as Disney Channel reunites her first stop telling me you love me world tour Monday in Newark..."
“…… Actor Matthew Scott Montgomery, along with spruce's Zach and Cody, and Alison Stoner
"Lovato and sprout pose next to Jesse's Debby Ryan. It's too casual!"
"Five internet stars - including Sony actress Demi Lovato and Zach Cody's" Carnival Cole "Suite Life - gathered at the Los Angeles bar" no vacancy "on Wednesday night to celebrate the release of Disney Channel alumni Hayley Kiyoko's new album" expectations. "
"Summer Camp Rock and roll TV shows, network Disney Channel genre music family prediction is very clear: Sonny has a chance to reunite with the lovely Disney Channel."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Prodigy is survived by wife Ikesha Dudley, son T’Shaka, daughter Fahtasia, brother Greg, stepdaughter Kiejzonna and step-granddaughter Brooklyn Harris.”
“The “Quiet Storm” rapper performed his final concert at the Downtown Las Vegas Events Center on June 17, just three days before his death.”
“The stars in attendance included fellow Mobb Deep rapper Havoc, The Roots drummer Questlove, Fat Joe, 50 Cent and Remy Ma.”
“We would like to thank everyone for respecting the family’s privacy at this time.”A public memorial service was held for Prodigy at New York City’s Frank E. Campbell Funeral Chapel on June 29.”
“The exact causes of death have yet to be determined.”
“As most of his fans know, Prodigy battled the disease since birth.”
““Prodigy was hospitalized a few days ago in Vegas after a Mobb Deep performance for complications caused by a sickle cell anemia crisis.”
““It is with extreme sadness and disbelief that we confirm the death of our dear friend Albert Johnson, better known to millions of fans as Prodigy of legendary NY rap duo Mobb Deep,” a publicist for the hip-hop group confirmed in a statement to Rolling Stone at the time.”
“He died at the age of 42 on June 20 at a Las Vegas hospital, where he was being treated for complications from sickle cell anemia.”
“According to the outlet, the Mobb Deep rapper choked while eating an egg.”


The child prodigy's wife, ikesa Dudley, son t'shaka, daughter fahtasia, brother Greg, stepdaughter keizona and stepgranddaughter Brooklyn Harris survived
On June 17, the "quiet storm" rapper gave his last concert at the event center in downtown Las Vegas, just three days before his death
"The stars present included Mobb deep rapper havoc, roots drummer Questlove, Fat Joe, 50 cent and Remy ma."
"We want to thank you for respecting the privacy of this family at this time." On June 29, a public memorial service was held for the child prodigy at the Frank E. Campbell funeral chapel in New York City
"The exact cause of death remains to be determined."
"As most of his fans know, child prodigy has struggled with disease from birth."
"A few days ago, child prodigy performed mobu's in-depth performance in Vegas due to complications caused by the sickle cell anemia crisis, and then was hospitalized."
"With great sadness and disbelief, we confirm the death of our dear friend Albert Johnson, who is better known to millions of fans as the prodigy of New York legend rap group Mobb deep," a hip-hop public relations official confirmed in a statement to the rolling stone at the time
"He died on June 20 at a Las Vegas hospital at the age of 42, while he was being treated for complications of sickle cell anemia."
"According to media reports, the mobu deep rapper choked while eating an egg."



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's Personal At NewBeauty, we get the most trusted information from the beauty authority delivered right to your inbox...”
“At less than $5, it’s certainly worth a try.”
“Less is more.”Considering clogged pores are tough to combat, we can’t help but love that a celebrity-recommended a solution that doesn’t require a trip to the doctor.”
“I try to give the skin a break.”
“On days off, I use hardly anything.”
“I do a lot of steam on my skin.”
“She also advises allowing the skin to breathe: “Even on makeup days, I try go to light.”
“It’s awesome.”You May Also Like: These $5 Drugstore Products Are the Secret to Catherine Zeta-Jones’ Nude LipBut that’s not all Pinkett Smith recommends for keeping the skin blemish-free.”
““It is brilliant…it pulls all the stuff out, and it closes the pores as well.”
““It’s one of my favorite products,” the actress said.”


"Newbeauty is a private website. We get the most reliable information from beauty agencies and send it directly to your in box..."
"Less than five dollars, it's definitely worth a try."
"Less is more." Considering that clogged pores are hard to deal with, we can't help but like a celebrity who recommends a solution that doesn't require a doctor
"I try to give my skin a rest."
"When I'm resting, I don't use almost anything."
"There's a lot of steam on my skin."
She also recommends breathing through the skin: "even on makeup days, I try to lighten it a little."
"Great." You might like it: these $5 drugstore products are Catherine Zeta Jones's secret of bare lips, but that's not all pinkert Smith recommends to keep her skin flawless
"It's wonderful It can take everything out and plug the pores
"It's one of my favorite products," the actress said



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As we first reported, Tina's firstborn son, who was in the real estate business, died of a self-inflicted gunshot wound at his home in Studio City, CA on July 3, 2018.”
“She went on to say, "He was fifty-nine when he died so tragically, but he will always be my baby."”
“On Thursday, July 19, 2018, I said my final goodbye to my son, Craig Raymond Turner, when I gathered with family and friends to scatter his ashes off the coast of California."”
“The legendary singer posted this tweet early Friday morning and said, "My saddest moment as a mother.”
“'He Will Always Be My Baby'Tina Turner did what no parent should ever have to do ... bid a final goodbye to their child when she spread her son's ashes off the California coast.”


"As we first reported, Tina's eldest son in the real estate industry died of self injury on July 3, 2018 at her home in Studio City, California."
"He was 59 when he died, but he will always be my child," she added
"On Thursday, July 19, 2018, when I got together with my family and friends and dropped the ashes of my son Craig Raymond Turner on the California coast, I said my last goodbye to him."
The legendary singer posted the tweet on Friday morning, saying: "my saddest moment as a mother."
"He'll always be my child." Tina Turner did something that no parent should do... When she scattered her son's ashes on the California coast, she said her last goodbye to their children



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET Dec. 8 and Dec. 9, respectively.”
“So, let’s be very clear.”
“Beyoncé took a strong stance on Kaepernick’s actions to protest police brutality at the 2017 Sportsperson of the Year Awards Show in New York.”
“Kaepernick’s decision to remain seated while the national anthem played back in 2016 sparked similar protests by NFL players that continue to incite controversy in the present.”
““Thank you Colin Kaepernick.”
“Thank you for your selfless heart, and your conviction,” the “Lemonade” singer said in her presentation speech.”
““Thank you for your personal sacrifice.”
“Colin took action with no fear of consequence or repercussion only hope to change the world for the better.”
“To change perception, to change the way we treat each other, especially people of color.”“We’re still waiting for the world to catch up.”
“It’s been said that racism is so American, that when we protest racism, some assume we are protesting America.”


"On December 8 and 9, respectively."
"So let's be very clear."
"Beyonce took a tough stance on capernak's protest against police brutality at the 2017 athlete of the year award ceremony in New York."
"Capenick's decision to remain seated during the 2016 National Anthem replay has triggered similar protests from NFL players and is still controversial."
"Thank you, Colin capenick."
"Thank you for your selfless heart and your faith," the lemonade singer said in the speech
"Thank you for your personal sacrifice."
"Colin takes action, does not worry about the consequences or impact, only hopes to make the world a better place."
"Change our minds, change the way we treat each other, especially people of color." "We are still waiting for the world to catch up."
"Some people say that racism is so Americanized that when we protest against racism, some people think we are protesting against the United States."



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"But then he dropped what sounds like a legitimately great campaign slogan: "More poise and less noise."”
“"This isn't real," Johnson clarified, "Tom and I are only joking.”
“"I would get the minority vote because everyone just assumes I am what they are," Johnson agreed.”
“"I would get the senior vote because I fought in World War II in several films," Hanks joked.”
“"Their facetious plan sounds foolproof.”
“"The only thing the country agrees on anymore is pizza and us.”
“"America needs us," the likable pair joked.”
“"In order to secure his success, Johnson named Tom Hanks as his running mate.”
“Apparently a presidential campaign.Poking fun at his recent declarations that he was planning to run for president in 2020, The Rock claimed he was using this late-night platform to officially declare "I'm in.”
“Can you smell what the Rock is cooking?”


"But then he gave up one of the great campaign slogans that sounded legitimate:" more steady, less noise. "
"It's not true," Johnson clarified. "Tom and I were just kidding."
"I'll get the minority vote because everyone thinks I'm themselves," Johnson agreed
Hanks joked, "because I've been in World War II in several films, I'll get a premium ticket."
"Their funny plan sounds foolproof."
"The only thing the country agrees to is pizza and us."
"America needs us," the lovely couple joked
"To ensure his success, Johnson named Tom Hanks as his running mate."
"It's obviously a presidential campaign. When he recently announced his plan to run for president in 2020, rock music claimed that he used this late night platform to officially announce "I'm in"
"Can you smell what the stone is cooking?"



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Ty Burrell and Viola Davis also attended.”
“The two looked very alike as they posed away on the iceBeautiful family!”
“Give the kids everything they want and ask for.'”
“She added, 'But along the way, you have to find all the joy you can, especially during the holidays.”
“It’s not something that comes easy, so you have to work it out.'”
“I’m taking it as it comes.”
“'It’s all still up in the air.”
“'It’s definitely going to be a new year for us, new holiday for us, as a separated family,' said the 33-year-old star.”
“Wilkinson, 33, was a happy mom as she stepped out with son Hank Baskett IV, nine, and Alijah, fourWilkinson and Baskett, 36, share son Hank Baskett IV, 9, and daughter Alijah, 4.”
“Two cute: Kendra Wilkinson has a mini me daughter.”


"Tabriel and Viola Davis were also involved."
"They look like each other when they pose in a snowy home!"
"Give the children what they want and everything they want."
But in the process, she added, you have to find all the happiness you can find, especially during the holidays
"It's not easy, so you have to deal with it."
"I just let it be."
"It's all up in the air."
"For us, it's definitely a new year, a new festival, as a separate family," said the 33 year old star
Wilkinson, 33, is a happy mother. She went out with her 9-year-old son Hank Basquet IV, 36-year-old aria, 9-year-old son Hank Basquet IV and 4-year-old daughter aria
"Two cute: Kendra Wilkinson has a mini my daughter."



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I booked the tour for October so I could have at least four months to just really bond and see their fingers and s— like that,” he said.”
“I was like, ‘What the f— is going on here?’ One of the great memories.”Besides talking about his oldest daughter’s music skills, the Grammy Award winner said his family will be joining him on tour.”
““She’s 5, and she understands the concept of a hook.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Beyoncé Shares First Photo of Twins Sir and Rumi Carter“She kept doing that ‘boom shakalaka, boom shakalaka.’ I was like, ‘Oh, she understands the concept of a hook,'” he said.”
“Five minutes of her doing that.”He also touched on the hook that went viral after the song was released in early July.”
“Five minutes!”
““I was like, ‘Oh, s—.’ I haver [her full freestyle] on my phone.”
““She got the headphones and she climbed on the little stool, and then she just started rapping,” JAY-Z said.”
“He just came out, like, Sir.”Image zoom Credit: Beyoncé InstagramThe father of three also revealed how the couple’s firstborn, 5-year-old daughter Blue Ivy, ended up rapping a freestyle on his new album, 4:44, while they were in the recording studio together.”
“He carries himself like that.”


"I've ordered a tour in October so I can have at least four months to really get together and look at their fingers and S - like that," he said
"I thought," what's going on? In addition to talking about his eldest daughter's musical skills, the Grammy winner said his family would tour with him
"She's five years old, and she knows the concept of hooks."
"Related video: Beyonce shared the first picture of the twins, jazz and rummy Carter," she said all the time. "Bang, bang, I thought," Oh, she understands the concept of hooks, "he said
"The five minutes she did it." He also mentioned the hook that became popular after the song was released in early July
"Five minutes!"
"I said, 'Oh, s -' I have her freestyle on my cell phone."
"She took the headphones, climbed up the stool, and started rap," Jay-Z said
"He just came out, like, sir." Image zooming credit: Beyonce instagram's father of three also revealed that the couple's eldest son, five-year-old daughter blue ivy, ended their studio collaboration with freestyle rap on his new album 4:44
"He always does."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article originally appeared on Women's Health US”
“Lili's post is a reminder that acne is a fact of life for many of us—and it's nothing to be ashamed of.”
“The caption: “Tinder profile: Hi I'm Lili.”
“I'm 21, a Virgo, Cali-Girl  And I have cystic acne.”
“Hmu.”RELATED: Ruby Rose Opens Up About Battling Adult Acne In Emotional Instagram PostLili ReinhartHer condition, cystic acne, is the most severe form of acne, according to the Mayo Clinic.”
“It happens when oil and dead skin cells build up deep within hair follicles, causing large, festering bumps under the skin that can't be popped.”
“They're generally caused by hormones and P.acnes, the bacteria that can cause acne.”
“(And it can be painful AF).”
“It sucks, but thankfully, Lili's got a sense of humour about it.”
“This isn't the first time Lili has opened up about her cystic acne.”


"This article first appeared in the American Journal of women's health."
"Lili's post reminds us that acne is a fact of life for many of us. There is nothing to be ashamed of."
Title: "about tinder: Hi, I'm Lily."
"I'm 21, Virgo, Carly girl, and I have cystic acne."
Related reports: according to the Mayo Clinic, Ruby Rose published an article on instagram about how to fight adult acne in an emotional state
"This happens when oil and dead skin cells accumulate deep in the hair follicles, causing large, festering bumps under the skin to fail to pop out."
"They are usually caused by hormones and acne, a bacterium that causes acne."
"And it can be painful."
"It's bad, but thank goodness lily is humorous about it."
"This is not the first time lily has disclosed her cystic acne."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cuba Gooding Jr. 18 of 18 Skip ad TV One Continue reading Anika Noni Rose Reveals She Was Sexually Assaulted On A Plane Stars Accused Of Sexual Harassment, Misconduct Or RapeLike TV One on Facebook and be sure to follow us on Instagram and Twitter.”
“I made a report right then with the FBI and they dropped it.”
“ https://t.co/UtfJaHwMFJ — Anika Noni Rose *DoesntNeedToSeeYourPenis* (@AnikaNoniRose) January 18, 2018TV One Stars Accused Of Sexual Harassment, Misconduct Or Rape 18 photos Launch gallery Stars Accused Of Sexual Harassment, Misconduct Or Rape 1.”
“This is not an easy thing, but you all make me feel lifted.”
“Just want to thank everyone who has sent me positive thoughts and support.”
“The actress has since taken to social media to share a gratitude of thanks after bravely sharing her story.”
“Listen below.”
“They dropped the case,” she said.”
“You’re supposed to be able to get people’s names.”
“Diddy 17 of 18 18.”


"Cuba Gooding jr.18/18 skip ad TV one read on Anika Noni rose revealed that she was sexually assaulted on the plane and that stars were accused of sexual harassment, misconduct or rap on Facebook. TV one must follow us on instagram and twitter."
"I made a report to the FBI and they threw it away."
“  https://t.co/UtfJaHwMFJ-Anika  Noni rose * Don't need to look at your penis * (@ Anika Noni Rose) 18 January 2018 TV one star charged with sexual harassment, misconduct or rape 18 photos released Gallery star charged with sexual harassment, misconduct or rape 1. "
"It's not easy, but you're all inspiring."
"Just want to thank everyone for their positive ideas and support."
"After bravely sharing her story, the actress has since shared a sense of gratitude on social media."
"Listen to the following."
"They dropped the case," she said
"You should know other people's names."
"Page 17 of 18."



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They tied the knot in Hawaii in November 2016.”
“The former couple began dating in 2008.”
“A Los Angeles Police Department PIO confirmed to Us that Bohan was also ordered to move out of their family home by noon on October 13.”
“Earlier this month, Patridge and the athlete reached an agreement that she would get full legal and physical custody of Kirra, while he was granted visitation rights on Mondays, Wednesdays and Sundays.”
“The Orange County District Attorney’s office later confirmed to Us that Bohan would not be charged with domestic violence due to a lack of evidence.”
“1 priority is her daughter right now,” her rep told Us at the time.”
““Audrina’s No.”
“Two days later, she filed for divorce after 10 months of marriage.”
“The reality star obtained a temporary restraining order against Bohan on September 18 over claims that he was violent.”
“In addition, he wants her to pay for his attorney’s fees.”


"They married in Hawaii in November 2016."
"The former couple have been dating since 2008."
"A PIO from the Los Angeles Police Department confirmed to us that Bohan was also ordered to move out of their house by noon on October 13."
Earlier this month, Patric reached an agreement with the athlete that she would be given full legal and physical custody of Sheila, who would have visitation rights on Mondays, Wednesdays and Sundays
"The orange county prosecutor's office later confirmed to us that Bohan would not be charged with domestic violence due to lack of evidence."
"The priority now is her daughter," her representative told us at the time
"Audrina did not."
"Two days later, after 10 months of marriage, she filed for divorce."
"The reality star was given a temporary restraining order against Bohan on September 18 on the grounds that he claimed to have committed violence."
"Besides, he wants her to pay his lawyer's fees."



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scott simply captioned the video: 'She's a spinner'”
“Loved up!”
“The love birds are a well-traveled couple who have also been spotted together in Colorado, Miami, Italy and Los Cabos since going public with their relationship.”
“This is Sofia and Scott's second time together on the Mexican beach of Puerto Vallarta.”
“...as they packed on the PDA in the water...”
“Her high cut at the waist thong bottoms highlighted her trim and peachy posterior Pool day The model wore her newly dark locks up in a ponytail while hiding her make up free face with black designer sunglasses The happy couple couldn t keep their hands off of each other...”
“During their romantic getaway, Sofia sported a black string bikini which flaunted her ample assetsAll smiles!”
“The daughter of Lionel Richie and the ex-boyfriend of Kourtney Kardashian were all smiles as they got steamy in the hotel hot tubPacking on the PDA!”
“Scott showed off his toned physique by going shirtless while wearing black swim shorts.”
“Toned up!”


"Scott just added a title to the video: 'she's a spinner'"
"Love
"This couple is a traveling couple, and since their public love affair, they have also been found together in Colorado, Miami, Italy and Los Cabos."
"This is the second time Sophia and Scott have been together on the beach in port bayarta, Mexico."
“… When they put PDAs in the water... "
"The high top T-shaped trousers at her waist set off her slim figure and peach houchi RI. The model is wearing her new long dark hair, ponytail and black brand sunglasses to cover her face without makeup. This happy couple can't help touching each other..."
In their romantic outing, Sophia wears a black bikini and shows off her plump smile
"Lionel Ritchie's daughter and Courtney Kardashian's ex boyfriend are smiling as they steaming through the hot tub of the hotel, packing with a PDA!"
"Scott showed off his strong physique in black swimming shorts and shirtless."
"Cheer up!"



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 26-year-old Scream Queens star shared an emotional post on Friday, mourning the death of his dog, Roxy.”
“Alongside a picture of Lautner holding up his pup and kissing her on the face, the actor recalled when his parents first gave him Roxy.”
“"Roxy, my family surprised me with you on the set of Sharkboy and Lavagirl in 2004," he began his message.”
“"You have brought so much joy into my life for the past 13 1/2 years.”
“I’ll miss you every day but I’ll take those memories with me everywhere I go.”
“I love you."”
“According to Taylor's sister, Makena, who also shared her own personal Instagram post, Roxy died one week ago.”
“Lautner isn't the only celeb who's recently lost a pet.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 26 year old Scream Queen star posted a touching post on Friday to mourn the death of his dog Roxy."
Next to a picture of Lautner holding a puppy and kissing it on the face, the actor recalls the first time his parents gave him Rosie
"Roxie, my family was surprised to see you in shark boys and girls in 2004," he began to leave a message
"In the past 13 and a half years, you have brought so much joy to my life."
"I miss you every day, but wherever I go, I carry those memories with me."
"I love you."
"Roxy died a week ago, according to Tyler's sister, Magna, who also shared her personal instagram post."
"Lautner is not the only celebrity who recently lost his pet."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Set during the late height of Cold War tensions, the film sees Diana come into conflict with the Soviet Union and encountering a new enemy in Cheetah.”
““Wonder Woman” became the highest grossing film directed by a woman in 2017, grossing $412.5 million domestically and $821 million worldwide.”
“Pedro Pascal has also been cast in the film.”
“Gadot is starring, along with Chris Pine as Steve Trevor with Kristen Wiig as Cheetah.”
“Also Read: Comic-Con Goers Get a Gloriously '80s Look at New 'Wonder Woman 1984' Footage“Wonder Woman 1984” is set in the 1980s and the film brings back Patty Jenkins as director and co-writer.”
“This move lands the film exactly where it belongs,” said Jeff Goldstein, Warner Bros. president of domestic distribution.”
“?‍♀️✨ pic.twitter.com/Wj8ORUQLdg — Gal Gadot (@GalGadot) October 22, 2018“We had tremendous success releasing the first ‘Wonder Woman’ film during the summer so when we saw an opportunity to take advantage of the changing competitive landscape, we did.”
“✨???”
“Be there or be square!!!”
“June 5, 2020.”


"This film is set in the most tense period after the cold war, in which Diana conflicts with the Soviet Union and meets a new enemy in cheetah."
"Wonder Woman" became the highest box office film directed by women in 2017, with a domestic box office of 412.5 million US dollars and a global box office of 821 million US dollars
"Pedro Pascal was in the film, too."
"Gado is starring with Chris pine, Steve Trevor and Christine wig as cheetahs."
"Also read: comic audiences can see new scenes of" Wonder Woman 1984 "in the 1980s, which is set in the 1980s and makes Patty Jenkins a director and co-author again."
"This move makes the film just where it should be," said Jeff Goldstein, President of domestic distribution at Warner Bros
“?‍ ♀️✨  pic.twitter.com/Wj8ORUQLdg -Gal gadot (@ galgadot) October 22, 2018 "we released our first 'wonder woman' movie in the summer and it was a great success, so when we saw an opportunity to take advantage of the changing competitive landscape, we did it."
“ ✨ ???”
"Either there or in the square!"
"June 5, 2020."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They are happy to be together” with their kids: daughters Seraphina, 9, Violet, 12, and son Samuel, 6.”
““Things are pretty good between them right now,” an Affleck source previously told PEOPLE.”
“Image zoom Credit: Pascal Le Segretain/Getty; Jennifer Garner and Ben AffleckGarner and Affleck, who announced their plans to split in 2015 after 10 years of marriage, spent Easter weekend together with their three kids in Hawaii, where Affleck is shooting Triple Frontier.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“RELATED VIDEO: Jennifer Garner Flaunts Toned Arms in an Off-the-Shoulder Top While Attending an Event in NYCA real estate source tells PEOPLE the house is still in escrow.”
“...lives in Los Angeles that the 45 year old actor is looking to buy...”
“Ben was back in LA this weekend the insider explains adding that the whole family went to church on Sunday before Jen s party Ben is getting his new house ready but hasn t moved in yet the insider continues referring to a 19 2 million home near where Garner...”
“Although Garner and the 45-year-old actor, who filed for divorce a year ago, remain on friendly terms, the source tells PEOPLE “Ben wasn’t there,” even though he was in Los Angeles at the time.”
“Image zoom Credit: Craig Barritt/Getty ImagesJennifer GarnerHowever the guest list, which included Molly Sims and her family, was missing one notable face: Garner’s ex Ben Affleck.”


"They are very happy to be with the children": 9-year-old daughter Serafina, 12-year-old violet and 6-year-old son Samuel
"The relationship between them is pretty good now," an Affleck source told people earlier
"Credit for image zooming: Pascal Le segreat / Getty; Jennifer Garner, Ben Affleck Garner and Affleck announced their plans to break up in 2015 after 10 years of marriage. They spent the weekend of recovery day with their three children in Hawaii, where Affleck was filming triple frontier
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"Related video: Jennifer Garner shows off her strong arms in a off shoulder top at an event in New York. The source told people that the house is still in escrow. "
“… Living in Los Angeles, the 45 year old actor wants to buy... "
"Back in Los Angeles this weekend, the insider explained that before Zhan's party, the whole family went to church on Sunday. Ben prepared his new house, but he hasn't moved in yet. The insider continued to mention a 19.2 million home near Ghana..."
"Although Ghana has a friendly relationship with the 45 year old actor who filed for divorce a year ago, the source told people," Ben wasn't there at the time, "even though he was in Los Angeles at the time."
"Image zooming credit: Craig Barrett / Getty Images Jennifer Garner is on the guest list, including Molly Simms and her family, missing a striking face: Garner's predecessor Ben Affleck."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““How do you look at them and say, ‘Well, just work hard, sweetie, and you can do it,’ When that’s… not the case right now.””
“1 on that chart since 2013, with her Keith Urban collab “We Were Us”; she’d previously topped the chart with “Over You” (2012), “Heart Like Mine” (2011) and “House That Built Me” (2010).”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“"It is interesting that I haven't had even a Top 20 in a long, long time.”
“And then it goes No.”
“1 because it's a dude," she saidMiranda Lambert Slams Sexism in Music: 'I Had to Sing with Someone with a Penis' to Hit No.”
“1Miranda Lambert has some frank words for the country music community when it comes to female artists’ representation.”
“This week, The Washington Post published an interview with Lambert in which she talked about her most recent No.”
“1 hit, the Jason Aldean duet "Drowns the Whiskey.”
“",” which they’ll perform on Wednesday’s CMA Awards.”


"What do you think of them saying, 'well, work hard, honey, you can do it,'" and now It's not like that. "
"Since 2013, she has topped the list with her collaboration with Keith Urban," we are we "; previously, she has topped the list with" beyond you "(2012)," my heart "(2011) and" build my house "(2010)"
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"It's interesting that I haven't been in the top 20 for a long time."
"And then it doesn't work."
"Because it's a man," she said. Randa Lambert attacked sexism in music. "I had to sing with someone with a penis" to refuse
"When talking about the performance of female artists, Miranda Lambert is outspoken to the country music world."
"This week, the Washington Post ran an interview with Lambert, in which she talked about her latest rejection."
"One hit, Jason aldy duet" drowns whiskey“
"They will perform at the CMA awards ceremony on Wednesday."



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The pair first stepped out together as a couple in January 2012.”
““Getting prepped to go back into the trenches.”Us Weekly exclusively reported in December 2014 that The Danish Girl actor and the businesswoman tied the knot in a private ceremony at Babington House in Somerset, England, less than one year after he proposed.”
““We’ve just about got to that stage when we’re beginning to get sleep and remember what that word means,” the Golden Globe winner added.”
““Last time we didn’t know either, and we did that thing where there was basically only one name for each sex that we agreed on.”The Les Miserables actor and the PR executive welcomed daughter Iris in June 2016.”
““We don’t know [what we’re having] — we’re not going to find out,” he told the cohosts.”
“The Fantastic Beasts and Where to Find Them star opened up about preparing to welcome his second child during his visit to Live With Kelly and Ryan in February.”
““Eddie and Hannah are delighted to confirm they are expecting a second child,” a spokesperson for the Oscar winner, 36, told Us Weekly at the time.”
“2.”
“The pair announced their son’s arrival in the London Times: “On 10th March 2018 to Hannah (Bagshawe) and Edward, a son, Luke Richard Bagshawe Redmayne, brother to Iris.”The couple revealed in November 2017 that they were expecting baby No.”
“Eddie Redmayne and wife Hannah Redmayne have welcomed their second child together.”


"In January 2012, the two first came together as lovers."
"Prepare to return to the trenches." In December 2014, US weekly exclusively reported that the Danish actress and the businesswoman had a private wedding at Babington palace in Somerset, less than a year after he proposed
"We're just at that stage, we're going to sleep, remember the meaning of the word," the Golden Globe winner added
"Last time we didn't know, we did one thing, each gender basically has only one name, we agreed." The les miserables actor and PR Director welcomed his daughter iris in June 2016
"We don't know (what we're eating) - we won't know," he told the gang
"The amazing beast and where to find them star opened up about preparing to meet his second child during his visit with Kelly and Ryan in February."
"Eddie and Hannah are happy to confirm that they are pregnant with a second child," a spokesman for the 36 year old Oscar winner told weekly at the time
“2.”
The two announced their son's arrival in the London Times: "on March 10, 2018, Hannah and her son Edward, Luke Richard bagshawe Redmayne, iris's brother." The couple revealed in November 2017 that they were not pregnant with children. "
"Eddie Redman and his wife Hannah Redman have their second child."



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Cortese Credit Magic Toast Photography RELATED VIDEO Jersey Shore Star Deena Cortese Is Married The pair who got engaged in Mexico in 2016 tied the knot this past October at Laurita Winery in New Egypt New Jersey...”
“Image zoom Christopher Buckner and Deena Cortese Credit Magic Toast Photography Image zoom Christopher Buckner and Deena Cortese Credit Magic Toast Photography Image zoom Christopher Buckner and Deena Cortese Credit Magic Toast Photography Image zoom Christopher Buckner and Deena Cortese Credit Magic Toast Photography Image zoom Christopher Buckner and Deena...”
“Cortese also shared their son’s name, writing, “Daddy and Mommy can’t wait to meet you Christopher John❤ you are going to be the most spoiled little boy ever!!!”
“We are truly blessed and our hearts are filled with so much joy and happiness December can’t come soon enough!” she added.”
“Cortese Credit Magic Toast Photography We have a sweet little boy on the way...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“...showing off their baby’s ultrasound, holding blue balloons and more.”
“The remainder of the gallery includes photos of the duo (and their pup!)”


"The West Coast star Deena Cortese married two people who were engaged in Mexico in 2016. They married in October this year at Laurita winery, New Jersey, new Egypt..."
"Image zooming Christopher Buckner and Dina Curtis credit card magic toast photographic image zooming Christopher Buckner and Dina Curtis credit card magic toast photographic image zooming Christopher Buckner and Dina Curtis credit card magic toast photographic image zooming Christopher Buckner and Dina Curtis credit card magic toast photographic image "Christopher Buckner and Dina..."
Curtis also shared the name of their son, writing: "Mom and dad can't wait to see you, Christopher John ❤  You're going to be the most spoiled little boy ever
"We are really lucky. Our hearts are full of joy and happiness. December has come so fast! "She added
"We have a lovely little boy on the way..."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
“… Showing their kids' ultrasound, holding blue balloons and so on. "
"The rest of the gallery includes photos of the two (and their dog!)"



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Davidson said he "felt so lucky like he won the lottery" and that he's "' gonna 'ride this one out!'"”
“'," said a second audience member.”
“"The first thing he responded with when they asked about Ariana was 'it's pretty dope huh?”
“Ariana herself just posed for Vogue and is prepping the release of her next album, Sweetener.”
“The two have posted a lot of content recently involving their shared love of Harry Potter, and Davidson just got two very Grande-themed tattoos.”
“"He smiled but really didn't want to give much info other than that it's pretty cool how he got someone like her."”
“"Someone in the crowd yelled Ariana's name and said how attractive she is," explained the source.”
“News that "[Pete] said he didn't have a skit prepared because he didn't really want to be there," but "he said he's really happy and life's good so there's nothing to complain about."”
“Onstage at the Hollywood Improv Comedy Club, a source tells E!”
“It seems that the person most surprised by Ariana Grande and Pete Davidson dating is Davidson himself, as the SNL star can't not talk about how lucky he feels to be dating the pop star.”


Davidson said he "felt as lucky as winning the lottery" and that he "wanted to ride this one!"
The second audience said
"When they asked about Ariana, the first thing he said was," that's pretty stupid, huh? "
"Ariana herself has just put on a look for fashion and is preparing for the release of her next album, sweetener."
"The two recently released a lot of content about their common love for Harry Potter. Davidson just got two very grand tattoos."
"He laughs, but he really doesn't want to reveal more information. Besides, it's cool how he found someone like her."
"Someone in the crowd yelled Ariana's name and said how charming she was," the source explained
"The news says that" (Pete) said he didn't prepare sketches because he really didn't want to go there, "but he said he was really happy and had a good life, so there was nothing to complain about."
"On the stage of the Hollywood impromptu comedy club, a source told e!"
"The most surprising thing about Ariana grand's date with Peter Davidson seems to be Davidson himself, because the SNL star has to say how lucky she is to date the pop star."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the original ad below, which has since been re-edited without Perry's offending line.”
“"It's come to my attention that the staff at the shelter where I adopted Lamby have a very different account of his early life and behavioral issues than I do.”
“Several weeks ago, Dunham revealed on Instagram that she sent Lamby to the Zen Dog canine rehabilitation center in Los Angeles, before the dog was eventually re-homed.”
“"Lamby suffered terrible abuse as a pup that made having him in a typical home environment dangerous to him and others," she wrote.”
“However, the BARC Shelter is disputing Dunham's account of Lamby's history of abuse.”
“On Thursday, Robert Vazquez, a spokesman for the no-kill animal shelter, gave a stinging interview to Yahoo denying that Dunham's dog was as mistreated as she claimed.”
““It’s just hard to believe the dog was nasty when she took Lamby to every green room with her when Girls was still a thing four years ago," he said, noting that he wouldn't have adopted the dog out if he felt it had insurmountable issues.”
“Vazquez also took issue with Dunham's claims that Lamby had “three other homes (and) three other names” before she owned him.”
““We checked the records for Lamby ...”
“He was ‘owner-surrendered" he said, adding that it was because the owner said they didn't have enough time for him.”


"Look at the original ad below, which was later re edited without Perry's offensive lines."
"I've noticed that the staff at the shelter where I adopted Lambi have a very different description of Lambi's early life and behavioral problems."
"A few weeks ago, Dunham revealed on instagram that she sent Lambie to Zen dog rehabilitation center in Los Angeles, and the dog was eventually resettled."
"Lamby suffered severe abuse as a puppy, which made it dangerous for him and others to keep him in a typical family environment," she wrote
"However, the BARC shelter challenged Dunham's description of lamby's abuse history."
"On Thursday, Robert Vazquez, a spokesman for the no hunting animal shelter, gave a sharp interview to Yahoo, denying that Dunham's dog had been abused as she claimed."
"Four years ago, when the girls were the same thing, she took ramby to every green room. I can't believe this dog is a pain in the neck," he said He said he would not adopt the dog if he felt it had insurmountable problems
Basques also challenged Dunham's claim that ramby owned "three other houses (and) three other names" before he owned him
"We checked ramby's records..."
"He's a 'homeowner turned himself in'," he said, adding that it's because homeowners say they don't have enough time for him



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ashley has been married to videographer Justin Ervin since 2010.”
“The Nebraska-born beauty told Harper's Bazaar: 'That was a really low point in my life.”
“And Ashley Graham let her natural beauty shine through on Friday, when she revealed her makeup free face in a candid Instagram Story.”
“At one point the 30-year-old gave a creepy laugh as she wore a full facial mask.”
“Soul glow: Ashley Graham let her natural beauty shine through on Friday, when she revealed her makeup free face in a candid Instagram StoryIn the video, the Sports Illustrated Swimsuit Issue pinup reclines as she shows off her glowing skin.”
“The makeup free beauty shows off her freckles in the video.”
“She plugs her skincare expert in the video - after initially forgetting how to pronounce the woman's name.”
“Taking it easy In the video the Sports Illustrated Swimsuit Issue pinup reclines as she shows off her glowing skin Whoops She plugs her skincare expert in the video after initially forgetting how to pronounce the woman s name Later in the video the plus size model wears a face...”
“...mask reminiscent of that worn by Hannibal Lecter in The Silence Of The Lambs...”
“Graham emits a creepy laugh for the benefit of her 7.3million Instagram followers.”


"Ashley has been married to photographer Justin Owen since 2010."
"The Nebraska born beauty told Harper Fair: 'that's a real low point in my life.'
On Friday, Ashley Graham showed her face without makeup in a candid report on instagram, which sparkled her natural beauty
"At the age of 30, she wore a full mask and gave off a kind of creepy laughter."
"Light of the soul: Ashley Graham brightened her natural beauty last Friday, and when she frankly revealed her face without makeup in an instagram video, Sports Illustrated's swimsuit version of Pinup lay down to show her radiant skin."
"Beauty without makeup shows freckles in the video."
"She inserted her skincare expert in the video - at first she forgot how to pronounce the woman's name."
"Take it easy in the video. Sports Illustrated's swimsuit problem is Pinup reclining. She shows her radiant skin. Ouch, after inserting her skin care expert in the video, she initially forgot how to pronounce the name of the woman. Later, in the video, the oversized model wears a face..."
“… Reminiscent of Hannibal Lecter's mask in the silent lamb... "
"For the benefit of 7.3 million instagram fans, Graham gave a creepy laugh."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read a summary of the allegations in Silva’s original suit here.”
“The next hearing for the case is scheduled on December 7.”
“Cobain played during Nirvana s 1993 MTV Unplugged performance...”
“Among the named alleged accomplices was Riverdale actor Ross Butler.”
“In an October 9 court filing, reviewed by Spin and first reported by The Blast, Butler denies the wild allegations in Silva’s suit, but admits he visited Silva’s house with Lutfi on the night in question.”
“That’s about the only detail Butler’s version of the story shares with Silva’s account.”
“Silva and Frances Bean Cobain have fought legally for years over the rights to her father’s famous 1959 Martin D-18E guitar, which is rumored to be worth millions.”
“Silva, who plays in The Eeeries, has said that Frances Bean gave the guitar to him as a wedding present.”
“Love told TMZ in 2016 that the instrument was a “treasured heirloom of the family” and that Frances “never planned on doing that.” In May, the guitar was awarded to Silva in a divorce settlement.”
“Butler’s role in the saga is not exactly clear.”


"Please read here the summary of the charges in Silva's original lawsuit."
"The next session of the case is scheduled for December 7."
"Coban played in Nirvana's MTV no plug-in performance in 1993..."
"Among the named associates is the actor rose Butler of Riverdale."
"In a court document on October 9, Butler denied the crazy charges in Silva's lawsuit, but admitted that he visited Silva's home with Luther that night."
"This is the only detail of Butler's version of the story and Silva's narrative."
Silva and Francis bienkoban have been fighting for years over the copyright of her father's 1959 famous Martin d-18e guitar, which is said to be worth millions of dollars
Silva played in the theater and said Francis bean gave him the guitar as a wedding gift
"Love told TMZ in 2016 that the guitar was" a precious family heirloom "and Frances" never intended to do it. " In May, the guitar was awarded to Silva in a divorce agreement
"Butler's role in this legend is not entirely clear."



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“His kids are all that matter to him.””
“The star has three daughters — 5-year-old Madison with Stephen, Phoenix, 18, from her first marriage to Jimmy Gulzar, and Angel, 10, from a relationship with Eddie Murphy — and she and Belafonte are locked in a custody battle.”
“...husband Stephen Belafonte stormed off stage leaving a shocked Cowell soaked...”
“The trouble started when Cowell, 57, critiqued escape artist Demian Aditya’s performance during Tuesday’s show by saying: “I kind of think it will be like Mel B’s wedding night.”
“A lot of anticipation, not much promise.”Angry Mel — who debuted new white hair for the evening — poured her mug of water all over Cowell before leaving the panel.”
“Host Tyra Banks said: “Mel B is out.”
“This is live TV, all.”
“Live TV,” while judge Howie Mandel added: “Something just went wrong.”Despite the drama, Mel, 43, eventually returned for the remainder of the show but appeared to have ripped her dress in the process.”
“Mel filed for divorce from Belafonte earlier this year and was granted a restraining order against him after she accused him of abusing her, getting their nanny pregnant and forcing her to take part in threesomes.”
“A judge recently ruled that Belafonte can apply for custody rights to his stepdaughter Angel after he argued he played a significant role in raising her and is eager to be able to retain contact with her in the future.”


"His children are the most important to him."
"The star has three daughters - 5-year-old Madison and Stephen, 18-year-old Phoenix's first marriage to Jimmy Gulzar, and 10-year-old angel's relationship with Eddie Murphy - and she's in custody with Belafonte."
“…… Her husband, Stephen Belafonte, rushed out of the stage, leaving Cowell in shock. "
When Cowell, 57, criticized prison break artist Demian aditia's performance on Tuesday's show, he said: "I think it's going to be a bit like Mel B's wedding night."
"A lot of expectations, not much commitment." Angry Mel poured a large glass of water on Cowell before leaving the jury. She showed off her new white hair for the first time at the party
"Mel B's out," host Tara banks said
"It's live."
"Live TV," judge Howie Mandel added, "there's something wrong." Despite the drama, Mel, 43, finally came back to watch the rest of the show, but seemed to tear her clothes in the process
"Mel filed for divorce from Belafonte earlier this year and got a restraining order against him after accusing him of abusing her, making their nanny pregnant and forcing her to join the trio."
"Recently, a judge ruled that Belafonte could apply for custody of his stepdaughter angel because he argued that he played an important role in raising her and was eager to keep in touch with her in the future."



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our Email Newsletters here.”
“...that we support Me Too and the movement more than anybody anybody me as a woman him as a man In an interview with Deadline published January 10 Douglas noted that a sexual harassment claim was going to be made against him in the future...”
“Catherine Zeta-Jones is standing by husband Michael Douglas after he came forward to preemptively deny a sexual harassment claim set to be made against him.”
“The actress told PEOPLE while promoting her upcoming Lifetime film “Cocaine Godmother” that “there was no other way” for Douglas to handle the situation.”
““There was no other way than to be preemptive in a story that had to be watched.”
“He did a statement.”
“I think it’s very clear the way that he stands,” Zeta-Jones said.”
“I cannot elaborate on something that s so very personal to him Zeta Jones made it clear she supports both her husband s denial and the MeToo anti harassment movement at large My reaction was that as two people who have been in this business him longer than me was...”
“The actor said he received a message from his attorney that The Hollywood Reporter was interested in a story involving one of the actor’s former employees who alleges he sexually harassed her approximately 32 years ago.”
“Sign Up: Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news!”


"Sign up for our email newsletter here."
“…… We also support me. This movement supports me more than anyone else. I am a woman and he is a man. Douglas pointed out in an interview with the deadline published on January 10 that he will be charged with sexual harassment in the future... "
"Catherine Zeta Jones sided with her husband, Michael Douglas, because he denied the sexual harassment charges that would be brought against him."
The actress told people that Douglas "has no other way" to deal with the situation while promoting her upcoming lifetime film, "godmother of cocaine."
"In a story that has to be watched, there's no way but to get ahead."
"He made a statement."
"I think his position is very clear," Zeta Jones said
"I can't elaborate on something that's very personal to him. Zeta Jones made it clear that she supported her husband's denial and her anti harassment campaign. My response was that as two people who have been in this business longer than me, he is..."
"The actor said he received a message from a lawyer that the Hollywood Reporter was interested in a story about a former employee of the actor who claimed he sexually harassed her about 32 years ago."
"Registration: keep abreast of the latest film and TV news at any time!"



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET on ABC.”
“It’s an emotional curtain call.”Image zoom Credit: Jack Rowand/ABCOnce Upon a Time returns Friday, Oct. 6 at 8 p.m.”
““We’re moving forward past the end of season 6, seeing what happened with Emma and Hook, and how it relates to the events in Hyperion Heights.”
““We will be getting closure on her story in what we feel is a satisfying way.”Image zoom Credit: Jack Rowand/ABC“What we’re not doing is a flashback story where we’re seeing stuff prior to, or during, the previous six seasons,” EP Adam Horowitz adds.”
““We get to find out what has happened with Emma and Hook [Colin O’Donoghue] since our happy ending we showed last year,” executive producer Edward Kitsis tells EW.”
“However, her character, Emma, will return for one episode in season 7, the Hook-centric second outing aptly titled “A Pirate’s Life.” Details surrounding the hour are being kept tightly under wraps.”
“At the close of season 6, Morrison exited the ABC fairy tale drama.”
“Get ready, Once Upon a Time fans: Jennifer Morrison will be reprising her role as Emma Swan for what the OUAT bosses are calling “an emotional curtain call” — and EW has the exclusive first look.”
“Follow the hashtag #50Scoops50Days on Twitter and Instagram to keep up with the latest, and check EW.com/50-Scoops for all the news and surprises.”
“...of your favorite shows...”


"Et on ABC."
"It's a moving curtain call." Image zooming credit: Jack Roland / abcoce returns at 8 p.m. on Friday, October 6, after a while
"We're going to move on at the end of season 6 to see what happened to Emma and hooker and how it relates to the Highbury heights incident."
"We will end her story in a satisfying way." EP Adam Horowitz added: "what we didn't do is a flashback story, we saw something before or during the last six seasons."
Executive producer Edward kittis told the New York Times: "we have to figure out what happened to Emma and hooker (Colin o'donohoe) since last year's happy ending."
However, her character Emma will return in season 7's second episode, life of the pirates, which is a second episode centered on hooker and has the right title. Details of the period are still being kept secret
At the end of season six, Morrison dropped out of ABC's fairytale
"Get ready, former fans: Jennifer Morrison will play the role of Emma Swan again, which ouat's bosses call" emotional curtain call "- ew has an exclusive first look."
"Follow the tags on Twitter and instagram, scoops 50days, get the latest information, and see EW / 50 - all news and surprise exclusives."
“… Your favorite show... "



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Rob feels that show has truly ruined his family,” a source told Radar in February 2014.”
““She called him a fat slob and told him he’s losing out on business opportunities because no one wants someone as huge as him representing their products.”Yes: In Kris Jenner’s world, being overweight is worse for the brand than pissing on the floor of a fancy hotel.”
“According to Forbes, Kim made nearly $50 million in the last year from her app, emojis and endorsements.”
“And plenty do.”
“The Kardashians are like the bitcoin of the celebrity-industrial complex, their currency backed by nothing but those who buy into it.”
“How and why is hard to explain; it’s not as though their stardom is backed up by any discernible talent.”
“In any event, Kylie — with supermodel sister Kendall, social media empress Kim, and satellite siblings Khloe and Kourtney — have monetized their unique brand of fame into multimillion-dollar businesses.”
“TV fodder...”
“It s not like Kylie now 20 began pumping her face and body with filler and silicone as a teenager or met her first boyfriend when she was 14 and he the rapper Tyga was 21 or that the majority of her very short life has been cannibalized for reality...”
“When I look back on that, I belly laugh.”Of course.”


In February 2014, a source told radar: "rob felt that the play really destroyed his family."
"She said he was a fat slob and told him that he had lost business because no one wanted someone his age to represent their products." Yes: in Chris Jenner's world, being overweight is worse for brands than peeing on the floor of a luxury hotel
Last year, Kim made nearly $50 million from apps, emoticons and endorsements, Forbes reported
"There's a lot more."
"The Kardashian family is like the bitcoin of the celebrity industrial complex. Their currency is backed only by those who buy it."
"It's hard to explain how and why; it's not that their star status is backed by any obvious talent."
"In any case, Kelly, along with her supermodel sister Kendall, social media queen king, satellite siblings Chloe and coultney, has turned her unique brand name into a multi million dollar business."
"TV material..."
"It's not like Kelly now 20 starts pumping her face and body filler and silicone as a teenager or meets her first boyfriend when she's 14, his rap singer TEGA is 21, or most of her short life has been eaten away by reality..."
"When I look back, I laugh." of course



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I thought I was doing well because I was going for 50 ounces a day, but my mom was like, ‘Oh, well, I am doing 60 ounces a day!’ But it’s been fun supporting each other and reminding each other through it.””
““We’re doing a water challenge to see how much water we can drink in a day, because pimples signify more than surface level issues, but something internal,” she said.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The 17-year-old actress not only has the book smarts (she got into every college she applied to), but has the beauty smarts tooImage zoom Credit: Stefanie Keenan/Clean & ClearYara Shahidi may only be 17, but the Black-ish actress’s maturity is far beyond her years.”
“Hey, there’s a reason she was accepted into every college she applied to this year!”
“And to hear her tell it, the opportunity to work alongside industry legends including Tracee Ellis Ross, her costar in the hit ABC comedy, definitely has helped her become so grounded.”
““She’s really taught me how to demonstrate that I have an opinion, especially when it comes to beauty,” Shahidi, who’s teaming up with Clean & Clear for the launch of its Acne Triple Clear Bubble Foam Cleanser, told PeopleStyle.”
““Growing up on the small screen, I had to confront how I felt about beauty at a younger age because I was putting on a full face of makeup to get into character.”
“I had to learn not to feel makeup-dependent, as though I wasn’t finished without it, so it could stay a fun experience of experimenting and self-expression.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: Stefanie Keenan/Clean & ClearThe biggest takeaway she’s had from constantly being in a full face of makeup to play Zoey on Black-ish?”


"I thought I was doing well because I had to eat 50 ounces a day, but my mom said," Oh, well, I'm going to eat 60 ounces a day! "But it's fun to support and remind each other about it."
"We're doing a water challenge to see how much water we can drink in a day, because acne is not just a surface problem, it's an internal problem," she said
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"The 17-year-old actress has not only book intelligence (every college she applies to), but also beauty Intelligence: Stephanie Keenan / clean & clear Yara shahidi may be only 17 years old, but the maturity of the black actress is far beyond her age."
"Hey, every university she applied for this year will be admitted, for a reason!"
"Listening to her, the opportunity to work with industry legends, including her partner Tracee Ellis Ross in ABC's hit comedy, has undoubtedly made her so down-to-earth."
"She really taught me how to prove that I have my own views, especially in the field of beauty," Shahidi told PeopleStyle, who is working with Clean&Clear to launch her three acne Cleansing Foam Cleanser.
"Growing up on a small screen, I had to face the feeling of beauty when I was young, because I had to put on a face makeup to get into the role."
"I have to learn not to rely on make-up, as if I can't finish without make-up, so that I can maintain the pleasure of experience and self-expression." Get news, feature, etc
"Credit for image zooming: Stefanie Keenan / clean & clear, this is her biggest achievement from frequent heavy makeup to black face?"



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Teen Mom 2 airs on MTV Monday evenings at 9/8c.”
“...completed treatment...”
“Her accusations came Friday after Nathan, 30, entered legal filings July 24 for full custody of their son, People reported.”
“Griffith filed for full custody after Evans was seen on the MTV series brandishing a firearm in an instance of road rage.”
“Fit parents Teen Mom 2 s Jenelle Evans made strong remarks against her ex Nathan Griffith 30 R on Friday claiming he doesn t care about their four year old son Kaiser and doesn t call the boy on the phone If you re so concerned about your son why...”
“...haven t you call him to see how he s been lately...”
“...said the 26-year-old reality star after Nathan asked the court to give her secondary custody in a modification to their current arrangement.”
“'Oh yeah, you don’t care.”
“Silly me, I forgot.'”
“The Oak Island, North Carolina native continued, 'Oh wait, you’ve never called him.”


"Teen moms 2 on MTV at 9:8 p.m. Monday night."
“… Complete treatment... "
Nathan, 30, filed a legal document on July 24 demanding full custody of his son, people reported
"Griffith was seen waving a gun in the MTV series, showing a kind of road rage, so Griffith applied for full custody."
"Fit parents teenage mother 2 s Jenelle Evans made a strong statement to her ex girlfriend Nathan Griffith 30 R on Friday, claiming that he doesn't care about their 4-year-old son Kaiser. If you care about your son so much, he won't call the boy. Why..."
“… Didn't you call him to see how he was doing... "
“…… The 26 year old reality star said after Nathan asked the court to change their current arrangements to give her secondary custody
"Oh, yes, you don't care."
"I'm stupid. I forgot."
"Oak Island, the native of North Carolina goes on, 'Oh wait, you never called him.'



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...extra attention...”
“And while we ll just have to wait to hear whether Rocco will be getting a baby brother or sister there s no doubt that with a toddler already in the house the expectant mother will indeed need a little...”
“Byrne and Cannavale are already parents to son, Rocco, who was born in February 2016.”
“She also appeared in the X-Men franchise films, and held a key role in HBO's adaptation of The Immortal Life of Henrietta Lacks alongside Oprah Winfrey.”
“As fans of the actress know, this isn't exactly her first foray into humor; Byrne memorably stared in Bridesmaids and Neighbors.”
“The set Byrne was referring to is the upcoming project Juliet, Naked, a dramedy based on the book by Nick Hornby.”
“Everyone was very sweet on set today, and you always get a little bit more attention when you’re pregnant, which is fabulous."”
“Byrne shared the happy news yesterday on Australian website DavidJones.com saying, "I’m a little tired but feeling good.”
“The Australian actress and her husband, Bobby Cannavale, are expecting their second child.”
“Congratulations Rose Byrne!”


“… Special attention... "
"Although we can only wait to see if Rocco will have a younger brother or sister, there is no doubt that there is already a toddler in the family, and the expectant mother really needs some..."
"Bourne and cannavale are already parents of their son Rocco, who was born in February 2016."
She also starred in the X-Men series and played a key role alongside Oprah Winfrey in HBO's Henrietta's immortal life
"As fans of the actress know, this is not entirely her first attempt at humor; Byrne's expression in bridesmaids and neighbors is unforgettable."
"Bourne is referring to the upcoming" juliet, naked, "a dramedy based on Nick Hornby's book
"Everyone is very sweet on the set today. It's great that you always get more attention when you're pregnant."
"I'm a little tired, but I feel good," David Jens said yesterday, sharing the good news on the Australian website
The Australian actress and her husband, Bob cannaval, are pregnant with a second child
"Congratulations to rose Bourne!"



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He is an avid fan of the "Bachelor" franchise and launched a social media campaign last year to get "Bachelor" Nick Viall kicked off of "Dancing with the Stars" because of Viall's behavior with Andi Dorfman in "The Bachelorette."”
“Shatner appears to be very keyed into the modern dating scene.”
“The 87-year-old actor then asked his followers to tell him their perfect date.”
“Shatner was promoting a perfect date contest for site Match.com in a video he posted on Instagram about the scene: "And to think it was 20 years ago that I asked the question," he said.”
“The line has gone down in history as one of the most iconic calendar dates in pop culture, along with "It's October 3rd" from "Mean Girls."”
“All you need is a light jacket."”
“I'd have to say April 25th, because it's not too hot, not too cold.”
“In the film, Shatner plays pageant host Stan Fields in the 2000 film when he says, "Miss Rhode Island, describe your perfect date," to which the contestant responds, "That's a tough one.”
“Not too hot, not too cold -- just bring a light jacket."”
“On Wednesday, the actor commemorated the moment from the film "Miss Congeniality" when Miss Rhode Island described the perfect date in the film by saying in a new social media video, "The perfect date, remember?”


"He's a big fan of the bachelor series and launched a social media campaign last year to make Nick Villar in Bachelor debut in dance with the stars because of his behavior with Andy doffman in bachelor."
"Shatner seems to be very keen on modern dating."
"The 87 year old actor asked his followers to tell him about their perfect date."
Shatner is promoting a perfect dating match for the website Match.com He posted a video of the scene on instagram: "think I asked this question 20 years ago," he said
As one of the most iconic calendar dates in popular culture, this line goes down in history with "October 3" in "mean girl"
"You just need a light jacket."
"I have to say April 25th, because it's not too hot or too cold."
In the film, Shatner, who played beauty pageant host Stan fields in the 2000 film, said, "Miss Rhode Island, please describe your perfect date." "It's a tough time," the contestant replied
"Not too hot, not too cold - just a light jacket."
On Wednesday, Miss Rhode Island described the perfect date in a new social media video, in which the actor commemorated the moment in the movie Miss crush: "perfect date, remember?"



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more on the upcoming second season of Riverdale, watch below.”
“But the thing is, it's half death threats because they don't want that [actually] happening, and there's half that's just all love."”
“The 20-year-old Riverdale star took to Twitter on Monday to call out a fan who reportedly called her and her co-stars "disgusting and rude" after an encounter in downtown Vancouver, where the CW show films.”
“RELATED: 'Riverdale' Season 2: New Poster Suggests Someone Dies!”
“Plus, 'Supergirl' Visits Betty and Veronica"You do not have the right to approach STRANGERS and throw your arms around us like you know us.”
“What you did was not cool and inappropriate," Reinhart tweeted.”
“"Cole's response to you was 'do I know you?'”
“After you rudely invaded our space and got in our faces."”
“"It's easy to make us look like the bad guys because you think there's no chance in hell we would ever call you out on it," she continued.”
“"Here you go ?."”


"For more information about the upcoming Riverdale Season 2, see below."
"But the problem is that half of it is death threats because they don't want it to happen, and the other half is just love."
The 20-year-old Riverdale star tweeted on Monday that a fan who met her and her partner in downtown Vancouver called her and her partner "disgusting and rude" and CW was showing movies in Vancouver
Related report: Riverdale Season 2: new poster suggests someone's dead
"And Supergirl visits Betty and Veronica." you don't have the right to approach strangers and hug us like you know us. "
"What you're doing is not cool or appropriate," Reinhart tweeted
"Cole's answer to you is," do I know you? "
"After you invade our space and attack us in front of us."
"It's easy to make us look like bad guys because you don't think we can call you out at all," she continued
"Here you are?"



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more Twitter reactions below.”
““I haven’t shaved my head yet.”The “Teenage Dream” singer has yet to publicly address her controversial Obama joke.”
“Katy Perry came under fire over the weekend after she compared dying her black hair blonde to former President Barack Obama being replaced by Donald Trump.”
“During an Instagram Live session on Saturday, April 29, the “Bon Appétit” singer read a series of fan questions aloud.”
““Oh, someone says, ‘I miss your old black hair,'” she said before sarcastically replying, “Oh, really?”
“Do you miss Barack Obama as well?”
“Oh, OK. Times change.”
“Bye!”
“See you guys later.”Perry then started laughing and turned around to look at her friends, seemingly searching for their approval.”
““I should leave now,” she said, still giggling.”


"See more twitter reactions below."
"I haven't shaved my head yet." The "Teen Dream" singer has yet to publish her controversial Obama joke
"Katy Perry came under fire last weekend for comparing her dying blonde black hair to the replacement of former President Barack Obama by Donald Trump."
"In instagram live on Saturday, April 29, the" Bon app é tit "singer read aloud a series of fan questions."
"Oh, someone said, 'I miss your old black hair,'" she said sarcastically, "Oh, really?"
"Do you miss Obama, too?"
"Oh, well. Times have changed. "
"Goodbye!"
"See you later." Perry laughed and turned to look at her friends as if seeking their approval
"It's time for me to go," she said, giggling



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The actor will next star in Logan Lucky with Adam Driver, while Dewan serves as the host of the NBC reality competition World of Dance.”
“Tatum and Dewan celebrated their eighth wedding anniversary in July.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoAug. 2 (UPI) -- Channing Tatum says his daughter isn't a fan of Step Up.”
“The 37-year-old actor said on Monday's episode of Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“...that 4-year-old Everly asked for "a real movie" after he and wife Jenna Dewan attempted to show her their film Step Up.”
“Advertisement"We actually showed her Step Up for the first time," Tatum told host Jimmy Kimmel.”
“"We were like, 'This is going to be really cool.”
“It's got dancing, she's going to love it.'”
“Within 10 seconds, she was like, 'Can I watch a real movie?”
“Like, a good one?'"”


"The actor will play lucky Logan with Adam deriver, while Dewan will host the NBC reality show dance world."
"Tatum and Dewan celebrated their eighth wedding anniversary in July."
"Information photo of Jim luhman / UPI | license photo August. On the 2nd, Channing Tatum said that his daughter did not like "step by step"
"The 37 year old actor said on Monday's Jimmy Kimmel live show!"
“…… After he and his wife, Jenna Dewan, tried to show her their movie "step by step," the 4-year-old asked for a real movie
"We're actually getting her up for the first time," Tatum told host Jimmy Kimmel
"We said," it's going to be cool. "
"It can dance and she'll like it."
"In less than 10 seconds, she thought," can I see a real movie? "
"A good one, for example?"



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoomImage zoom...”
““Make a wish,” the mom of three captioned a gif of her throwing a coin over her shoulder at the famous site.”
“Image zoom Credit: TheImageDirectImage zoomImage zoomThey also visited the Trevi Fountain, where she and Bendjima tossed some change into the water for good luck.”
“Image zoomImage zoomKardashian shared photos of a gorgeous sunset setting off the architecture of the Castel Sant’Angelo, and even played wedding photographer, snapping a just-married couple outside the landmark.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Keeping Up with the Kardashians star, 39, and her model boyfriend, 25, have been exploring the streets of Rome on their latest jet-setting vacation and hitting up all the must-see tourist spots.”
“The couple played tourists, visiting the Eternal City's most famous sites, even tossing a coin in Trevi FountainKourtney Kardashian and Younes Bendjima are soaking up the romance of the Eternal City!”


Image zoom image zoom
"Make a wish," the mother of Three wrote in a GIF picture, throwing a coin at the famous spot
"The image direct image zoom image zoomthey also visited Trevi fountain, where she and benjima threw some change into the water for good luck."
"Photo zoomimagezoomgardashian shared a beautiful sunset setting off the building of Saint angel's castle, and even played the role of wedding photographer, taking a picture of a newly married couple outside the landmark."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 39 year old Kardashian star and her 25-year-old model boyfriend spent their last jet vacation exploring the streets of Rome and visiting all the must see attractions
"The couple play tourists, visit the most famous attractions of eternal city, and even toss coins in Trevi fountain. Kardashian and younsbenjima are immersed in the romance of eternal city!"



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Gwen Stefani Reveals Just How Much Blake Shelton Helped Inspire 'Christmas Eve'Gwen Stefani Duets With Boyfriend Blake Shelton as Her Kids Share an Adorable Christmas Tradition This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Gwen Stefani and Her Kids Celebrate Blake Shelton's 'Voice' Victory -- Their Reaction Is Priceless!”
“RELATED CONTENT:Nick Jonas Hangs With His Niece, Miley Cyrus & Fam Rock Ugly Sweaters, Plus More Celeb Christmas Celebrations!”
“For more on the Stefani boys' Christmas traditions, watch the video below.”
“Gwen Stefani/InstagramGwen Stefani/InstagramNot a bad way to spend the holidays!”
“The night before, the queen of Christmas made sure to get kisses from all of her boys under the mistletoe, and they all enjoyed dinner with their extended family.”
“Gwen Stefani/InstagramAnd the No Doubt frontwoman even had a stacked gingerbread house with a sign over the front door that read "You Make Me Feel Like Christmas," which also happens to be the name of her holiday album.”
“Watch:Gwen was also decked out, snapping pics in her elf jammies, which she's shown off on Instagram before.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Gwen Stefani revealed to what extent Blake Shelton helped inspire the duet between Gwen Stefani and her boyfriend Blake Shelton on Christmas Eve because her children shared a lovely Christmas tradition. This video is not available because we can't load sponsor information."
"Gwen Stephanie and her children celebrate the victory of black Shelton's voice - their reaction is priceless!"
"Related content: Nick Jonas and his niece, Miley Cyrus and family rock ugly sweaters, plus more celebrity Christmas celebrations!"
"For more information about Stefani boys' Christmas tradition, watch the following video."
"Gwen Stefani / instagram Gwen Stefani / instagram is not a bad way to go on holiday!"
"The night before yesterday, the queen of Christmas had to get kisses from all the boys under the mistletoe. They all had dinner with the extended family."
"Gwen Stefani / instagram and, without a doubt, even has a mountain of gingerbread houses with a sign on the front door saying," you make me feel like Christmas. "That's exactly the name of her holiday album
"Observation: Gwen, she's also dressed up and photographed in ELF pajamas, which she showed on instagram before."



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s what drives him,” Scarborough said.”
“Donald Trump is all about money.”
“But even that premise may be faulty if you consider one question: Is Trump even going to run?”
“MSNBC “Morning Joe” co-host Joe Scarborough believes Trump will voluntarily be a one-term president, he told CBS’ Stephen Colbert on Thursday, alongside co-host Mika Brzezinski.”
“Colbert doesn’t want that to happen.”
“And it’s not just to keep delivering a reliable stream of monologue taunts.”
“The “Late Show” discussion turned to the disappearance of Washington Post contributing columnist Jamal Khashoggi and Trump’s soft approach and reluctance to pressure the Saudis amid mounting evidence of Khashoggi’s killing by men close to Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman.”
“Trump, who advanced the idea of “rogue killers” responsible for Khashoggi’s death, helped sow doubt the Saudi government orchestrated the killing, Brzezinski said.”
“And she said it was similar to how Trump defused sexual assault allegations against Supreme Court Justice Brett Kavanaugh during his nomination process.”
““That can’t be our reality, and at some point this has to end, one way or another,” Brzezinski said.”


"That's his motivation," Scarborough said
"Donald Trump is for money."
"But if you think about one question, even that premise can be wrong: will trump run?"
"Joe Scarborough, co host of MSNBC's Good Morning Joe, believes trump will volunteer to be president, and he told CBS's Stephen Colbert on Thursday, along with co host Mika Brzezinski."
"Colbert didn't want that."
"And it's not just about constantly providing reliable monologue mockery."
"The discussion of the 'evening show' turned to the disappearance of Washington Post columnist kashuji and the growing evidence that kashuji was killed by people close to crown prince Muhammad bin Salman. Trump is moderate and unwilling to put pressure on Saudi Arabia."
"Trump put forward the idea that" rogue killer "should be responsible for kashuji's death, and he helped create suspicion that the Saudi government planned the murder," Brzezinski said
"This is similar to trump's resolution of sexual assault charges against Supreme Court justice Brett Kavanaugh in the nomination process," she said
"It can't be our reality, in a way, it has to end in a way," Brzezinski said



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more Late Late Show fun, watch the clip below!”
“Now get this motherf**king hack off this motherf**king stage!”MORE: James Corden, Jeffrey Tambor, and Jon Boyega Spoof Brandy & Monica’s Iconic ‘The Boy Is Mine’ Music VideoCorden has participated in rap battles with many other A-listers, includingAnne Hathaway, David Schwimmer, and Cara Delevingne.”
““You got your a** kicked by a man twice your age.”
“The bright side is you battle me and now people know your name,” he quipped.”
“Did I hurt your feelings, James?”
““He’s rattled!”
“You’re known for Pulp Fiction and other big hits, but 90 percent of your IMDB page is s**t.”Jackson got the last word, though, quoting his iconic line from Snakes on a Plane.”
“Corden went on to reference some of Jackson’s best movies, rapping, “Now you get torn apart, like I’m a velociraptor and this is Jurassic Park.”
“No one knows who are you are without Adele in a car… In the Emoji Movie I hear you just play a hand, so look, I’m going to put it in a way you can understand,” prompting him to flip Corden the bird.”
“That’s how he buys all those damn Kangol hats.”WATCH: EXCLUSIVE: James Corden Reveals His Favorite 'Carpool Karaoke' Ever: 'I Got a Bit Depressed Afterwards'But then the 68-year-old actor jumped in, rapping, “I feel bad for you son, ‘cause I’m the real star.”


"For more fun in the evening, watch the following clip!"
"Now get this son of a bitch off this son of a bitch's stage! "More: James Colden, Geoffrey temple and Jon boyga spoof brandy and Monica's iconic music video" boy is mine. "Colden has participated in rap competitions with many other first-line stars, including Anne Hathaway, David Schwimmer and Carla delaviny."
"You were kicked by a man twice your age."
"The good side is that you fight me, and now people know your name," he joked
"Did I hurt your feelings, James?"
"He's panicking!"
"You are famous for vulgar novels and other popular works, but 90% of your IMDB pages are s * * t." However, Jackson quoted his classic line from snake on the plane and said his last sentence
Cordon went on to quote some of Jackson's best movies, rap, "now you're torn, like I'm a Velociraptor, this is Jurassic Park."
"No Adele in the car, no one knows who you are In the emoticon movie, I hear you are just playing with a hand, so look, I want to express it in a way you can understand, "prompting him to flip the bird's rope
"That's how he bought those damn Kangol hats." Observation: exclusive: James Colden revealed his favorite "carpool karaoke": "later I was a bit depressed," but then the 68 year old actor jumped in and rapped, "I'm sorry for your son because I'm the real star."



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...this week that his styling credentials were confirmed by the Carter Knowles team...”
“The man in question Manuel Mendez has been on the Parkwood Entertainment payroll since September 2013 as a personal assistant though it remained unclear how long he has been image making the six year old as it wasn t until...”
“Oh no, the pint-sized clothes horse has one all of her own.”
“We should clarify - Blue Ivy does not share Beyonce’s stylist, Marni Senofonte.”
“...has her own stylist and personal shopper...”
“With her name trademarked at birth and a rumoured million dollars worth of baby presents her world debut was fittingly celebrity and now Queen Bey s team have confirmed via WWD that Blue Ivy at the tender age of six...”
“As the first born of musical royalty- R&B queen, Beyonce, and rapper and mogul, Jay Z- Blue Ivy’s star was always set on a path to the spotlight.”


“… This week his Styling Certificate was confirmed by the Carter Knowles team... "
"The man, Manuel Mendez, has been working as a personal assistant at Parkwood entertainment since September 2013, but it is not clear when he will shape the image of the 6-year-old until..."
"Oh, no, that pint size dress horse has one of her own."
"We should make it clear - Blue ivy is not the same as Beyonce's stylist, Mani sanofonte."
“… She has her own stylist and personal shopper... "
"Her name was registered as a trademark when she was born, and there is a legendary million dollar baby gift. Her world debut has just become a celebrity. Now the team of Queen Bei has confirmed through WWD that the blue ivy has grown up when she is 6 years old..."
"As the first birth of the music royal family - Queen R & B, Beyonce, rapper and tycoon, Jay Z. blue Ivy's star is always in the spotlight."



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The series, from Universal Television, Little Stranger, 3 Arts Entertainment and Bevel Gears, has amassed 16 Emmy nominations, including three in the Outstanding Comedy Series category over its first three seasons.”
“Fey and Carlock are executive producers alongside Sam Means, Jeff Richmond and David Miner.”
“Joining Kimmy on her journey are her best friend and roommate, Titus Andromedon (Burgess); her former-employer-turned-friend Jacqueline White (Krakowski); and landlord Lillian Kaushtupper (Kane).”
“It follows Kimmy Schmidt (Kemper) as she continues to adjust to the 21st century and learn more about who she really is.”
“The Emmy-nominated series, from 30 Rock duo Tina Fey and Robert Carlock, stars Ellie Kemper, Tituss Burgess, Jane Krakowski and Carol Kane.”
“The first six episodes will be available on May 30, and the second half of the season will premiere later in 2018.”
“The streaming service said today the fourth season will launch in two parts.”
“Netflix’s hit comedy series Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt will return in May for Season 4.”


The show, jointly launched by universal TV, little stranger, three arts entertainment and bevel gear, has won 16 Emmy nominations, including three nominations for excellent comedy in the first three seasons
"Fay and karock are executive producers with Sam mace, Jeff Richmond and David Mina."
Also on the journey with Kimmy are her best friend and roommate Titus andromedon (Burgess); her former employer's friend Jacqueline white (Krakowski); and her landlord Lillian kaushtuper (Kane)
"As Kimmy Schmidt (Kemper) continues to adapt to the 21st century and learn more about himself, this book comes out."
"The Emmy nominations series, starring 30 rock groups Tina Fay and Robert carrock, with Ellie camper, Titus Burgess, Jane Krakowski and Carol Kane."
"The first six episodes will be released on May 30, and the second half of the season will premiere later in 2018."
"The streaming service said today that the fourth quarter will be launched in two parts."
"Netflix's hit comedy series" unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt "will return to fourth season in May."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(Who needs rent, right?)”
“Guess we’ll just have to stick on gawking at pictures or splurge on the once-in-a-lifetime purchase.”
“The fashion girls’ Max Mara favorite retails at $3,950—about $1,600 less than Kardashian’s, but still a pricy buy.”
“If Kardashian’s $5,600 Balenciaga coat is out of your price range, you won’t have much luck with Hosk, Huntington-Whiteley, and Baldwin’s favorite.”
“Baldwin kept the casual looking going a month later in January with a messy bun and comfy sneakers.”
“A day after Huntington-Whiteley paired the coat with luxe leggings and pleather booties, Hosk styled the outerwear with cropped light-washed jeans and a denim shirt.”
“(Not exactly the same as Kim’s but pretty close.)”
“Huntington-Whiteley was the first to wear it when she stepped out in New York City in December bundling herself up in Max Mara’s Teddy Bear Icon Coat.”
“If the coat looked familiar, it’s because three of fashion’s most notable “It” girls wore near-identical jackets a couple months prior.”
“The “Keeping Up with the Kardashians” star paired the light-brown trench—which retails for a whopping $5,600—with gray sweat pants, a hot-pink sports bra, and white heeled booties.”


"Who needs rent, right?"
"It's estimated that we can only continue to look at the photos, or squander our once-in-a-lifetime purchases."
"Fashion girl Max Mara favorite retails for $3950, which is $1600 lower than Kardashian's, but it's still very expensive."
"If Kardashian's $5600 Balencia coat is out of your price range, the favorites of horsk, Huntington Whiteley and Baldwin won't bring you any good luck."
"A month later, in January, Baldwin was wearing a messy bun and comfortable sneakers, maintaining a casual style."
Huntington Whiteley paired the jacket with lavish tights and pleated boots. A day later, horsk paired the jacket with irregularly washed jeans and a denim shirt
"(it's not exactly the same as Kim's, but it's very close.)
"Last December, Huntington Whiteley came out of New York City wearing Max Mara's teddy bear logo coat and was the first to wear it."
If the coat looks as like as two peas, it is because a few months ago, the three most fashionable it girls in fashion were wearing almost identical jackets.
The "catch up with Kardashian" star paired the $5600 retail light brown trench with grey sweatpants, pink sports underwear and white high heels



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This year, critics wonder if Starbucks is using its holiday cups to promote homosexuality.”
“...controversy...”
“This year s cup features nods to Christmas tradition including a decorated Christmas tree and was introduced by an online video that proclaimed the holidays mean something different to everyone But that big tent approach wasn t enough to avoid...”
“Some have come and gone with little commotion, but others have drawn the ire of conservatives for what some have seen as a secular design scheme that failed to show proper respect for Christianity.”
“Starbucks has produced holiday cups for 20 years.”
“Thanksgiving is right around the corner, which means it is time to embark on a modern American holiday tradition: over-analyzing seasonally available Starbucks cups for signs of liberal nefariousness.”


"This year, critics have questioned whether Starbucks is using Festival cups to promote homosexuality."
“… Dispute... "
"This year's World Cup pays homage to Christmas traditions, including a decorated Christmas tree, and is introduced by an online video that claims that festivals mean different things to everyone, but the practice of big tents is not enough to avoid..."
"Some people come and go, causing little disturbance, but others are outraged by conservatives because some people think that secular design fails to show proper respect for Christianity."
"Starbucks has been producing holiday cup for 20 years."
Thanksgiving is just around the corner, which means it's time to start a modern American holiday tradition: over analyzing the seasonal supply of Starbucks cups, looking for signs of liberal evil



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That’s not a mistake, that’s a full season of Law & Order.””
““You assaulted dozens of women.”
“Corden, the host of The Late Late Show, was master of ceremonies at the gala for amfAR, a foundation for Aids research, on Friday evening.”
“McGowan also said that CBS, who broadcast Corden’s Late Late Show should donate to a women’s charity, or they too “support rape culture”.”
““Oh come on!” said Corden.”
““Harvey Weinstein wanted to come tonight but he’ll settle for whatever potted plant is closest.”That joke prompted more groans.”
“Ask any of the women who watched him take a bath … it’s weird watching Harvey Weinstein in hot water.”
“If you don’t like that joke you should probably leave now.”Emboldened, he continued: “It has been weird this week hasn’t it, watching Harvey Weinstein in hot water.”
“Corden said: “I don’t know whether that groan was that you liked that joke or you don’t like that joke.”
“...massage...”


"It's not a mistake, it's a complete season of law and order."
"You attacked dozens of women."
Later on Friday night, show host Corden officiated at the ceremony of the aamfar foundation.
McGovern also said that CBS, who broadcasts Colden's later shows, should donate it to a women's charity, otherwise they also "support the rape culture."
"Oh, come on! "Said cordon
"Harvey Weinstein wants to come tonight, but as long as it's the closest potted plant, he'll be satisfied." The joke caused more groans
"Ask the woman who saw him bathe It's strange to watch Harvey Weinstein soak in hot water. "
"If you don't like that joke, you should go now." "Isn't it strange to see Harvey Weinstein in the hot water this week?" he continued
"I don't know if that moan is whether you like that joke or you don't like that joke," cordon said
“… Massage... "



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Just hit 'Like' on our Digital Spy Facebook page and 'Follow' on our @digitalspy Twitter account and you're all set.”
“Want up-to-the-minute entertainment news and features?”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“I get HUGE anxiety (always fun) Insecure, not really."”
“I am familiar with depression.”
“This isn't the first time Lena has spoken about her mental health struggles, telling a fan on Twitter last year: "I overthink for sure.”
“After their talk, Bear described the Game of Thrones star as "authentic, honest and vulnerable", praising her mental strength.”
“"It's not all smooth sailing, but it makes it interesting," Lena added.”
“Steve Granitz/WireImageBear then suggested that people assume celebrities have it "all buttoned up and together" before adding that he believes it's a "great lie" as everyone's just trying to live their life.”


"Just click 'like' on our Digital Spy Facebook page and 'follow' on our @ Digital Spy twitter account."
"Want the latest entertainment news and features?"
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from twitter."
"I'm very anxious (always fun) and insecure, not really."
"I'm familiar with depression."
"It's not the first time Lina has talked about her mental health," she told a twitter fan last year. "I must have thought too much."
After their conversation, bell described the star in the game of thrones as "real, honest and vulnerable" and praised her spiritual strength
"It's not all plain sailing, but it makes it interesting," Li added
Steve granitz / wiremegebear went on to suggest that people assume that celebrities "all put it together" and then added that he thought it was a "great lie" because everyone was trying to live their own life



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'You can look at someone else’s life and say, "Well, obviously, you shouldn’t marry that guy," and it makes you feel like God for 30 minutes,' she said.”
“It's understandable that the actress would not want to miss the Housewives of New York's reactions to the divorce, since every single one of them warned the former countess against marrying Tom.”
“...month marriage to Tom D Agostino last month...”
“But the Oscar winning actress 27 wasn t freaking out for the reason you might expect but rather because she realized the Real Housewives of New York isn t currently in production and without cameras rolling she might miss the...”
“...priceless moments that followed Luann s divorce...”
“Calling herself kind of a producer of all of the Real Housewives J Law shared that she immediately texted the mastermind behind the Bravo franchise Andy Cohen to give him instructions on how to cover the 52 year old s...”
“...divorce on the show...”
“Scroll down for videoNumber one fan!”
“Jennifer Lawrence 27 pictured with Bravo showrunner Andy Cohen said she was horrified after hearing of Real Housewife of New York Luann de Lessep s divorce Jimmy loves it The Oscar winner made the comments during an appearance on the...”
“Tonight Show with Jimmy Fallon on Tuesday My stomach dropped because I realized that I had just seen the reunion which means they aren t filming...”


"You can look at other people's lives and say, 'obviously, you shouldn't marry that guy,' which makes you feel like God in 30 minutes," she said
The actress didn't want to miss the New York housewives' understandable reaction to the divorce, as each of them warned the former Countess not to marry Tom
“… Married Tom dagostino last month... "
"But the 27 year old Oscar winning actress didn't panic because of what you might think, but because she realized that" the real housewife of New York "hasn't been shown yet, and she might miss it if there were no cameras..."
“…… The priceless moment after Lu an's divorce... "
"She claimed to be the producer of the real housewife, J. law, and said she immediately sent a text message to Andy Cohen, the behind the scenes director of the Bravo series, instructing him how to report the 52 year old s..."
“… Divorce in the show... "
"Scroll down video fan 1!"
"Jennifer Lawrence took a picture with Bravo host Andy Cohen on the 27th. She said that she was shocked to hear the news of the divorce of New York real housewife Luan de lessepp. The Oscar winner made this comment in the New York Times..."
"I lost my stomach on Tuesday night's show with Jimmy Fallon because I realized I just saw the reunion, which means they didn't shoot..."



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Instead, they brought Prince George and Princess Charlotte to church with Kate’s family in Englefield, England, near her childhood home.”
“Sign up for our newsletter to get the latest updates on Kate Middleton, Meghan Markle and more!”
“Meghan Markle and Prince Harry are gearing up for a traditional royal Christmas!”
“For their second holiday together – and first as a married couple and soon-to-be parents!”
“– Meghan and Harry will head to Norfolk for Christmas with the Queen at Sandringham, the 92-year-old monarch’s country home about 110 miles north of London.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“They’ll take part in a number of traditions.”
“Guests usually arrive in the early afternoon on Christmas Eve and exchange gifts.”
“After their church outing on the big day, the royal family heads back to Sandringham House for a lunch of Norfolk turkey and other festivities.”
“Can’t get enough of PEOPLE’s Royals coverage?”


Instead, they took Prince George and Princess Charlotte to the church in englfield, England, and Kate's family was near her childhood home
"Sign up for our newsletters and get the latest news from Kate Middleton, Megan markel and others!"
Megan markel and Prince Harry are preparing for a traditional royal Christmas
"For their second vacation together - the first as a married couple and soon to be parents!"
"Megan and Harry are going with the queen to Norfolk for Christmas in Sandringham, the 92 year old king's country house 110 miles north of London."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"They will take part in some traditional activities."
"Guests usually arrive early in the afternoon on Christmas Eve and exchange gifts."
After a church outing on grand day, the royal family returned to Sandringham palace for a Norfolk Turkey lunch and other celebrations
"Is there not enough coverage of the royal family?"



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It hasn’t been announced where the couple will fly to for a romantic break after their wedding, but the plans will have to wait after the newly-weds delayed their travels for a series of royal engagements.”
“"It’s a really simple, elegant piece that’s just very true to her personal style."”
“The new Duchess of Sussex commissioned six stunning gold bracelets from California-based fine jewelry brand Zofia Day, People reports.”
“7 Meghan Markle gave six of her nearest and dearest a special gift on her big day Credit: WPA RotaThe delicate pieces, which cost £335 ($450) each and are appropriately called The Kensington, feature a fine chain and a solid gold disc.”
“Meghan presented the bracelet to her stylist and best pal Jessica Mulroney, who helped guide the page boys and bridesmaids, including her four-year-old daughter Ivy, into the chapel alongside the Duchess of Cambridge.”
“Her sister-in-law also received the golden gift, as did entrepreneur and entertainment lawyer Benita Litt, whose daughters Rylan and Remi Meghan is godmother to.”
“The former Suits actress also commissioned matching necklaces for Benita's daughters, who were her bridesmaids on the big day, as well as Jessica's daughter Ivy.”
“7 The delicate pieces cost 335 each and are appropriately called The Kensington Credit Zofia Day Lisette Polny founder of Zofia Day which uses ethically sourced materials for its pieces said It s an overwhelming honour to be part of history and for my pieces to be given as a...”
“...keepsake for this momentous occasion...”
“Meghan has long been a fan of the brand, wearing a pair of earrings on the cover of Vanity Fair last September and donning a £415 arrow shaped stud on her right ear on a royal engagement with Harry in Cardiff.”


"It has not been announced where the couple will fly for a romantic holiday after their marriage, but the plan will have to wait after the couple's travel has been delayed due to a series of Royal appointments."
"It's a very simple and elegant piece, very much in line with her personal style."
According to people, the Duchess of new Sussex commissioned California's high-end jewelry brand Zofia day to make six amazing gold bracelets
"On her big day, Megan markel gave a special gift to her six closest people: WPA's exquisite rotating works, each worth 335 pounds (450 dollars), appropriately known as Kensington, with a delicate chain and a pure gold disc."
Megan gave the bracelet to her stylist and best friend Jessica muroni, who helped page's boys and bridesmaids, including her four-year-old daughter ivy, walk into church with the Duchess of Cambridge
"Her sister-in-law also received the gold gift, and so did Benita little, an entrepreneur and entertainment lawyer. Her daughters, Ryan and Remy Megan, were her godmothers."
"The former star also commissioned matching necklaces for Benita's daughter (her bridesmaid on big day) and Jessica's daughter ivy."
"7 these exquisite works of art, worth 335 pounds each, are aptly called Kensington credit Zofia day. Lisette polny, the founder of Zofia day, said that they can become part of history and take my works as I feel very honored. "
“… To commemorate this important moment... "
"Megan has long been a fan of the brand, wearing a pair of earrings on the cover of vanity fair last September and a 415 pound arrow stud on her right ear at Cardiff's royal engagement to Harry."



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to TMZ, the couple welcomed a boy and a girl named Nicholas and Lucy.”
“2017Sixteen years after they first met, Iglesias and Kournikova reportedly became parents over the weekend.”
“In December, they jetted to London and once again fueled wedding rumors when Kournikova was snapped with yet another plain band on her ring finger.”
“Image zoom Enrique Iglesias and Anna Kournikova | Credit: Issac Baldizon/NBAE/GettyAnd the next year, Kournikova was photographed goofing around in a bikini with Iglesias while they prepared to board a boat in Miami.”
“In 2006, they sat front and center at the Cleveland Cavaliers vs. Miami Heat game in Miami, posed for photos at Big Pink restaurant and capped off the year with a date at Mauro’s Cafe in December.”
“2006 – 2012The pair appeared to be going strong for nearly a decade.”
“Image zoom Anna Kournikova | Credit: Jason Squires/WireImageReports circulated the duo had wed in a secret ceremony in Puerto Vallarta, but sources told PEOPLE at the time the rumors were false.”
“She later sported a simple band while out and about.”
“2004The rumor mill went into overdrive about a possible engagement — or wedding — when Kournikova stepped onto the court at the World Team Tennis match with a blindingly large pink diamond ring on her ring finger.”
“...shirt...”


According to TMZ, the couple welcomed a boy and a girl named Nicholas and Lucy
According to reports, Iglesias and Kournikova became parents at the weekend 16 years after their first meeting
Last December, when they flew to London, Kournikova wore another ordinary ring on her ring finger, which once again sparked wedding rumors
"Image zooming Enrique Iglesias and Anna Kournikova | image source: Issac baldizon / NBAE / gettyan the following year, Kournikova was photographed hanging out with Iglesias in a bikini as she was preparing to board a ship in Miami."
"In 2006, they sat in the front row and in the middle of the Miami Cleveland Cavaliers' game against the Miami Heat, posed for photos at the big pink restaurant, and dated at the Mauro cafe in December, ending the year."
"From 2006 to 2012, the two seem to have performed strongly in the past 10 years."
Image zooming Anna Kournikova | source: Jason squires / wire image reports reported that the two had a secret wedding in the port of barialta, but a source told people that the rumors at that time were false
"Later, she played a simple band while walking around outside."
"In 2004, when Kournikova stepped onto the court wearing a big pink diamond ring on her ring finger in a world tennis team match, rumors about her possible engagement or marriage became too heated."
“… "Shirt..."



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“ET.”
“The Late Late Show airs on CBS Weeknights at 12:35 a.m.”
“Watch the hilarious moment in the clip above.”
““Guess who you’re never dating?”Eventually, Dreyfus picked a winner for Romano’s son and the two headed off on a successful dinner date — in one of the CBS’ studios conference rooms.”
““I have two sons, “ Dreyfus joked.”
““Seinfeld or Everybody Loves Raymond?” After all three say they prefer Romano’s former sitcom to Dreyfus’, the actress feigned outrage over the choice.”
““This one’s even more important, Julia stay out of this,” he said.”
““But I do know Greg, so this is an important question for all three of you.”After getting mixed reactions to asking the trio to choose between the Yankees and Red Sox, Romano moved on to more pressing matters.”
““Do you have a good therapist?”“I honestly have no idea, they don’t talk to us so I have no idea.” Romano joked of knowing about his sons’ sex lives, before turning back to the three women.”


"For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, please subscribe to the YouTube page of American weekly."
"Wait a minute."
"The evening program is on CBS weeknights at 12:35."
"Look at the funny moments in the clip above."
"Guess who you've never dated? "In the end, Dreyfus picked a winner for Romano's son and they had a successful dinner date in a CBS studio conference room."
"I have two sons," Dreyfus joked
"Song Fei or everyone loves Raymond? "All three said they preferred Romano's previous sitcoms to Dreyfus," the actress pretended to be angry at the choice
"It's more important, Julia, don't get involved," he said
"But I do know Greg, so it's an important issue for all three of you." Romano's reaction was mixed after asking the trio to choose between the Yankees and the Red Sox, so he turned to a more pressing issue
"Do you have a good psychologist? "I really don't know. They don't talk to us, so I don't know." Romano joked that he knew about his son's sex life and then turned to three women



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and NBC are both part of the NBCUniversal family.”
“And Season 12 coach Gwen Stefani brought her former team member Hunter Place up to co-perform Stefani’s mid-1990s hit with her then-band No Doubt, “Don’t Speak.”E!”
“Host Carson Daly announced his victory at the end of the season's two-night finale on Tuesday.”
“Blue was a member of Coach Alicia Keys' team, and he performed "Everybody Hurts" with former "Voice" coach Usher for the finale.”
“Team Blake Shelton's Lauren Duski was the runner-up.”
“In third place was Team Blake's Aliyah Moulden, while Team Adam Levine's Jesse Larson came in fourth.”
“Before the winner was crowned, the four finalists had the opportunity to perform Tuesday night alongside music superstars.”
“Larson sang “Shining Star” with former "Voice" coach CeeLo Green.”
“Duski performed “Better Man” with country group Little Big Town, and Moulden performed with Alessia Cara.”
“Jennifer Hudson, who will be joining "The Voice" as a coach for Season 13 this fall, performed her new single “Remember Me.” Hudson previously served as a coach for the UK version of the show, which her contestant won.”


“… And NBC are part of the NBC global family. "
Season 12 coach Gwen Stephanie, along with her former teammate Hunter Plath, performed Stephanie's hit songs of the mid-1990s with her then band. There's no doubt, "don't talk!"
"Host Carson Daly announced his victory at the end of the two night final on Tuesday
Blu is part of coach Alicia case's team, and together with former "dubbing" coach Arthur, he performed "everyone's hurt" as the final episode
"Lauren dasky of black Shelton came in second
"In third place is black's Aria moden, and Adam Levin's Jesse Larsen is in fourth place
"Before the winner's coronation, the four finalists have a chance to perform with the music stars on Tuesday night."
Larson sang "shining stars" with former voice coach sylo green
Duski collaborated with village group little big town on better man, and molden with Alessia Cara
Jennifer Hudson, who will coach the voice for season 13 this fall, sings her new single remember me. Hudson coached the British version of the show, and her contestants won the title



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““So we’ll support that.””
““Her motherly instincts kicked in and she has to do what makes her happy,” she added of Khloé standing by Thompson, 27, throughout the cheating scandal.”
“Up with the Kardashians...”
“In a sneak peek at Sunday’s episode, Kris Jenner springs into action after she finds out that her daughter Khloé Kardashian is going into labor in Cleveland while the rest of the family is still in Los Angeles.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I gotta go.”
“I just moved the plane up and I think she’s in labor,” says Jenner, 62.”
““I knew we should have gone last night.”
“I knew it.”“Do you want me to go with you?” asks Kim Kardashian West, 38, who had originally wanted to stay in L.A. for a few days so she could attend her 20-year high school reunion.”
““No, you come in a couple of days,” Jenner says.”


"So we will support it."
"Her maternal instinct worked, and she had to do what made her happy," she added, adding that Thompson, 27, had been standing beside Carol throughout the cheating scandal
"With the kardashians..."
"While peeking at an episode on Sunday, Chris Jenner found out that his daughter, khlo é Kardashian, was giving birth in Cleveland while the rest of the family was still in Los Angeles, so he started."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I have to go."
"I just put the plane on and I think she's in labor," said Jenner, 62
"I knew we should have left last night."
"I knew that." "Do you want me to go with you? "Kim Kardashian West, 38, asked that she had planned to spend a few days in Los Angeles to attend her 20-year high school reunion."
"No, you'll come back in a few days," Jenner said



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ET to see what happens next.”
“...this Thursday at 10 p.m.”
“Tune into The Platinum Life on E!”
““There’s no words that can express, like, how happy I am,” Shantel gushes.”
““I don’t want to go back to the drawing board.”Lucky for her, the inserts work -- the pressure applied while walking with the “heel gummy” is way less than without!”
““So, I’m gonna rock that catwalk and I know she’s gonna pass.”The Ladies of 'The Platinum Life' Talk Love, Heartbreak & Drama on New Reality Series (Exclusive)“My heart is racing, my palms are sweaty,” Shantel says.”
““She has been busting her a** for so long putting this together,” Nazanin notes.”
“She’s there to walk in heels on a special runway, using Shantel’s invention.”
“Nelly’s girlfriend hits the lab to test out her stabilizing high heel inserts one last time before she brings them to market, alongside Miguel’s fiancee, Nazanin Mandi.”
“The answer is in ET’s exclusive first look at this week’s all-new episode of The Platinum Life.”


"Let's see what happens next."
"This Thursday at 10pm"
"Listen to platinum life on e!"
"There's no language to express, for example, how happy I am," Venter gushed
"I don't want to go back to the drawing board." Fortunately, the inserts work - walking with "heel glue" puts much less pressure than walking without it
"So, I want a rock show, and I know she'll be there." Platinum life's ladies in the new reality series (exclusive) "my heart is beating, my palms are sweating," says Shantel
"She's been trying to piece together these things for a long time," Nazarin said
"She walked on a special track in high heels, using Chantel's invention."
"Nelly's girlfriend went to the lab for the last time to test her high-heeled shoes before bringing them to the market, together with Miguel's fiancee Nazarin Mandy."
"The answer is in this week's new episode of life in platinum."



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Google John Cameron for information.”
“What evidence points to it not being Edwards?”
“Do you have any additional evidence that points to Edwards being the Zodiac?”
“Have you already heard about this connection?”
“What do you guys think?”
“He was interested in the mystery and studied the connection between the Zodiac and Edwards.]”
“[Cryptogram explained] [A podcast that discuses the evidence and includes an interview between Edwards and police officer, John Cameron.”
“A 13 letter cryptogram left by the Zodiac could be his name "Edward Edwards".”
“The timeline of his killings fit, as well as, his obsession with taunting the police.”
“[Bio and description of Murders committed by Edwards] [Bio and description of Zodiac Murders] [Zodiac sketch] [Picture of Edward Edwards] His age and MO is very similar to the Zodiac.”


"Google information for John Cameron."
"What's the evidence that it's not Edwards?"
"Do you have any other evidence that Edwards is in the zodiac?"
"Have you ever heard of this connection?"
"What do you think?"
"He was very interested in the mystery and studied the connection between the twelfth house and Edwards."
"[password interpretation] [podcast on evidence, including an interview between Edwards and police officer John Cameron."
The 13 letter code left by the zodiac may be his name "Edward Edwards"
"The timeline of his killing coincides with his obsession with ridiculing the police."
"His age and Mo are very similar to those of the zodiac."



**Something goes wrong**
“She explained at the time of the racy photos: “I’m like this in my real life.””
“She posed topless for a risque spread with V magazine in 2012.”
“This revealing shoot with Vogue isn’t the first time that the singer has dared to bare.”
“...wearing a look reminiscent of Twiggy Swarovski chainmail dress and knee high boots...”
“The magazine also shared three other photos of the songstress One showed Dion in a tunic and midcalf skirt as she headed to Monday s Christian Dior show a second saw her waving to the press at the Petit Palais and in the third she posed on a balcony while...”
“It was this same dress that the widow wore to husband Rene Angelil‘s funeral in January 2016.”
““For the past five years, she has worn haute couture near exclusively for her own performances.”The caption went on to detail a classic, simply cut Dior LBD that Dion, 49, purchased years ago, when John Galliano oversaw the fashion house.”
““Here’s a little naked fact to ponder while Celine Dion changes looks between shows,” the publication shared in a lengthy caption that explored the singer’s fashion experiences.”
“...the camera...”
“In a photo shared on the fashion magazine s Instagram account the seven time Grammy winner sits nude on a chair her right leg crossed over her left her arms wrapped around her torso with her left hand covering the lower part of her face as she gazes mysteriously into...”


"That's what I'm like in real life," she explained as she took the pictures
"In 2012, she took a pornographic picture with V magazine with her bare upper body."
"This exposure with vogue is not the first time the singer has dared to be naked."
“… Wearing a slim Swarovski chain dress and knee high boots
"The magazine also shared three other photos of the female singer, one of which is Dion wearing a tunic and skirt to the Christian Dior show on Monday, the second is she waving to the media at the little palace, the third is she posing on the balcony, and..."
"It's the same dress the widow wore at her husband Rene angelill's funeral in January 2016."
"For the past five years, she only wore haute couture in her own shows." The title goes on to describe in detail the classic, simple cut Dior LBD that Dion, 49, bought a few years ago when he was supervising a fashion shop in John Galliano
"When Celine Dion changes her looks between different shows, here's a little stark fact to ponder," the publication shares in a long title about the singer's fashion experience
“… Camera... "
"In a photo shared on instagram, a fashion magazine account, seven time Grammy winner is sitting naked in a chair with his right leg crossed on his left leg, arms around his trunk, his left hand covering the lower part of his face, staring mysteriously..."



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Anyone who’s making love work in a marriage knows it’s work.””
““There is a labor in love,” she said.”
“But things aren’t over.”
“The couple has repeatedly been spotted together around the Seattle area.”
“Sources close to them have told PEOPLE that they’re working on their marriage — and still in love.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“On Tuesday night’s Autobiography on A&E, Fualaau, now 34, declined to address the split directly.”
“When asked about it by a producer, he sheepishly smiled while Letourneau said, “We’re not talking about that.”While the couple themselves wouldn’t address it, their inner circle was given the green light to speak frankly about what went wrong in their notorious coupling.”
““When the news came out that he filed for separation, people were stunned,” friend Anne Bremner told the show.”
““They’d been together all this time.”• Want to keep up with the latest crime coverage?”


"Anyone who makes love work in marriage knows it's a job."
"There is a labor in love," she said
"But it's not over yet."
"The couple have been found together many times in the Seattle area."
"Sources around them tell people that they're working on their marriage - and they're still in love."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In his a & E autobiography on Tuesday night, the 34 year old refused to talk directly about the breakup."
When one producer asked about it, he laughed shyly, and letuno said, "we're not talking about it." Although the couple are reluctant to answer the question themselves, their inner circle is allowed to talk frankly about what's wrong with their infamous relationship
"When the news of his application for separation came out, people were shocked," friend Anne Bremner said on the show
"They've been together all the time." Do you want to know the latest crime reports? "



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can follow the New Titanic's Twitter account for updates on the project and to find out when your heart can go on IRL.”
“Though it could definitely be a must-visit for die-hard Titanic fans.”
“A pretty steep price to pay without the luxury of seeing Leo himself.”
“...amounting to hundreds of thousands of yuan...”
“The report says that preorders for overnight stays were first accepted in Hong Kong in June 2005 with tickets for a one night economy class stay starting at about 3 000 yuan 435 and the price for a luxury fare...”
“China Daily reports that the project will cost 1 billion yuan ($145 million) and already has booked visitors.”
“...got naughty and fogged up the windows...”
“The report says that the barge will have several facilities of the original Titanic including a ballroom theater swimming pool and premium first class rooms but no word yet on if it will include the car where Jack and Rose...”
“According to news agency Xinhua , construction has begun on "the world's first full-sized replica " of the most famous ship on the planet, and will be a permanent tourist attraction with a TBD completion date.”


"You can follow the twitter account of the new Titanic, keep abreast of the latest progress of the project, and know when your heart can enter the IRL."
"However, this is definitely a must for the fans of Titanic."
"If you don't see the luxury of Leo, the price is quite high."
“…… Hundreds of thousands of yuan... "
The report said that in June 2005, overnight booking was accepted for the first time in Hong Kong, with a ticket price of $3000 for three nights, a ticket price of $435 and a luxury ticket price of $1.
"According to China Daily, the project will cost 1 billion yuan (145 million US dollars) and has already reserved tourists."
“… I've made a mess of the window... "
"The report said that the barge will have some facilities of the original Titanic, including a dance hall, swimming pool and advanced first class cabin, but there is no news to say whether it includes Jack and Rose's car..."
"The world's first full-scale replica" of the world's most famous ship has begun construction and will become a permanent tourist attraction with a completion date to be determined, Xinhua reported



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...to today:Follow Allure on Instagram and Twitter, or subscribe to our newsletter for daily beauty stories delivered right to your inbox.”
“Check out the complete history of lipstick, from 3000 b.c.”
“Read more stories about cosmetic regulations and the beauty industry:Ready for another cosmetics deep dive?”
“"Being a mom, I have become really invested in that — I just feel like once I know something, I can't go backwards and pretend like I don't know it."”
“It's an ingredients blacklist that we don't allow into the products — no parabens, no sulfates," she told Into the Gloss in 2013.”
“"Since we started putting together our makeup collection, Kardashian Beauty, I've been extra invested in our list of no-no ingredients.”
“...and other retailers, Kardashian stressed that her top priority was making sure these products were high-quality.”
“Back when Kardashian Beauty products were available at the Kardashian sisters' DASH stores (R.I.P.)”
“Kardashian has been outspoken in the past about her commitment to using only the safest, healthiest ingredients.”
“Not only would this bill set new health and safety standards for cosmetics and other personal care products, it would allow the Food & Drug Administration to regularly review the safety of various ingredients in these products, according to the EWG.”


“… To this day: follow the temptation to send daily beauty stories directly to your in box on instagram and twitter, or subscribe to our newsletters. "
"Check the complete history of lipstick from 3000 BC."
Read more about cosmetics regulations and beauty industry: ready for another cosmetics dive
"As a mother, I'm very committed to this - I just feel that once I know something, I can't go back and pretend I don't know."
"This is a blacklist of ingredients and we are not allowed to enter the product - no parabens, no sulfates," she told the company in 2013
"I've invested extra in our ingredient free list since we started to organize our cosmetics line, the beauty of Kardashian."
“… As with other retailers, Kardashian stressed that her top priority is to ensure that these products are of high quality. "
"Back when there were Kardashian beauty products in R.I.P."
"Kardashian has been outspoken in the past, promising to use only the safest and healthiest ingredients."
EWG said the bill will not only set new health and safety standards for cosmetics and other personal care products, but also allow the food and drug administration to regularly review the safety of various ingredients in these products



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I relate to that, so I think that’s why I like her a lot.””
“Clarkson also added that she loves Pink's unapologetic nature, that, “She is who she is, and that’s cool if you like her, and it’s cool if you don’t.”
“Clarkson went on to gush over Pink's latest album Beautiful Trauma, "I love her because she has done the whole singer-songwriter record she recently did, she does pop, she loves rock."”
“I think if you project it enough, it might happen, right?” Looks like she was right.”
“"I’m a huge fan of Pink," Clarkson said, "I haven’t had the chance yet to work with her.”
“Earlier this month, Clarkson expressed wanting to collaborate with Pink at some point in a conversation with EW editor-in-chief Henry Goldblatt at one of the magazine's A-List events.”
“...favorite...”
“Both women will also have their own solo spotlight performances during the event with Pink playing the title track from her Beautiful Trauma album and Clarkson taking on a song from her Meaning of Life release and a surprise fan...”
“For the first time ever, the two stars will take the stage together to open the awards show.”
“Kelly Clarkson and Pink have now added to the already stellar lineup of performances scheduled for the 2017 AMAs.”


"I like her very much, so I think that's why I like her."
Clarkson added that she likes pink's nature of no regrets. "She's her. If you like her, it's cool. If you don't like her, it's cool."
Clarkson went on to talk about Pinker's latest album beautiful trauma. "I love her because she recently made a whole singer songwriter record. She does pop music. She loves rock and roll."
"I think if you plan enough, it might happen, right? "She seems to be right."
"I'm a big fan of pink and I haven't had a chance to work with her yet," Clarkson said
"Earlier this month, Clarkson said in a conversation with Henry Goldblatt, editor in chief of EW, that he wanted to work with pink at some point."
“… My favorite... "
"During the event, the two ladies will also have their own personal spotlight performance, pink will play the main track of her beautiful trauma album, Clarkson will sing a song from her" the meaning of life release "and a surprise fan..."
"This is the first time that the two stars have been on the stage together to preside over the award ceremony."
"Kelly Clarkson and Pinker have now joined the 2017 AMAS star lineup."



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I spoke what I felt was right, and both of them should be held accountable.””
““I’m the type of person to mind my own business and focus on my own issues, but at that moment I felt really uncomfortable,” she says.”
“I spoke my mind.”Prior to the comments made by Abraham, Wilkinson Baskett says she “didn’t even know Farrah existed,” but now that couldn’t be further from the truth.”
“I didn’t like it all.”
““You’re picking on someone who’s highly vulnerable and who’s highly not in self-control.”
““Farrah was supposed to have self-control and she voluntarily picked on [Paula] for her own amusement and for her own rating or whatever and I didn’t like it all,” she tells PEOPLE.”
““You’re going f—ing down, dude.”In a conversation about the finale, the Kendra on Top also says there were more sinister motivations behind the fight.”
“This bitch didn’t just offend Paula, she offended my husband and my kids, me,” says Wilkinson Baskett, 32, in a confessional.”
““I don’t throw out the f—ing race card like that.”
“The Teen Mom OG star makes some racially insensitive comments towards Paula, but it doesn’t sit too well with the former Playboy model, who shares two children with her African-American husband Hank Baskett.”


"I said what I thought was right, and both of them should be held responsible."
"I'm the kind of person who cares about my own affairs and my own problems, but I really felt uncomfortable at that moment," she said
"I said what I thought." Before Abraham commented, Wilkinson Basquet said she "didn't even know Farah existed," but now that's not far from the truth
"I don't like it all."
"You're picking someone who's very vulnerable and very uncontrollable."
"Farah should have had self-control. She chose (Paula) voluntarily for her entertainment, for her rating or something. I don't like it all," she told people
"Man, you're going to crash." In a conversation about the end, Kendra above also said that there were more evil motives behind the battle
"This bitch has not only offended Paula, but also my husband and children, as well as me," Wilkinson Basquet, 32, said at a confession
"I'm not going to throw away the f-ing card like this."
"The young mom, the og star, made some racist comments about Paula, but it's not in line with the former Playboy model, who has two children with her African American husband Hank Baskett."



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Both were arrested but have since been released.”
“The two 16 year olds who stole the moped sustained injuries.”
“"I asked Tom what happened, and he told me he chased him through my back garden and caught him around the block, but the route was like an assault course," the witness said.”
“The witness added that Hardy "clearly isn't a man you mess with," describing the teenager that Hardy stopped at a bus stop and patted down as "wrecked and in shock."”
“If the kid had been dumb enough to resist, I reckon Tom would have given him a good hiding."”
“He went off like a shot in pursuit and looked furious.”
“Tom must have been walking down the road.”
“Two boys on the nicked moped had jumped a red light and smashed into a car.”
“One witness said, "It was mental, like he'd switched to superhero mode in an action movie.”
“"This little shit nicked something, and now he's got himself a ­broken leg."”


"Both were arrested but later released."
"Two 16-year-old kids stole a moped and got hurt."
"I asked Tom what happened and he told me that he chased him through my back garden and caught him near the block, but the road was like a surprise route," the witness said
The witness added that Hardy "obviously wasn't the one you provoked." he described the teenager hardy stopped at a bus stop and photographed as "wrecked and shocked."
"If that child is stupid enough to resist, I think Tom will hide well."
"He ran after him like a shot and looked angry."
"Tom must have walked on the road."
"Two boys on a scratched moped ran through a red light and ran into a car."
"It's spiritual, like he's changed into a superhero in an action movie," one witness said
"This little guy hurt something, and now his own leg is broken."



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is unique...”
““I was like, ‘Oh that’s that feeling… okay!”
“And we were like Okay what we ve been doing wrong here because it was a country music event and we re both southern girls we were like We ve been dating skinny jeans and we need Wranglers Literally I m not joking he walked past us at that time...”
““Sometimes it sucks dating because it’s so many wrong ones until you get the right one.”
““My guitar player’s wife Ashley was my date for that night and we had just both been in crap relationships,” Clarkson explained.”
“...duet with Rascal Flatts on their tune What Hurts the Most Blackstock was the country group s tour manager at the time...”
“I just didn t have a clue Image zoom Credit Dimitrios Kambouris Getty Images Kelly Clarkson at the SiriusXM Meaning of Life album listening session The pair who married in 2013 first met at a rehearsal for the Academy of Country Music Awards in 2006 where she was performing a...”
“That’s what they were talking about in Waiting to Exhale.’ I just got it.”
“But there was something about him.”“I honestly thought I was asexual — I’d never been turned on like that in my whole life,” she said.”
““And he walked by, I was like, ready to take it all off.”


“… It's unique... "
"I thought," Oh, that's the feeling All right
"What we did wrong here, we are all good, because this is a country music event, we are all southern girls, we are like dating skinny jeans, we need a horse herder, I'm not kidding, he walked by us at that time..."
"Sometimes dating is bad because there are too many wrong people before you find the right one."
Clarkson explained: "my guitarist's wife Ashley was my date that night and we had a bad relationship."
“… Duet with hooligan frat in their tune what hurt the most black stock was the national team's travel manager at the time... "
"At the Sirius XM" the meaning of life "album concert, I knew nothing about the image of Dimitrios kambouris Getty Images Kelly Clarkson. The couple, who got married in 2013, met for the first time during a rehearsal at the 2006 Academy of country music awards ceremony when she was performing a song.... "
"That's what they say in waiting to exhale," I just got it. "
"But there's something about him." "I really thought I was asexual - I've never had sex like this in my life," she said
"He came up and I thought, ready to take it all off."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE TO COME”
“The Originals, which also had a midseason run this past season, was on the bubble as some had doubts whether the series could stand on its own without TVD but the vampire drama did solid ratings business succeeding the mothership series on Friday.”
“(read her entire heartfelt post below) Like with the original series, The Originals, which will return for its last chapter next midseason, will get a chance to craft a final chapter and allow fans to bid the show a proper good-bye.”
“Exactly a year after the end date for The Vampire Diaries was announced, The Originals creator/showrunner Julie Plec unveiled that the upcoming fifth season of the TVD spinoff will be its last.”
“The Originals is getting The Vampire Diaries treatment.”


"There's more"
"Last season's" the original "was also broadcast in the middle of the season, but because some people doubt whether the play can survive without TVD, the ratings of the" vampire "are stable after last Friday's" Mothership "series
(after reading her heartfelt post below) like the original series, the original will return in the last chapter of next season, when there will be an opportunity to create the last chapter and let fans bid farewell to the play appropriately
"A full year after the end date of the vampire diaries was announced, Julie Pleck, creator and host of the original, announced that the upcoming fifth season of TVD would be its last season."
"The original is being treated for Vampire Diaries."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“During her pregnancy journey, she kept fans in the loop with sweet bump photos.”
“The end is a real mind F. Everyone keeps asking — are you excited?”
“The Laguna Beach season 2 star has welcomed her first baby, a daughter with husband Kevin Simshauser.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Our baby girl, Tatum Woods is here,” Cole announced on her Instagram Story Friday, along with photos of the new dad cradling their baby girl.”
““Smitten with my daddy,” the mother of one captioned a father-daughter photo.”
“In addition, Cole shared images of family members holding the newborn.”
“Image zoom Taylor Cole | Credit: Taylor Cole/InstagramImage zoom Taylor Cole | Credit: Taylor Cole/InstagramWant all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Parents newsletter.”
“Image zoom Taylor Cole | Credit: Taylor Cole/InstagramImage zoom Taylor Cole | Credit: Taylor Cole/InstagramCole looked ready to pop on Sept. 19, when she discussed her concerns about welcoming her baby on Instagram.”


"During her pregnancy, she refreshed her fans with her sweet bump photos."
"The ending is real, everyone is asking - are you excited?"
"The Laguna Beach Season 2 star has her first child, a daughter with her husband, Kevin simhauser."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Our baby girl, Tatum woods, is here," cole announced in an instagram report on Friday, along with photos of the new father holding the baby girl
"Fascinated by my father," the mother of one child wrote in a father daughter photo
"In addition, Cole shared photos of his family holding the baby."
"Image zoom Taylor Cole | source: Taylor Cole / instagramimage zoom Taylor Cole | source: Taylor Cole / instagramwant all the latest pregnancy announcements, plus celebrity mom blog?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's parents newsletter."
"Image zoom Taylor Cole | source: Taylor Cole / instagram image zoom Taylor Cole | source: Taylor Cole / instagram Cole looked ready for fashion when she discussed her concerns about welcoming babies on instagram on September 19."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Amazon: 20% off select items in electronics, fashion, and more.”
“Use code PRESDAY for 20% off select tech, home and other items.”
“Rugs, furniture, and lighting are already discounted up to 75% off.”
“Joss and Main: Take an extra 20% off select items with code SCORE.”
“Wayfair's sale — running through Feb 21 — extends just about every category in their inventory.”
“Wayfair: Up to 65% off of bedroom and patio furniture, and up to 70% off kitchen, dining, and storage.”
“There are plenty of furniture deals for you to explore.”
“FurnitureNeed to freshen up the look at your pad?”
“American Eagle Outfitters: 60% off of clearance items.”
“Banana Republic: 40% off your order (some exclusions apply).”


"Amazon: 20% discount on selected products such as electronics and fashion."
"Enjoy a 20% discount on choosing technology, family and other items with code prestay."
Carpets, furniture and lighting have been discounted by 25%
"Jos and Maine: 20% off for code scoring."
"WAYFAIR's sales continued until February 21, covering almost every category in their inventory."
WAYFAIR: up to 65% discount on bedroom and terrace furniture, 70% discount on kitchen, dining room and storage room
"There are a lot of furniture deals for you to explore."
"Does furniture need to refresh your footmats?"
"Meiying clothing store: 60% discount on customs clearance goods."
"Banana Republic: 40% discount on your order (some exceptions apply)."



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She and Prince Harry ask again for understanding and respect to be extended to Mr Markle in this difficult situation PHOTO Chris Jackson Getty Images Meghan Markle an American mixed race divorcée with an unusual family situation has been the subject of online abuse and criticism during her engagement to...”
“Meanwhile: In a very unusual move, Kensington Palace releases a statement asking the public for privacy following the roller coaster reports of Thomas Markle’s status: “This is a deeply personal moment for Ms. Markle in the days before her wedding.”
“Meghan, Duchess of Sussex gave birth to a baby boy weighing 7lbs 3oz at 05:26 BST.”
“(Photo by DANIEL LEAL-OLIVAS - WPA Pool/Getty Images)WINDSOR, UNITED KINGDOM - MAY 06: Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex speaks to the media at Windsor Castle following the birth of his son on May 06, 2019 in Windsor, United Kingdom.”
“LONDON, UNITED KINGDOM - JANUARY 07: Meghan, Duchess of Sussex arrives with Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex to Canada House in thanks for the warm Canadian hospitality and support they received during their recent stay in Canada, on January 7, 2020 in London, England.”
“The 22-minute episode features Her Majesty The Queen and HRH The Prince of Wales as a child and has been produced as part of Thomas & Friends' 75th anniversary celebrations this year.”
“(Photo by Samir Hussein/WireImage)Harry, The Duke of Sussex photographed in January this year during the recording of his on-camera introduction to the new animated special "Thomas & Friends: The Royal Engine".”
“(Photo by Chris Jackson/Getty Images)Harry and Meghan's first official appearance together since royal crisisLONDON, ENGLAND - MARCH 05: Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Meghan, Duchess of Sussex attend The Endeavour Fund Awards at Mansion House on March 05, 2020 in London, England.”
“...in London England...”
“Photo by Chris Jackson Getty Images Prince Harry just wants to be called Harry from now on LONDON ENGLAND JANUARY 16 Prince Harry Duke of Sussex hosts the Rugby League World Cup 2021 draws for the men s women s and wheelchair tournaments at Buckingham Palace on January 16 2020”


"She and Prince Harry once again ask for understanding and respect in this difficult situation to extend to Mr. markel's picture Chris Jackson Getty's picture Megan markel, an American half breed divorced with an unusual family situation has been the object of online abuse and criticism in her relationship with..."
At the same time, Kensington Palace issued a statement asking the public to remain private after reporting on Thomas Markle on the roller coaster: "this is a very private moment for Ms. Markle a few days before the wedding."
"Megan, the Duchess of Sussex gave birth to a baby boy at 05:26 BST, weighing seven pounds and three ounces."
(Photo by Daniel leal Olivas WPA pool / Getty Images) Windsor, UK, May 6, 2019: Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex, gave an interview in Windsor Castle after he was born in Windsor, UK on May 6, 2019. "
January 7, London, UK: Mrs. Megan, Duchess of Sussex, and Prince Harry, Duchess of Sussex, arrived in Canada to thank them for the warm hospitality and support they received during their recent stay in Canada, i.e. January 7, 2020, in London, UK
"The 22 minute episode, featuring her majesty and the prince of Wales as a child, was produced as part of this year's 75th anniversary celebration of Thomas and his friends."
(Photo by Samir Hussain / WireImage) Harry, Duke of Sussex, took this photo in January while recording the lens introduction of his new animated feature "Thomas and friends: the Royal engine."
(Chris Jackson / Getty Images) Prince Harry and Megan make their first official appearances since Royal crisislondon March 5: Prince Harry, Duke of Sussex and Duchess of Sussex Megan attend the endeavor gold award ceremony at the mansion in London, UK on March 5, 2020
“… In London, England... "
"Photo by Chris Jackson Getty photo Prince Harry just wants to be known as Harry from now on, the Duke of Sussex hosts the 2021 Rugby League World Cup draw men's and women's wheelchair match at Buckingham Palace on January 16, 2020 in London, UK."



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hernandez suffered a brain bleed in December 2017 and her pregnancy was allegedly terminated that month, according to the GoFundMe page.”
“Kardashian donated a total of $10,000, while Tyga, under his birth name, Michael Stevenson, donated $5,000.”
“Lorena “Patty” Hernandez died on Wednesday after being pronounced brain dead on Monday following a third brain bleed, according to The Blast.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Hernandez suffered a brain hemorrhage in January at a salon in Encino, California, owned by Blac Chyna, the outlet reports.”
“Image zoom Credit: Gofundme; Shareif Ziyadat/Getty ImagesHer family is planning to donate her organs and preparing to file a wrongful death lawsuit against Blac Chyna, whose real name is Angela White, for allegedly abusing her and not providing worker’s compensation, The Blast reports.”
“A rep for Blac Chyna did not immediately respond to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Image zoom Blac Chyna | Credit: Splash News OnlineHer exes Rob Kardashian and Tyga donated to Hernandez’s GoFundMe, according to Page Six.”
“Singer-songwriter Jeffree Star also made a donation of $10,000 to the account.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”


"According to gofundme, Hernandez had a cerebral hemorrhage in December 2017, and she was said to have terminated her pregnancy that month."
"Kardashian donated a total of $10000, while TEGA, in his birth name, Michael Stevenson, donated $5000."
Lorena Patti Hernandez was declared brain dead on Monday after a third cerebral hemorrhage and died on Wednesday, according to the explosion
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
According to media reports, Hernandez suffered a cerebral hemorrhage in January in a salon (owned by blac Chyna) in Encino, California
"The gofundme; shareif ziyadat / Getty Images her family is planning to donate her organs and is preparing to file a wrongful death lawsuit against blac Chyna, whose real name is Angela white, accusing her of abusing her and not providing compensation to workers," the bomb report said
"A representative of blac Chyna did not immediately respond to requests for comment."
Image zooming blac Chyna | image source: splash news online according to the report on page 6, her ex boyfriends rob Kardashian and tyga donated to Hernandez's gofund me
"Singer and songwriter Jeffrey Starr also contributed $10000 to the account."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kotb, meanwhile, shares Haley with boyfriend Joel Schiffman, and enjoyed a beach day with her family over Memorial Day weekend.”
“Bullock has been dating photographer Bryan Randall since 2015.”
“File Photo by James Atoa/UPI | License PhotoLeft to right, Sarah Paulson, Awkwafina, Sandra Bullock, Cate Blanchett, Anne Hathaway and Mindy Kaling attend a photocall for "Ocean's 8" in New York on May 22.”
“File Photo by Monika Graff/UPI | License PhotoSandra Bullock gets emotional in a preview of Monday's episode of "Today."”
“File Photo by John Angelillo/UPI | License PhotoJune 1 (UPI) -- Sandra Bullock tears up about adoption in a new interview with Today anchor Hoda Kotb.”
“The 53-year-old actress gets emotional in a preview of Monday's episode while describing her role as a "forever parent."”
“Advertisement"Hundreds of thousands of children that are ready to be your child.”
“You're a forever parent the minute you accept the love of that child," Bullock told Kotb.”
“"It's amazing to me how we can take away people's happiness by telling them, 'This is the box you have to stay in,'" she said of starting a family.”
“"There is no box."”


Meanwhile, Kotb shared Haley with her boyfriend Joel Schiffman and spent a beach day with her family on Memorial Day weekend
"Bullock has been dating photographer Brian Randall since 2015."
On May 22, James ATOA / UPI and Mindy Kaling took part in the photo competition of ocean 8 in New York
Information photos provided by Monika Graff / UPI. In Monday's "today" preview, Andra Bullock was emotional
In a recent interview with today anchor Hoda Kotb on June 1, Sandra Bullock shed tears over the adoption
"The 53 year old actress was emotional in her rehearsal on Monday and described herself as a" forever parent. "
"Advertising" thousands of children are ready to be your children
"When you accept your child's love, you are a forever parent," Bullock told Kotb
"I'm surprised that we can tell people, 'this is the box you have to stay in' and take away their happiness," she said of family building
"There is no box."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Scheana Marie is all too familiar with the hardships of a bad relationship.”
“Scheana Marie of Vanderpump Rules, who was spotted hanging out with Ortiz-Magro just hours after Harley aired their dirty laundry on her Instagram Stories, told E!”
“News that although Ortiz-Magro and Harley have a "tumultuous" relationship, she hopes they can work it out.”
“"There are a lot of tumultuous reality relationships, so you never know.”
“I mean, they have a kid together, so hopefully they could work it out," Scheana said.”
“"I know that's what he wanted.”
“But not everyone can work, not everyone is compatible."”
“The Bravo reality star then noted that Ortiz-Magro and Harley didn't get to know each other that well before expecting their first child together.”
“"I mean they weren't together very long before she got pregnant, so you never know," Scheana said.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Shanna Mary is too familiar with the hardships of a bad relationship."
Scheana Marie of van der Pol rules posted their dirty clothes on instagram in Harley, and a few hours later she was found with Ortiz Magro, she told e! "
According to sources, although the relationship between Ortiz Magro and Halley is "chaotic", she hopes they can solve the problem
"There's a lot of messy relationships in reality, so you'll never know."
"I mean, they have a child together, so hopefully they can work it out," she said
"I know that's what he wants."
"But not everyone can work and not everyone is compatible."
"The Bravo star then pointed out that Ortiz Magro and Harry didn't know each other so well before they were together looking forward to their first child."
"I mean, they weren't together long before she got pregnant, so you never know," she said



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Lara also posted to Instagram a photo of herself with her mother en route to the baby shower, writing, "Baby shower bound with my mom!"”
“Love y'all."”
“YouTube personalities Diamond and Silk, also vocal supporters of the president, tweeted, "Had a fun time at the baby shower.”
“#Congrats."”
“Pirro, an outspoken supporter of Trump, tweeted a photo with the mother-to-be, writing, "Great time at @LaraLeaTrump's baby shower today!”
“#BabyBoyOnTheWay," tweeted Omarosa, who posted for photos with Eric and Lara.”
“"#TrumpTrain please join me in congratulating my dear friends @LaraLeaTrump and @EricTrump!”
“#BabyBoyTrump #LaraAndEric."”
“Congrats @LaraLeaTrump @EricTrump!”
“Patton tweeted, "Amazing day with amazing friends in honor of an even more amazing reason!”


"Laura also posted a picture of herself and her mother going to a baby shower on instagram, which said," baby shower is bound to my mother! "
"I love you."
YouTube celebrity diamond and silk, who are also supporters of the president, tweeted: "have a good time at the baby shower."
"Congratulations."
Piro, an outspoken supporter of trump, tweeted a picture of his mother to be, saying: "have a good time at @ Lara leatrump's baby shower today!"
"Babyboyontway," Omarosa tweeted, taking pictures with Eric and Lara
"Trump, please join me in congratulating my dear friends @ lareattrump and @ Eric trump!"
"# baby trump # lalandridge."
"Congratulations@ LaraLeaTrump@EricTrump ！”
Barton tweeted, "have a wonderful day with amazing friends in memory of a more amazing reason!"



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It’s time to go see her, Tess,” Randall says.”
“That’s my brother.”Tess hasn’t seen “her” in awhileBack on the Season 2 finale, we got our first glimpse of an older Randall and an older Tess.”
“Sterling K. Brown: We’ve all [in the cast] known that it’s Rebecca, though the audience didn’t know, and we know why it’s Rebecca and you guys will find out at the end of the season what it is.”
“How soon are we going to find out why everyone is gathering to see her?”
“TheWrap: How did you feel about the reveal Rebecca is the mysterious future “her” we’ve all been wondering about?”
“So since we didn’t get anymore new hints on screen, TheWrap was able to gather a few clues for you while speaking with Brown about Randall winning the Philadelphia City Council race and how those election results might impact the Pearsons in the present and the future.”
“Also Read: 'This Is Us' Season 3: 'ER' Alum Goran Visnjic Cast as Beth's Teacher on Backstory Episode“This Is Us” returned from hiatus tonight with an episode that jumped between the past and present — but didn’t head into the future again.”
“Does that mean they separate or even divorce?”
“That spat led to Randall sleeping on the couch, and a not so happy vibe between the happy couple in the present, with some hints in the future indicating the two are only communicating between Adult Tess.”
“The episode also ended with a fight between our Present Day Beth and Randall, because Randall refused to drop out of the city council race, when the polls show he won’t win and his wife asks him to give up and come back to helping his family.”


"It's time to see her, Tess," Randall said
"That's my brother." Tess didn't see "she" in the last episode of season 2 for a long time. We saw old Randall and old Tess for the first time
"Stirling K. Brown: we all know it's Rebecca, although the audience doesn't know, we know why it's Rebecca, and you'll know what it is at the end of the season."
"How long will it take us to figure out why everyone got together to see her?"
"The wrap": how do you feel about the revelation of "Rebecca" in "Rebecca is the mysterious future we've always wanted to know"
"So, since we don't get any new cues on the screen anymore, the wrap gathered some clues for you when talking with brown about Randall's winning the city council election in Philadelphia and the impact of these election results on the present and future of the Pearsons."
"Also read: 'this is our' third season: 'er' Alan Golan Visnjic plays Beth's teacher backstage episode 'this is our' return to rest tonight and jump between the past and the present with an episode - but not towards the future."
"Does that mean they are separated or even divorced?"
"The quarrel caused Randall to sleep on the sofa. The atmosphere between the happy couple is not very pleasant now. Some hints in the future indicate that they are only communicating with adult Tess."
"This episode also ended with the fight between Beth and Randall today, because Randall refused to withdraw from the city council election. At that time, the polls showed that he would not win, and his wife asked him to give up and come back to help his family."



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch the full segment above.”
“Later, Kimmel learned that his colonoscopy procedure went smoothly, until Couric admitted that they found some unusual personal items of his along the way such as his car keys, action figures and a harmonica.”
““Whoever finds it, it’s yours,” Couric joked.”
“Prior to Kimmel's procedure, Couric poked fun at the late-night host as she challenged the nurses to thoroughly clean his colon enough to find the iTunes gift card she hid inside.”
“A long bumper sticker,” Kimmel said.”
“...sticker...”
“Couric whose husband died of colon cancer emphasized that despite the common dread most people feel over getting the procedure done it s a lot more fun than being diagnosed with colorectal cancer You should put that on a bumper...”
““I’m telling you, I met some real perverts in my life, but you take the cake, Katie Couric,” Kimmel told the anchor.”
“While waiting for the procedure to begin, Kimmel shared a few quips with Couric about the awkwardness of her being present for his first procedure.”
“...a big boy and assured him that once he completes the procedure he won t have to do it again for another five to 10 years which Kimmel then jokingly compared to the Olympics...”


"Watch the full clip above."
Later, Kimmel learned that his colonoscopy procedure was going well, until Couric admitted that they found some unusual personal items during the examination, such as his car keys, action figures and harmonica
"Whoever found it is yours," quipped Couric
Before Kimmel's surgery, Couric made fun of the late night host, who asked the nurse to thoroughly clean his colon so that she could find her hidden itunes gift card
"A long bumper sticker," Kimmel said
“… Stickers... "
"Couric's husband died of colon cancer, and he stressed that although most people are afraid of surgery, it's much more interesting than being diagnosed with colon cancer, and you should put it on the bumper..."
"I tell you, I met some real perverts in my life, but you took the cake, Katie Couric," Kimmel told the anchor
"While waiting for the operation to begin, Kimmel made a few witty remarks to Couric that she was embarrassed to be there when Couric first had the operation."
“… A big boy and assured him that once he had finished the procedure, he would not do it again for 5 to 10 years, Kimmel then jokingly compared with the Olympics... "



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ratings [ edit ]See also [ edit ]”
“1 Classical Crossover Album) were discontinued.”
“The Billboard Music Awards show had been held annually since 1990 and the event was formerly held in December[1] until it went dormant in 2006.”
“The awards returned in 2011 and are now held annually in May.”
“2 Awards process edit Unlike other awards such as the Grammy Award which determine nominations as a result of the highest votes received by the National Academy of Recording Arts and Sciences the Billboard Music Awards finalists are based on album and digital songs sales streaming radio airplay touring and...”
“...social engagement...”
“These measurements are tracked year-round by Billboard and its data partners, including Nielsen Music and Next Big Sound.”
“The 2018 awards are based on the reporting period of April 8, 2017 through March 31, 2018.”
“[3] Awards are given for the top album, artist and single in a number of different music genres.”
“Awards [ edit ][8] This field shows winners of "Artist of the Year" (awarded from 1995 to 2006), and "Top Artist" (awarded since 2011).”


"Rating [Edit] see also [Edit]"
"1 Classic Crossover Album) has been stopped."
"The Billboard Music Awards ceremony has been held once a year since 1990. The event was previously held in December [1] until it went to sleep in 2006."
"The 2011 awards are now held every May."
"The process editor of the two awards is different from other awards, such as the Grammy Awards. It decides that the result of nomination is the highest number of votes won by the National Academy of recording arts and Sciences. The final of Billboard Music Award is based on album and digital song sales, streaming radio shows, touring and..."
“… Social participation... "
"Billboard and its data partners, including Nielsen music and next big sound, track this data throughout the year."
"The awards for 2018 are based on the reporting period from April 8, 2017 to March 31, 2018."
[3] Top albums, artists and singles from different genres will be awarded
Awards [editor] [8] this column shows the winners of "artist of the year" (1995-2006) and "top artist" (2011)



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementWonder Woman 1984 will open in cinemas on 5th June 2020”
“She always has our backs, she gives us the wings to dare, and everyday she helped us find the most creative version of ourselves ..”
“AdvertisementIn an Instagram post, Gadot shared photos of herself and director Patty Jenkins on the set of the 80s set sequel.”
““We did it.”
“Again!”
“!” wrote Gadot on Instagram.”
“And as much as the first time shooting Wonder Woman was amazing this time was even more unique and special We shot in 4 very different locations in 3 countries and I m so soooo proud of the almost 1000 crew members who came to set every day giving everything...”
“...they have into our movie...”
““Couldn’t ask for better partners on this..” she continued.”
““I’m so lucky to have the one and only Patty Jenkins, as my director.”


"Wonder Woman 1984" will be released in cinemas on June 5, 2020
"She always supports us, she gives us wings to challenge, and every day she helps us find the most creative ourselves..."
On instagram, gadote shared photos of her shooting scene with director Patty Jenkins in the '80s sequel
"We did it."
"Again!"
"!" gado wrote on instagram. "
"Although it's amazing to shoot wonder woman for the first time, it's even more unique and special this time. We shoot in four different places in three countries. I'm proud of the nearly 1000 crew members who come to shoot every day. They have given everything..."
“… They're in our movie... "
"I can't find a better partner in this matter..." She continued
"I'm so lucky that only Patty Jenkins is my director."



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Overzealous FanboyPhoto: ABCLast, and certainly least.”
“The CreepsPhoto: ABCPhoto: ABCAny takers, ladies?”
“It’s been a trend since day one, and it was further amplified with the debut of the newest Bachelorette season, where our leading lady, Becca Kufrin, got seduced by suitors with esteemed titles such as “social media participant” and “colognoisseur.” What exactly do these entail?”
“Please, guess away!”
“(One of them involves cologne the fragrance, not Cologne the populous German city.)”
“In honor of this duo officially joining the Ridiculous Bachelor Job Titles club, Vulture went back to the franchise’s 2002 debut and highlighted all of the weirdest jobs that have cropped up since, complete with photo evidence.”
“It’s a fun stroll down memory lane, that’s for sure.”
“The Pet Shop GirlsPhoto: ABCPhoto: ABCIt would’ve been even more interesting if they listed their favorite Animals song, to be honest.”
“The GenericsPhoto: ABCPhoto: ABCPhoto: ABC“Keep it vague,” they said!”
““It may pique interest,” they said!”


"Photos of over zealous fans: abclast, of course, is the least."
"Terrible picture, ladies?"
"It's a trend that, starting from the first day, has further expanded with the latest single season, with the debuts of our heroine, Becca Coughlin, gaining favor from suitors such as" social media player "and" colognoisseur. ". What does that mean? "
"Guess it!"
(one of them concerns Cologne, not a large city in Germany.
"To commemorate the couple's official entry into the ridiculous bachelor professional titles club, vulture returned to its 2002 debut, highlighting all the strangest jobs since then, with photo evidence."
"It's a fun stroll in memory lane, that's for sure."
"To be honest, it would be more interesting if the girls in the pet shop listed their favorite animal songs."
They said, "general photos: ABCPhoto:ABCPhoto : ABC 'keep fuzzy'! "
"It's likely to arouse people's interest," they said



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Seinfeld ran for nine seasons and was the highest-rated show in the United States when its final episode aired in 1998.”
“By age eight, Seinfeld was putting himself through rigorous comic training, watching television day and night to study the techniques of comedians.”
“Who Is Jerry Seinfeld?”
“Jerry Seinfeld is an actor and comedian who made his stand-up debut at an open mic night in 1976 and appeared on The Tonight Show in 1981.”
“After starring in his own television special in 1987, he developed the sitcom Seinfeld for NBC with fellow comedian Larry David.”
“The sitcom ran for nine seasons and was the highest-rated show in the United States when the final episode aired in 1998.”
“He later created the reality show The Marriage Ref and the interview series Comedians in Cars Getting Coffee.”
“Early Life and Career Jerome Seinfeld was born on April 29, 1954, in Brooklyn, New York.”
“Seinfeld's interest in comedy was sparked at an early age through the influence of his father, a sign maker who was also a closet comedian.”
“Over the years, he developed a unique style of comedy that centered on his wry observations on life's mundanities.”


"Seinfeld" has been broadcast for nine consecutive seasons, and the last episode in 1998 was the most watched program in the United States
At the age of 8, Song Fei began to receive strict comedy training, watching TV day and night, and learning comedian skills
"Who's Jerry Seinfeld?"
"Jerry Seinfeld is an actor and comedian who made his debut on an open microphone night in 1976 and appeared on the tonight show in 1981."
In 1987, after starring in his own TV series, he worked with comedian Larry David to produce the sitcom "Seinfeld" for NBC
"This sitcom has been on air for nine consecutive seasons. It was the most watched TV series in the United States when the last episode was broadcast in 1998."
"He later created the reality show marriage judge and the interview series the comedian in the car drinks coffee."
Jerome soonfeld was born on April 291954 in Brooklyn, New York
Song Fei's interest in comedy was influenced by his father when he was very young. His father was a signboard producer and a secret comedian
Over the years, he has developed a unique style of comedy, which centers on his satirical observation of life trivia



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...away from The Voice...”
“RELATED See photos of Ryan Seacrest through the years More from AOL com Stephen Colbert in hot water over homophobic Donald Trump joke Hollywood Secrets There are secret buttons hidden around Universal Studios Alicia Keys reveals why she s stepping...”
“Earlier this week, sources revealed that Megyn Kelly's upcoming NBC morning show will air at 9 a.m., the same time slot as Ripa's long-running "Live!"”
“Another one of Ripa's former temporary co-hosts could become her future ratings rival, too.”
“Can't wait to watch!"”
“"Mazel @RyanSeacrest," Andy Cohen wrote, while Cooper said, "Congratulations @RyanSeacrest, you get to join the best person i know, @KellyRipa every day!”
“"Love you all @LiveKelly"Ripa's best friends, Andy Cohen and Anderson Cooper, who had also served as temporary co-hosts, took to Twitter to also congratulate the former "American Idol" host on his new position.”
“Ha," he tweeted.”
“See photos of the people who were in contention for the spot:"Congrats to my old friends @RyanSeacrest and @KellyRipa and even Gelman!”
“Jerry O'Connell was one of those rumored to be heavily considered for the role, and he took to Twitter on Monday to congratulate Seacrest on the news.”


“… Away from the sound... "
"Ruian West" more than a year's photos are from AOL website, Stephen Stephen (Stephen Colbert), joking with Donald Trump, a gay Stephen, who secretly jokes around the secret Studios of the Secret Universal Studios (Alicia), Alicia Keith (Alicia). (keys) reveals why she left... "
"Earlier this week, sources revealed that Megan Kelly's upcoming NBC morning show will air at 9 a.m., along with Ripa's long-term live!"
"Another former interim co host of Ripa may also be her future ratings competitor."
"Can't wait to see it!"
“ Mazel@RyanSeacrest Andy Cohen wrote that Cooper said, "Congratulations @ Ryan Seacrest, you can join the best person I know, @ Kelly Ripa every day!"
"Andy Cohen and Anderson Cooper, friends of @ live Kelly 'LiPA, who also served as temporary co hosts, congratulated the former" American Idol "host on his new post on twitter."
"Ha," he tweeted
I saw pictures of people competing: "congratulations to my old friends @ Ryan Seacrest and @ kellirpa, and even Gelman!"
"Jerry O'Connell is one of the people rumored to be heavily considered for the role, and he congratulated West crest on the news on twitter on Monday."



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She later dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer after her divorce from Pitt.”
“”The couple announced that they split at the end of the last year, however, they celebrated the New Year together with their annual vacation to Cabo San Lucas, Mexico alongside a handful of close pals including Jason Bateman and his family.”
“She was spotted standing outside the Hollywood venue chatting with Pharrell.”
“On Saturday, Aniston made an appearance at Ellen DeGeneres‘ birthday party without Theroux.”
“They have also had a busy year as Aniston signed on with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and filmed Dumplin’ in Atlanta, while Theroux, 46, filmed the comedy The Spy Who Dumped Me in Budapest.”
“Theroux was often spotted in New York City away from their L.A. home.”
“The two spent quite a bit of time apart in recent months raising questions.”
“Image zoom Pharrell and Jennifer Aniston at Ellen DeGeneres’ birthday.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.”
“Aniston celebrated in Malibu, California with a gathering including pals Courteney Cox, Andrea Bendewald, Leigh Kilton-Smith and Kristin Hahn on Sunday.”


"Then she divorced Pete and dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer."
"The couple announced that they broke up at the end of last year. However, they celebrated the new year together, went on holiday in San Lucas, Cabo, Mexico, and had several close friends, including Jason Bateman and his family."
"She was found standing outside the Hollywood meeting and chatting with Farrell."
"Last Saturday, Aniston showed up at Ellen DeGeneres' birthday party without seru."
Aniston signed up with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and "Dun Prince" in Atlanta, while serrux, 46, made the comedy "the spy who left me in Budapest."
"Theroux is often found in New York City, far from Los Angeles."
"In recent months, the two have been separated for quite a long time and raised some questions."
"Zoom in on Farrell and Jennifer Aniston's birthday at Ellen DeGeneres."
"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other."
On Sunday, Aniston held a celebration in Malibu, California, with friends including Courtney Cox, Andrea bendwald, Lee kilton Smith and Christine Hahn



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The outlet also reports that the actress had been caught on security cameras attempting to steal in the past.”
“According to TMZ, Kazan left the grocery store with a basket that included Comet and Pledge cleaning supplies, a hot rotisserie chicken, tomatoes, Jell-O and uncured pepperoni.”
“Christmas Eve she was reportedly arrested for petty theft cited and released without bail...”
“We look forward to resolving this case in court where we are confident that she will be exonerated RELATED Luann de Lesseps Checks Herself into Alcohol Treatment Center After Palm Beach Arrest After allegedly being caught in the act on...”
“...her...”
“But Werksman says Kazan has never left a Gelson s store without paying for her groceries He adds This is a misunderstanding by Gelson s employees who did not give her the opportunity to pay for her groceries before detaining...”
“In addition to allegedly leaving a Gelson’s grocery store without paying for $180 worth of items, TMZ reports that Kazan, 77, had tried to shoplift from the same Los Angeles-area store at least twice in the past.”
“Despite reports that she was caught stealing groceries from a supermarket on Christmas Eve, the actress’s attorney Mark Werksman tells PEOPLE, “Lainie Kazan is not a shoplifter or a thief.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“My Big Fat Greek Wedding star Lainie Kazan is not a shoplifter, her lawyer saysMy Big Fat Greek Wedding star Lainie Kazan is not a shoplifter, her lawyer says.”


"The media also reported that the actress had been caught trying to steal by security cameras in the past."
According to TMZ, Kashan left the grocery store with a basket of comet and pledge cleaning supplies, a hot roast chicken, tomatoes, jelly and undercooked Italian sausages
"It is reported that on Christmas Eve, she was arrested for petty theft and released without bail..."
"We are looking forward to resolving this case in court, and we believe that she will be acquitted because after her arrest in Palm Beach, LuAnn de Lesseps checked herself at the palm beach rehab center, and it is alleged that she was He was caught
“… She... "
"But werksman said Kazan never left Gelson's store without paying her groceries, adding that it was a misunderstanding of Gelson's employees that they did not give her the opportunity to pay her groceries before she was detained..."
In addition to being accused of leaving a Gelson grocery store without paying $180 worth of goods, the 77 year old has tried to steal at least twice from the same Los Angeles area store in the past, TMZ reported
Despite reports that she was caught stealing from a supermarket on Christmas Eve, the actress's lawyer, mark Waxman, told people, "Lenny Carson is not a shoplifter or thief. Get news, feature and other push notifications. "
"My fat greek wedding star lenica mountain is not a shop pickpocket, her lawyer said. My fat greek wedding star lenica mountain is not a shop pickpocket, her lawyer said



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“SHOP NOW USA One Piece, KENDALL + KYLIE X REVOLVE, $45Lyndsey Matthews Freelance Writer Lyndsey Matthews is the Destination News Editor for AFAR; previously she was a Lifestyle Editor across all of Hearst Digital Media's brands, and a digital editor at Martha Stewart Weddings and Travel + Leisure.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Several pieces from Kendall and Kylie’s original swimwear collection with Revolve are still on sale, including the red one-piece seen here, which is marked down to $45 from $125 and is still available in size small and large.”
“If spending more than a $100 on a swimsuit seems a bit extreme to you, there’s some good news.”
“SHOP NOW Cutout One Piece, KENDALL + KYLIE X REVOLVE, $148The sisters’ new swimwear collection, available now on revolve.com, starts at $58 for bikini bottoms and goes up to $148 for a one-piece swimsuit.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Shop now USA one piece, Kendall + Kylie x revolve, $45 Lyndsey Matthews freelance writer Lyndsey Matthews is afar's destination news editor; previously, she was the lifestyle editor of all brands of Hurst digital media and the digital editor of Martha Stewart's wedding and tourism + Leisure."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."
"Several of Kendall's and Kelly's original swimsuits with revolve are still on sale, including the red one-piece swimsuit seen here, which has been reduced from $125 to $45 in all sizes."
"If you think it's a bit extreme to spend more than a $100 on swimsuits, there's good news."
"Now shop cut one piece, Kendall + Kelly x spin, $148, sister's new swimsuit line, now available revolve.com On the website, bikini bottoms start at $58 and a single swimsuit starts at $148. "



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related:You may also like: How To Do A Metallic Smoky Eye...”
“Ava Shamban, M.D., a Beverly Hills dermatologist and founder of SKINxFIVE, tells SELF that olive oil is a "great choice" of a face wash. "Using oil will not only remove makeup, but will avoid stripping the skin of natural oils," she says.”
“In an interview with Allure, Moretz says she had bad cystic acne when she was growing up.”
“Now she says her skin is acne free thanks to Accutane and a healthy diet but she points out that having skin problems was a long hard emotional process Moretz says she also works to keep her skin gorgeous thanks to an unorthodox facial cleansing method She washes her face...”
“...with olive oil...”
““I swear my skin is so much clearer because of it,” Moretz tells Allure.”
“It sounds weird, but Moretz isn’t the only one on the oil-cleansing bandwagon.”
“Pinterest features several pins on olive oil face wash how-tos.”
“The American Academy of Dermatology recommends that people look for a cream or ointment that contains olive or jojoba oil to combat dry skin, but makes no mention of actually cleansing with it.”
“But Gary Goldenberg, M.D., medical director of the Dermatology Faculty Practice at the Icahn School of Medicine at Mount Sinai, tells SELF that there is something to washing your face with olive oil—especially if you have dry skin or eczema.”


"Related people: you can also like: how to make a metal smoked eye
Beverly Hills dermatologist and founder of skinxlive, EVA shamban, MD, told self that olive oil is the "best choice" for facial cleansers. "Using oil can not only remove makeup, but also avoid peeling off natural oils on the skin," she said
"In an interview with temptation, Moretz said she grew up with severe cystic acne."
"Now, she says her skin is acne free thanks to Accutane and a healthy diet, but she points out that having skin problems is a long and difficult emotional process, Moretz says, and she also tries to keep her skin gorgeous thanks to an unconventional facial cleansing method that she washes her face..."
“… With olive oil... "
"I swear my skin is cleaner because of it," Moretz told temptation
"It sounds strange, but Moritz is not the only one in the clean oil rush."
"Pinterest has a few pins on the olive oil cleanser."
"The American Academy of Dermatology recommends that people look for cream or ointment containing olive oil or jojoba oil to fight dry skin, but no mention of using it to actually clean the skin."
But Gary Goldenberg, M.D., intern director of dermatology at Icahn Medical College in Mount Sinai, told self that washing your face with olive oil is good, especially if you have dry skin or eczema



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But when I walk out, I’m like Céline Dion: My heart will go on!"”
“I’m always in a crappy mood when I go.”
“Is there anything new on your healthy-eating list these days?”
“The dress part of the wedding I appreciate because we’re really going for it.”
“What a gem.”
“He loves to plan a party—I mean, the guy even helped me with the freakin’ calligraphy the other day.”
“I heard Jarret has been doing a lot of the wedding planning, but what’s been your favorite part of your big-day prep?”
“So now, as she finishes planning her wedding to NHL broadcaster and former player Jarret Stoll, she welcomes good stuff on the horizon: the wedding this summer and a brand-new puppy to get their future family started right.”
“After winning a terrifying stalking case in early 2016, she was diagnosed with cervical cancer, which she treated through surgeries this past fall.”
“In fact, considering the public and private battles she’s had to overcome in the past few years, Erin’s life balance is more important than ever, too.”


"But when I go out, I'm like C é line Dion: my heart will continue!"
"I always go in a bad mood."
"Is there anything new on your healthy eating list these days?"
"I appreciate the wedding dress part because we really like it."
"What a gem."
"He likes to plan a party - I mean, the guy helped me write strange calligraphy the other day."
"I heard Jarret did a lot of wedding planning, but what's your favorite wedding preparation?"
"So now, when she completes her wedding plans with NHL broadcasting and former player Jarrett Stoll, she welcomes the good things that are coming: this summer's wedding and a brand new puppy to start their future family again."
"After winning a terrible follow-up case in early 2016, she was diagnosed with cervical cancer, and she had surgery for it this fall."
"In fact, given the public and private struggles she has had to overcome in the past few years, Irene's life balance is more important than ever."



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for her latest song with Shawn Hook, Vanessa is thrilled people are loving the new track.”
“...print and it s going to be gorgeous Vanessa shared with us...”
“As Vanessa Hudgens prepared to co-host the 2017 Billboard Music Awards with Ludacris, the singer couldn't help but express her excitement at the star-studded night.”
“In addition, the former High School Musical star was delighted to know close friend Ashley Tisdale would be inside the T-Mobile Arena ready to support her.”
“During Live From the Red Carpet, E!”
“News' Jason Kennedy revealed the question Ashley had for her BFF before showtime.”
“What's your favorite thing we've done together?”
“"Probably just fly around the entire world with her.”
“I mean we were on our High School Musical press tour and being in a G 5 we re like I m going to have a G 5 one day and I m going to cover it in Louis Vuitton...”
“"Her wedding was pretty amazing as well."”


"As for her latest song with Shawn hook, Vanessa is very excited and people like it."
“… Print it out, and this will be the gorgeous Vanessa to share with us... "
"When Vanessa Higgins was ready to co host the Billboard Music Awards 2017 with Ludacris, the singer couldn't help expressing her excitement on a starry night."
"In addition, the former high school music star is happy to learn that her good friend Ashley Tisdale will be ready to support her in the T-Mobile arena."
"On the red carpet, e!"
"News" Jason Kennedy revealed the questions Ashley asked her boyfriend before the show
"What's your favorite thing we do together?"
"Maybe just flying around the world with her."
"I mean, we're in our high school musical press tour and in G5 we're like one day I'm going to have a G5 and I'm going to cover it in Louis Vuitton..."
"Her wedding was wonderful, too."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She’s devoted to her mother and will be her strength.”leonard.greene@nypost.com...”
““I hate the fact that the Kerrigan’s laundry is aired out in newspapers all around the world and everybody has to know all about us,” her other brother, Michael, said at the time.”
“He whacked her with a collapsible baton just above her right knee.”
“But before her second appearance, rival skater Tonya Harding hired a goon to attack her during an Olympic qualifying session.”
“She got a silver medal at the Olympics two years later in Lillehammer, Norway.”
“Her pained expression contrasted with the electric smile that warmed fans all over the world after she pirouetted her way to Olympic eminence, winning a bronze medal at the 1992 Winter Games.”
“Nancy, who still skates at exhibitions, was spotted yesterday enter- ing the bright yellow house on Cedar Avenue, hours after an emergency crew carried her father out.”
“...out a second mortgage on their home to help pay for her skating lessons...”
“She was a self described tomboy with two hockey playing big brothers until her parents began to nurture her love of figure skating Daniel Kerrigan a welder drove a Zamboni ice cleaning machine at the local rink in exchange for her practice time on the ice and the parents took...”
““Any further charging developments will be based in large measure upon a reliance on the final opinion issued by the Chief Medical Examiner regarding the cause and manner of death of the decedent.”The fight happened in Nancy Kerrigan’s childhood home, where she first dreamed of Olympic stardom.”


"Her loyalty to her mother will be her strength." Leonard Green @ New York Post... "
Her other brother, Michael, said at the time: "I hate the kreigans' clothes being broadcast in newspapers all over the world. Everyone has to know everything about us."
"He hit her with a folding baton over her right knee."
But before her second appearance, her rival, Tonia Harding, hired a mob to attack her in an Olympic qualifier
Two years later, she won the silver medal at the Olympic Games in Lillehammer, Norway
Her painful expression contrasts with the smile that warmed fans all over the world after she won the bronze medal at the 1992 Winter Olympics
Nancy, who is still skating at the exhibition, was found yesterday entering the bright yellow house on cedar Avenue when an emergency worker carried her father out a few hours ago
“… Pay a second mortgage on their house to help her with her skating class. "
"She claims to be a tomboy, with two big brothers playing hockey, until her parents began to cultivate her love for figure skating. Daniel kriegen, a welder, opened a Zamboni ice cleaner at the local ice rink in exchange for her practice time on the ice. Her parents took..."
"Any further charges will depend to a large extent on the chief medical examiner's final opinion on the cause and manner of death." The battle took place in Nancy Kerrigan's childhood home, where she initially dreamed of becoming an Olympic star



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We want to thank her for her undeniable passion and dedication to Suits, and we wish her the very best.”The seventh season of Suits will resume in 2018.”
“Meghan has been a member of our family for seven years and it has been a joy to work with her.”
“USA Network and Universal Cable Productions released the following statement: “From all of us at USA Network and Universal Cable Productions, we want to send our most heartfelt congratulations to Meghan Markle and Prince Harry on their engagement.”
“Along the way, Rachel began dating and eventually got engaged to the firm’s wonder-boy, Mike Ross (Adams).”
“For the past seven seasons, Markle played the tenacious Rachel Zane, an ambitious paralegal who eventually became a full fledged lawyer at the show’s central law firm.”
“There is no word yet if Adams will remain past season 7.”
“Two weeks ago, it was reported that she and fellow original cast member Patrick J. Adams would depart once their contracts were up at the end of the upcoming season, and Markle noted in her joint interview with Prince Harry that she was leaving acting behind.”
“This certainly doesn’t come as a surprise.”
“The word arrives a day after news broke of her engagement to Prince Harry of Wales.”
“On Tuesday, USA Network officially announced that original Suits cast member Meghan Markle is leaving the legal drama at the end of season 7.”


"We want to thank her for her undeniable enthusiasm and dedication to the suit and wish her all the best." The seventh season suits will resume in 2018
"Megan has been a member of our family for seven years and it's great to work with her."
"The following statement was issued by ATV and universal cable production:" we, the staff of ATV and universal cable production, extend our heartfelt congratulations to Megan Marcel and Prince Harry on their engagement. "
Along the way, Rachel starts dating and eventually gets engaged to the company's wizard Mike Ross (Adams)
"Over the past seven seasons, markel has played the tough Rachel Zane, an ambitious assistant lawyer who eventually became a full-time lawyer at the show's central law firm."
"There's no word yet on whether Adams will stay at the end of the seventh season."
"Two weeks ago, it was reported that she and former actress Patrick J. Adams would leave at the end of the coming season once their contract expired, while mark pointed out in a joint interview with Prince Harry that she would leave the show business."
"It's no surprise, of course."
"The news came the day after the news that she was engaged to Prince Harry of Wales came out."
"On Tuesday, American television network officially announced that the original suit actor Megan markel will leave the legal drama at the end of the seventh season."



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nice  — Dilly Dilly (@Nvme333_NV) March 28, 2018”
“I didn’t realize there were actually gentlemen creepers out there, especially towards celebrities!”
“Oh wow!”
“The fan who had been worried about Teigen’s security was impressed learning that the man in the photo was, in fact, a gentleman.”
“Story continues below advertisementFelipe Ramales / Splash News.”
“— christine teigen (@chrissyteigen) March 28, 2018READ MORE: Chrissy Teigen’s plane gets turned around 4 hours into 11-hour flightIn another photo taken from a different angle, the man, actually a doorman from a nearby building, can more clearly be seen stopping Teigen from stepping onto the street.”
“I should have looked before stepping out!”
“...photo was to her Teigen clarified the situation Nah he actually saved me from getting run over by a cyclist...”
“Happy Thursday x pic twitter com tIXedeTZqd Matt Mackay matty_jmac March 28 2018 Teigen who is due to give birth in June responded jokingly I had the baby https t co 28Hsup5fhs christine teigen chrissyteigen March 28 2018 When another fan was concerned with how close the man in the...”
“Hey @chrissyteigen this looks like you have strapped a very small man to your boob.”


"Nice dilly dilly (@ nvme333 / u NV) 28 March 2018"
"I didn't realize there were gentlemen out there, especially celebrities!"
"Oh, wow!"
"Fans who were worried about tegan's safety were impressed to learn that the man in the photo was actually a gentleman."
"The story continues in the following ad Felipe ramallas / splash news."
——Christina Taigen (@ christyteigen) March 28, 2018 read more: Chris Taigen's plane turns around in four hours and flies for 11 hours. In another photo taken from different angles, it can be seen more clearly that the man, in fact, is the doorman of a nearby building, preventing tegan from walking onto the street
"I should have seen it before I went out!"
“…… The photo was for her, and tygan clarified the situation - no, he actually saved me from being knocked down by a cyclist... "
"Happy Thurday x pic twitter com tixedtzqd Matt Mackay Matty è jmac on March 28, 2018, Teigen, who was about to give birth in June, jokingly replied that I had a baby, HTTPS t Co 28hsup5fhs Christine Teigen chrissytegen on March 28, 2018, another fan was concerned about how close this man is to us..."
"Hey, my God, you seem to have a very small man tied to your chest."



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That shoot at Althorp remains indelibly inscribed in the mind of Penny Walker, Diana’s former schoolteacher at West Heath, her boarding school at Sevenoaks in Kent, because Diana returned after the weekend proclaiming, ‘I’ve met him!”
“(Lady Sarah, now 62, has been happily married to farmer and landowner Neil McCorquodale since 1980 and has three children.)”
“Diana’s first encounter with Prince Charles.”
“No one witnessing Diana’s carefree joy that Balmoral night in 1982, and the sheer electricity that fizzed between her and Prince Charles, could possibly have known the anxieties that gnawed inside the princess, nor could they have foreseen the troubled future unfolding before this apparently blissful couple.”
“‘I know,’ she shot back, ‘but this will be fun.’ And with a grinning Charles looking on, away they charged.”
“‘I can’t dance, Your Royal Highness,’ protested McGrady, who was a year younger than Diana.”
“At one stage McGrady, who went on to become the Queen’s pastry chef before working for the princess, found himself being dragged by her onto the dance floor despite his objections.”
“There was a magic between them that night, a chemistry.’Diana was in her element.”
“He was red-faced with a big grin and she was spinning him and everyone stopped to watch.”
“Charles and Diana liked this picture of five-year-old William and Harry, almost three, so much they used it for their 1987 Christmas cardDiana was screaming as she and Charles were spinning around as fast as they could go.”


Penny walker, Diana's former teacher in West heath and her boarding school in sevenocks, Kent, is still remembered for her shooting in Althorp, because Diana came back at the end of the week and declared, "I've seen him!"
"Ms. Sarah, 62, has been happily married to farmer and landlord Neil mccordell since 1980 and has three children
"Diana's first encounter with Prince Charles."
"No one has witnessed Diana's carefree joy at Balmoral's night in 1982, and the pure electric energy between her and Prince Charles. They may know the princess's anxiety, and they may not foresee the uneasy future in front of this apparently happy couple."
"I know," she replied, "but it's going to be fun." Charles grinned and they rushed over
"I can't dance, your highness," said McGrady, a year younger than Diana.
"For a while, before working for the princess, McGrady became the Queen's pastry chef. He found himself dragged to the dance floor by the queen despite his own opposition."
"There was a magic, a chemical reaction between them that night."
"He blushed and grinned. She was spinning for him. Everyone stopped to see."
"Charles and Diana like this picture of five-year-old William and Harry, almost three years old, so they used this picture on their 1987 Christmas card, and Diana screamed because she and Charles were spinning as fast as possible."



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more of the thriller in the video below.”
“After watching Mother!, Lawrence told the magazine she was "reminded all over again how brilliant" the filmmaker was at his job.”
“I don’t know how he felt about me."”
“I had energy for him.”
“The Oscar winner also spoke about her boyfriend in an interview with the September issue of Vogue, saying, "We had energy.”
“Last month, Aronofsky gushed about his girlfriend's performance in the film, applauding Lawrence for giving it her all.”
“Splash NewsSplash NewsRELATED: Jennifer Lawrence Gushes Over Boyfriend Darren Aronofsky: 'I Had Energy for Him'The couple's new movie, Mother!, is scheduled to premiere on Sept. 5 during the 2017 Venice Film Festival.”
“Aronofsky was right behind her, keeping a low profile in dark grey pants, a black hoodie, red sneakers and dark sunglasses.”
“RELATED: Jennifer Lawrence's Boyfriend Darren Aronofsky Gushes About Her Acting: 'She Really Went There'Lawrence looked lovely in a floral Ulla Johnson Emelyn Halter maxi dress and black leather shoes, which she accessorized with a simple gold necklace, light grey fedora, brown sunglasses and a lilac purse.”
“The 27-year-old actress and her 48-year-old director boyfriend were spotted on Saturday, arriving at an airport in Venice, ahead of the premiere of their film, Mother!, which will be screened next week.”


"Please see more thrillers in the video below."
"Mom! Lawrence told the magazine that she was "once again reminded" of how well the filmmaker was at his job
"I don't know how he feels about me."
"I'm full of energy for him."
The Oscar winner also talked about her boyfriend in an interview with the September issue of fashion magazine, saying: "we're very energetic."
"Last month, Aronofsky talked about his girlfriend's performance in the film and applauded Lawrence for everything he had done."
Related news: Jennifer Lawrence told her boyfriend Darren Aronofsky: "I have the energy to show him" the couple's new movie, mom! It will premiere on September 5 during the Venice Film Festival 2017
"Aronofsky was right behind her, wearing dark gray pants, a Black Hoodie, red sneakers and dark sunglasses, keeping a low profile."
"Related: Jennifer Lawrence's boyfriend Darren Aronofsky talks about her acting skills:" she really went there. " Laurence looks cute in a faula Johnson emerin dress with black leather shoes, a simple gold necklace, a light gray fedora hat, Brown Sunglasses and a lavender purse
The 27 year old actress and her 48 year old director boyfriend were found on Saturday arriving at an airport in Venice before the premiere of their film mother! It will be on next week. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Not what I was thinking, I don’t roll that way.”Then it’s so awkward.”
“Girls can be very flirtatious, so I don’t want to make a move, and then you be like, “Whoa, girl.”
“A lot of times you see people on social and everybody just looks so perfect like, “Oh my god.”
“BT: If I can go without wearing makeup, I am not wearing makeup…and I definitely do go out of my way to show people what my skin really looks like.”
“”SC: Do you wear makeup on your days off?”
““ Don’t judge me by my Instagram page, because you don’t know me.”
“I did my styling myself—I just picked out random shit.”
“When I did all the “Famous in Love” press, I did all of my shit myself, except my hair.”
“When I go to most events, I do my own makeup.”
“Bella Thorne: Pretty much on all my films, I do my own makeup.”


"It's not what I think. I won't go away like that." That's embarrassing
"Girls can be very flirtatious, so I don't want to move, and then you say, 'Wow, girl.'"
"A lot of times, you see people on social networking sites, and everyone looks so perfect, like 'Oh, my God.'"
"BT: if I can go without makeup, I will go without makeup I'm sure I'll go out of my way to show people what my skin looks like
SC: do you make up when you are on vacation
"Don't judge me by my instagram page, because you don't know me."
"I made it myself - I just picked some shit."
"When I do all the celebrity in love, I do all the shit myself except my hair."
"When I go to most activities, I make up myself."
Bella Thorne: in almost all my movies, I make up myself



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“Time’s Up, which has also provided pins to be worn on the red carpet, is backed by more than 300 women in the entertainment industry, including Shonda Rhimes, Reese Witherspoon, and Meryl Streep.”
“Maybe you should all wear Marchesa.” (Marchesa is the high-end brand designed by Weinstein’s wife Georgina Chapman, who announced her separation from the producer shortly after the allegations came to light.)”
“I despise your hypocrisy.”
“You’ll accept a fake award breathlessly & affect no real change.”
“Actor Rose McGowan, one of the first women to publicly accuse Harvey Weinstein of sexual assault, sounded off on the protest in a now-deleted tweet: “YOUR SILENCE is THE problem.”
“TIME Person of the Year 2017: The Silence BreakersThis year’s red-carpet protest has been subject to some criticism, with some suggesting that sporting a dress in solidarity feels like a superficial or passive way to address a problem.”
“Take, for example, the blue ACLU ribbons Karlie Kloss and Barry Jenkins, among others, wore to last year’s Oscars, or the Planned Parenthood pin Emma Stone sported while picking up her Best Actress statuette at the same ceremony.”
“This is not the first time stars have used fashion to start a conversation.”
“It’s organized by Time’s Up, a new initiative to eradicate sexual harassment and gender inequality in the workplace, which includes the creation of a legal defense fund.”


"To caddy langkady Lang @ time."
"Time's up, it also offers pins to wear on the red carpet, and it's supported by more than 300 women in the entertainment industry, including shoda rimes, Reese Witherspoon and Meryl Streep."
"Maybe you should all wear Marchesa." (Marchesa, a high-end brand designed by Weinstein's wife Georgina Chapman, announced her separation from the producer shortly after the charges came to light.)
"I despise your hypocrisy."
"You'll pant for a fake Award & it won't affect real change."
Actor rose McGowan, one of the first women to publicly accuse Harvey Weinstein of sexual assault, expressed her views on the protest in a now deleted tweet: "your silence is the problem."
"The man of the year 2017: the silence breaker's red carpet protest this year has received some criticism. Some people think that putting on one's clothes together is a superficial or passive way to solve the problem."
For example, the blue ACLU ribbon worn by Carly Klaus and Barry Jenkins at last year's Academy Awards, or the family planning badge worn by Emma stone when she received the best actress statuette at the same ceremony
"It's not the first time stars have started a conversation with fashion."
"This is organized by time's up, a new initiative aimed at eliminating sexual harassment and gender inequality in the workplace, including the establishment of a legal defense fund."



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Stories:Rihanna's Fenty Beauty Is Here and It's Even Better Than We DreamedRihanna Hides Her Rumored Boyfriend—Where Else?—Under Her UmbrellaRihanna Just Shut Down Her Body-Shamers in the Greatest Way...”
“OK, I would've said the Bahamas.”
“The pop star just launched her first makeup line Fenty Beauty her song with DJ Khaled Wild Thoughts is rocking the Billboard charts and she s still hanging out with that Saudi billionaire she was first spotted kissing over the...”
“...summer...”
“(RiRi tried to hide him under an umbrella-ella last month, but the Internet wasn't fooled!)”
“All of Rihanna's body-shamers need to sit down, because she's on top of the world.”
“But even though Rihanna is ubiquitous, there's still a lot we don't know about her—as this new interview with Elle proves.”
“The singer covers several topics during her recent chat with the magazine—including why lipstick is her "secret weapon"—but the most interesting tidbit involves time travel.”
“One of Rihanna's friends, magician David Copperfield, asked her where she'd go if she was magically zapped anywhere in the world, and her answer was pretty surprising.”
“"Ten minutes before I lost my virginity," Rihanna told Copperfield, who said that he actually can make her disappear and reappear any place on Earth.”


"Related story: the beauty of Rihanna Fenty is here, better than we thought. Where did Rihanna hide her legendary boyfriend? Under her umbrella, Rihanna closed her body blemish in the greatest way... "
"Well, I would say the Bahamas."
"The pop star has just launched her first make-up series, Fenty beauty. Her songs with DJ Khaled wild things are on the billboard charts. She is still with the Saudi billionaire. When she was first found kissing..."
“… Summer... "
"Lili tried to hide him under an umbrella last month, but the Internet didn't get him!"
"All Rihanna needs to sit down because she's the top of the world."
"But despite Rihanna's ubiquity, we still know a lot about her, as this new interview with Ellie shows."
In her recent talk with the magazine, the singer talked about several topics, including why lipstick is her "secret weapon" - but the most interesting little thing is time travel.
"A friend of Rihanna's, magician David Copperfield, asked her where she would go if she was hit by magic anywhere in the world, and her answer was very surprising."
Rihanna told Copperfield: "ten minutes before I lost my virginity," Copperfield said he could actually make her disappear and reappear anywhere on earth. "



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the gallery for all the details on Harry and Meghan’s whirlwind romance!”
“Meghan was previously hitched to Trevor Engelson from 2011 until 2013.”
“Prince Harry and his girlfriend, Meghan Markle, are “total homebodies” when the actress visits her royal love at his Kensington Palace residence, according to a new report.”
“MUST SEE: Who Is Prince Harry’s Dad?”
“Princess Diana’s Ex-Lover Addresses Rumors He’s His Real Father“They’ve just been chilling at home.”
“There’s always someone watching or trying to get pics when they go out that they’re pretty happy just staying in and doing nothing.”
“They like to cook, watch movies, and that kind of thing,” a source recently told E!”
“Online.”
“Getty Images (2)Harry (left) and Meghan (right).”
“(Photo Credit: Getty Images)This latest news comes just months after it was revealed that Meghan, 35, is gearing up to move in with Harry, 32, once renovations to Kensington Palace are finished this fall.”


"Go to the gallery and see all the details of Harry and Megan's whirlwind romance!"
"Megan married Trevor engelsen from 2011 to 2013."
Prince Harry and his girlfriend Megan markel made a perfect match when they visited the royal couple at Kensington Palace, according to a new report
Must see: who is Prince Harry's father
Princess Diana's ex lover responded to rumors that he was his own father: "they're just at home with a cold heart."
"When they go out, there are always people who are looking at or want to take photos. They just stay at home and have nothing to do. They are very happy."
"They like cooking, going to the movies, things like that," a source recently told e! "
"Online."
"Getty pictures (2) Harry (left) and Megan (right)"
"(photo source: Getty Images) just a few months ago, Megan, 35, was revealed that he was preparing to move in with Harry, 32, once the renovation of Kensington Palace was completed this fall."



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Disclosing that he has spoken to a professional about his mental health, he describes how he only began to address his grief when he was 28 after feeling “on the verge of punching someone” and facing anxiety during royal engagements.”
“The Prince says in an interview with The Telegraph that he “shut down all his emotions” for almost two decades after losing his mother, Diana, Princess of Wales, despite his brother, Prince William, trying to persuade him to seek help.”
“Prince Harry has disclosed that he sought counselling after enduring two years of “total chaos” while still struggling in his late twenties to come to terms with the death of his mother.”


He revealed that he had talked with a professional about his mental health, describing that when he was 28 years old, he began to solve his grief after feeling "about to kick" and facing anxiety during the royal wedding
In an interview with the daily telegraph, the prince said that in nearly 20 years after the loss of his mother Diana and Princess of Wales, although his brother Prince William tried to persuade him to seek help, he "shut down all emotions."
Prince Harry revealed that after two years of "total chaos", he was still trying to accept his mother's death and seek psychological counseling in his twenties



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“FROM PEN: Learn How To Make XOXO Pancakes for Your Loved OneAlso on Wednesday, Frankel cleared up more romance rumors — this time with Eric Stonestreet, whom she was romantically linked to in July 2015.”
“...as a couple at the 2017 Met Gala...”
“Image zoom Credit Dia Dipasupil Getty Images For Entertainment Weekl In March a source confirmed to PEOPLE that Lopez and Rodriguez had been dating for a few weeks The athlete confirmed their relationship status during an appearance on The View and the pair most recently made their red carpet debut...”
“Fast forward to the present, J-Rod is officially a couple.”
“The pair was rumored to have dated in early 2009 after his divorce from Cynthia Scurtis, whom he was married to for five years and has two daughters with: Natasha, 12, and Ella, 9.”
““I honestly don’t remember,” she admitted.”
“I went out with him on two dates.”Image zoom Credit: Charles Sykes/Bravo/NBCU Photo Bank via Getty; Robin Marchant/GettyAnd as for what Frankel thought of Rodriguez’s lip-locking skills?”
“When asked by host Andy Cohen if she ever dated the MLB legend, the mother of one, 46, responded: “What is used to date mean?”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Bethenny Frankel Comes Clean on Her Long-Rumored Fling with Alex Rodriguez -- Did They Actually Date?”


"From pen: learning how to make XOXO pancakes for your lover was also on Wednesday, when Frankel cleared up more romantic rumors - this time with Eric stone street, who had a romantic relationship with Eric stone street in July 2015."
“… As a couple at the 2017 blind date party... "
In March, an entertainment weekly source confirmed that Lopez and Rodriguez had been dating for several weeks. The athlete confirmed their relationship on the show "view" and recently made their debut on the red carpet
"Fast forward to now, j-rod has officially become a couple."
"It is said that they dated Cynthia Scudetti in early 2009 after their divorce. He married Cynthia Scudetti for five years and has two daughters: Natasha, 12, and Ella, 9."
"I really don't remember," she admitted
"I dated him twice." Image scaling credit: Charles Sikes / Bravo / nbcu image bank via Getty; Robin malhant / gettyan and Frankel's views on Rodriguez's lip locking technology? "
When host Andy Cohen asked her if she would date the major league legend, the 46 year old mother replied, "what does dating mean?"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Bethany Frankel confessed her affair with Alex Rodriguez - did they really date?"



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"You have to ask for food.”
“Mack, the star’s former personal assistant, says Kelly has a long list of rules for the women.”
“According to a report published by BuzzFeed News on Monday, the 50-year-old, whose full name is Robert Slyvester Kelly, has been holding the women at his homes in Atlanta, Georgia, and Chicago, Illinois.”
“Three former members of Kelly’s inner circle have spoken up about these claims and are telling similar stories.”
“The Accusations Against R. Kelly Family members of several women have told the police that the R&B legend is holding their daughters against their will in an abusive “cult” he formed.”
“Scroll through to see all the allegations against Kelly and his response, as previously reported by PopCulture.com's Sarah Halper.”
“The allegations broke two weeks ago, with multiple families of the women living with Kelly coming forward.”
“He then proceed into a segment where we asked a female audience member to rub all over his body, including his groin area.”
“He continued, "For those of you who don't agree with my show, I imagine y'all need to leave right now, because its about to get freakier than a motherf---er on this stage tonight."”
“More: Who Are the Women Targeted by R. Kelly's Alleged Cult?”


"You have to have food."
"Mike, the star's former personal assistant, said Kelly had a long list of rules about women."
"Robert slyvester Kelly, 50, has been holding these women in his homes in Atlanta, Georgia and Chicago, Illinois, according to a report on Monday in buzzfeed news
"Three former members of Kelly's inner circle have spoken publicly about these claims and told similar stories."
The charges against several female members of the R. Kelly family told police that the R & B legend was going against their will to carry out a "cult" of abusive treatment of their daughters
Scroll through all the charges against Kelly and his response, as previously reported, and popular culture is Sarah Harper
"The charges were broken two weeks ago, and multiple families of women living with Kelly came forward."
"Then he entered a stage where we had a female audience rub him up and down, including his groin."
"He went on," for those who don't agree with my show, I think you all have to go now, because tonight's stage will be more weird than a girl. "
More: who is the target of Kelly's so-called cult? "



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Los Angeles with the caption WHAT A MAN StrongMenSupportStrong Bushnell is the founder of an engineering entertainment company called Two Bit Circus...”
“At the time the former Lost actress took to Instagram to post a loving photo of herself and her fiancé in a canoe writing The strongest and sweetest songs yet remain to be sung Whitman Grace also posted a photo of Bushnell in January at the Women s March in...”
“Her pearl-and-diamond hair combs are also of the Edwardian era.”PEOPLE reported the couple’s engagement in February.”
““They are vintage with delicate swirls of circular diamonds set in platinum.”
““Her choice of wedding earring was inspired by her Edwardian lace veil,” jeweler Neil Lane tells PEOPLE.”
“For the wedding, Grace opted to keep her look classic and elegant.”
“It was an intimate, outdoor ceremony with close family and friends, a source tells PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The Taken actress, 33, married her boyfriend Brent Bushnell in Ojai, California, on Sunday, PEOPLE has confirmed.”
“Maggie Grace is officially taken!”


"Los Angeles, what's the title? A man strong mensupportstrong Bushnell is the founder of an engineering entertainment company called two bit circle..."
"At that time, the former lost actress posted a picture of her and her fiance in a canoe on instagram and wrote the strongest and sweetest song so far. Whitman grace also released a picture of Bushnell in the women's parade in January..."
"Her pearl and diamond combs are also Edwardian." It is reported that the couple got engaged in February
"They're retro, delicate round diamond swirls set in platinum."
"The wedding earrings she chose were inspired by her Edwardian lace veil," jeweler Neil Lane told people
"At the wedding, grace chose to keep her style classic and elegant."
A source told people it was an outdoor ceremony to get close to friends and family
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 33 year old actress married her boyfriend Brent Bushnell in Oja, California, on Sunday, the people confirmed
"Maggie grace is officially taken away!"



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A free agent, he most recently played for the Seawolves in Rostock, Germany.”
“Like his fiancée, the German-born Murillo grew up in Southern California.”
“And in 2016, she was nominated for best new artist at the Grammy Awards and lent her impressive vocals to the December animated musical Sing.”
“After signing with mega-manager Scooter Braun, Kelly went on to release her major label debut, Unbreakable Smile, in 2015, after collaborating with A-list artists, from super-producer Max Martin to Ed Sheeran.”
“'”Kelly rose to fame after posting videos of covers and original music on YouTube.”
“My best friend said ‘yes.”
“Her husband-to-be also confirmed the engagement on Instagram, writing: “To have and to hold… to cherish and protect.”
““i love you,” the singer-songwriter — one of PEOPLE’s 2015 Ones to Watch honorees — simply captioned the black-and-white shot.”
“Kelly announced the happy news on Instagram Friday, posting a photo with Murillo in which she’s sporting an impressive rock on her left ring finger.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"As a free agent, he recently played for wolves in Rostock, Germany
"Like his fiancee, the German born Murillo grew up in Southern California."
"In 2016, she was nominated for best newcomer at the Grammy Awards and sang an impressive song for the December animated film singing."
"After signing with super manager Scooter Braun, Kelly released her main brand debut, the unbreakable smile, in 2015, after working with top artists, from super producer Max Martin to ED Sheeran."
"Kelly became famous after he released a video of the cover and original music on YouTube."
"My best friend said" yes. "
Her husband to be also confirmed her engagement on instagram, writing: "to own and hold We should cherish and protect them. "
"I love you," the singer songwriter, one of the 2015 winners of People magazine, wrote a simple inscription for the black-and-white photo
Kelly announced the good news on instagram on Friday and released a picture with Murillo, in which she wears an impressive stone on her left ring finger
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Quentin Tarantino...”
““There was more to it than just the normal rumors, the normal gossip.”
“In a resurfaced 2003 interview with Howard Stern, Tarantino said Geimer “wanted to have it and dated the guy.” He also called Geimer a “party girl” and said that sex with a minor doesn’t rise to the level of rape.”
“Facing an online backlash, Tarantino has changed his position and called his remarks “cavalier.”“Fifteen years later, I realize how wrong I was,” Tarantino said.”
““Ms.”
“Geimer WAS raped by Roman Polanski.”In an interview with the Daily News, Geimer said, “I’m not upset, but I would probably feel better if he realizes now that he was wrong, after 15 years, after hearing the facts.”
“Nobody has to be pissed off on my behalf.”
“I’m okay.”Polanski was arrested in 1977 for five offenses following the alleged assault, including rape by use of drugs, perversion, sodomy, and lewd and lascivious acts upon a child under 14.”
“He fled the country after pleading guilty to unlawful sex with a minor.”
“Tarantino has been engulfed in controversy in recent days.”


"Quentin Tarantino..."
"It's not just ordinary rumors, ordinary gossip."
In an interview with Howard Stern in 2003, Tarantino said Mr. geimer "wanted to date him very much" and called him a "party girl" and said that having sex with a minor would not reach the level of rape
In the face of strong opposition on the Internet, Tarantino changed his position, calling his remarks "Knight". "15 years later, I realized I was wrong," Tarantino said
"Ma'am. “
"Gammer was raped by Roman Polanski." In an interview with the daily news, geimer said, "I'm not sad, but if he realized that he was wrong 15 years later, after hearing the truth, I might feel better."
"No one has to be angry with me."
"I'm fine." Polanski was arrested in 1977 on five counts, including drug rape, sexual perversion, sodomy, and indecency and obscenity against children under the age of 14
"He fled the country after admitting to having illegal sex with a minor."
"Tarantino has been in dispute in recent days."



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They really gave it another solid try.”Despite things not working out for Affleck and Shookus, the insider added the pair “will always have love for each other.”Scroll down to see the timeline of Affleck and Shookus’ relationship.”
“...to part ways...”
“She has a kid and an ex husband and a job in New York and Ben has his family and a job in L A and while they love and respect each other they just realized it wasn t going to work an insider explained to Us of their decision...”
“After briefly rekindling their romance in February 2019, multiple sources confirmed to Us Weekly that the two split for a second time in April.”
“The pair went public with their romance in July 2017, but they called it quits in August 2018.”
“The actor found love with the Saturday Night Live producer after his 2015 split from estranged wife Jennifer Garner.”
“It’s over for Ben Affleck and Lindsay Shookus.”


"They really made another solid attempt." Although the relationship between Affleck and shokus did not go well, the insider added that the two "will always be in love." Scroll down to see the timeline of the relationship between Affleck and shokus
“… Go our separate ways... "
"She has a child and an ex husband. She has a job in New York. Ben has his family and a job in Los Angeles. Although they love and respect each other, they realize that it won't work. An insider explained their decision to us..."
"After a brief rekindling in February 2019, a number of sources confirmed to us weekly that the two broke up for the second time in April."
"The two had a public relationship in July 2017, but announced their separation in August 2018."
"The actor found love with the producer of Saturday night live after breaking up with his separated wife, Jennifer Garner, in 2015."
"Ben Affleck and Lindsay schokus are over."



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Yeah, you just love him for who he is,” DeGeneres added.”
“I wasn’t like a creepy stalker,” Teigen pointed out.”
“It’s their hilarious sense of humor that keeps things interesting between them, so naturally Teigen served up more feel-good jokes about her other half during her appearance on The Ellen DeGeneres Show today.”
“Instead of flat-out roasting Legend, DeGeneres got Teigen to play a game called “You Don’t Know Jack About John” to see how much she really knew about her husband.”
“The funny thing is, the audience could tell right off the bat that Teigen was struggling with the trivia.”
““What was the name of the band John was a part of in the movie La La Land?,” DeGeneres asked her.”
““Oh, I know this one.”
“The…The?”
“It was corny,” Teigen replied.”
““You’re halfway there with The…The Messengers,” DeGeneres said.”


"Yes, you love him because of who he is," he added
"I'm not like a creepy stalker," tygan points out
"It's their sense of humor that keeps things interesting between them, so when tegan appears on the Ellen DeGeneres Show today, he will naturally make more funny jokes about his partner."
DeGeneres has asked tegan to play a game called "you don't know Jack about John" to see how much she knows about her husband, rather than a hot legend
"What's interesting is that the audience can see at a glance that tegan is struggling with these trifles."
"What's the name of the band John joined in the film" the earth "? "Asked DeGeneres
"Oh, I know that."
"That That one? "
"It's too old-fashioned," tegan replied
"You and The messengers are halfway there, "said DeGeneres



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The episode ends on a mid-season cliffhanger!”
“...footage if Nattie doesn t open the door immediately...”
“It finally dawned on me that Nattie was mocking Lana insisting she’s super good at words/talking/writing, and picked QT as the example that came to her mind as an example of that.”
“Then I thought maybe Lana was secretly super into feet.”
“At first I thought it was because of all the cussing Lana did.”
““She thinks she’s Quentin Tarantino,” says Nattie to Carmella, and it legit took me 30 seconds to understand what the hell she meant by that.”
“While Nattie and Carmella are getting their makeup did, Nattie starts ranting about Lana, once again calling back the screaming argument Lana had with everyone in Florida about how they should work harder to get better at promos.”
“She Thinks She’s Quentin TarantinoBefore the Smackdown crew of Carmella, Naomi, Lana and Nattie get down to Cabo, they have to wrestle on Smackdown.”
“Everyone but Nia Jax heads down to Cabo in various groups, which brings us to our next point of order.”
“...is a tried and true Total Divas trope, but this one might go down as being the most infamous.”


"This episode ends with a thrilling mid season ending!"
“… If Nadi doesn't open the door right away... "
"I finally understand that Nadi is laughing at Lana. She insists that she is very good at speaking / writing and chooses QT as an example in her mind."
"And then I thought maybe Lana was a sneaky super foot."
"At first I thought it was because of Lana's pranks."
"She thought she was Quentin Tarantino," she said to Carmela. It took me 30 seconds to understand what she meant
"As Nadi and Carmela put on their make-up, Nadi started yelling at Lana, recalling once again the heated debate between Lana and everyone in Florida about how they should work hard to do better on the promo."
"She thought she was Quentin Tarantino, who had to wrestle during the assault before Carmela, Naomi, Lana and Nadi's commandos got down to cabo."
"With the exception of NIA Jax, everyone else will go to cabo in different groups, which brings us to the next question."
“…… It's a tried and true heroine metaphor, but this one may be considered the most infamous. "



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“The proposal happened on Monday, July 16, at Six Mile Lake in Muskoka, Ontario, ET has learned.”
“After we made dinner, I ran over to my parents’ cottage telling Becky I was grabbing the boat keys, but really the ring was there, along with some champagne.”
“While we were driving up to the cottage, it was cloudy and not looking great out, but as we got closer the weather broke.”
“"After the Honda Indy Toronto, we headed to our cottage in Muskoka and I had it all planned out to ask her to go on a booze cruise after dinner.”
“James Hinchcliffe and Becky Dalton"Literally only four people in the world knew this was happening: my parents and the jewelers," Hinchcliffe tells ET of how he popped the question.”
“No one, save for his parents, Arlene and Jeremy, as well as the jewelers, knew the proposal was happening.”
“Hinchliffe got the ring from Knar Jewellery in Oakville, Ontario.”
“"Just got served a life sentence," she wrote.”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
According to US Eastern time on July 16, the proposal took place at six mile Lake in Muskoka, Ontario
"After we cooked dinner, I ran to my parents' cabin and told Becky I was getting the boat keys, but the ring was there, and there was some champagne."
"When we drove to the hut, it was overcast and it didn't look very good outside, but when we got closer, the weather changed."
"After Honda printed Toronto, we went to our cottage in Muskoka, and I planned for her to go on a cruise after dinner."
"James Hinchcliffe and Becky Dalton" in fact, only four people in the world know about it: my parents and the jeweler, "Hinchcliffe told et how he raised the question."
"No one knows about the proposal except his parents, Arlene and Jeremy, and the jeweler."
Hinchleaf got the ring from Kerner jewelry company in Oakville, Ontario
"Just got a life sentence," she wrote
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Preview, below.”
“Jax will open up more about losing his dad during the Vanderpump Rules reunion, which kicks off on Monday at 9/8c.”
“As Season 6 of Vanderpump Rules came to an end, there were some big changes happening in Jax Taylor's life.”
“The model/bartender had been fired from SUR by Lisa Vanderpump — and also his relationship with Brittany Cartwright ended as well.”
“Their breakup, a decision he made (or, as Shep Rose recently called it, the "reverse projection"), came after a pretty tumultuous season as Brittany grappled with Jax's infidelity.”
“And this is how Brittany dealt with the split: "I was trying to do my own thing, but he crept his way back into my heart again," she shared with E!”
“'s Daily Pop this week about the aftermath of that split (clip above).”
“So, how did Jax win his longtime love back?”
“"He was very persistent and did not give up," Brittany explained to E!”
“...this week.”


Preview, as shown below
"Jax will reveal more about the loss of his father in the reunion of vanderpump rules, which starts at 9:8 on Monday."
"With the end of season 6 of the van der Pol rules, there have been some major changes in Jax Taylor's life."
"The model / bartender was fired from sur by Lisa van der PANP and his relationship with Brittany Cartwright ended."
Their breakup was a decision he made (or, as sheplos recently called "reverse prediction") after a rather chaotic season of infidelity between Brittany and Jacques
Brittany dealt with the breakup like this: "I wanted to do my own business, but he came back to me quietly," she told e! "
"This week's daily pop is about the consequences of that split (see above),"
"So how did Jax win back his long-standing love?"
"He was very persistent and didn't give up," Brittany told e! "
"This week"



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It was a pretty even match, but Ahmed swooped in with one last zinger: “Your jokes on the mic are spent / I saw you at Coachella / You were the big white tent.”Winner: Riz Ahmed...”
“Both players had to hand it to the other — Hathaway reluctantly nodded after a jab that “that was good,” and Corden observed that her diss about his One Direction game “was actually mean.” In the end, the audience’s applause made it clear who dominated this round.”
“Winner: Rebel Wilson3.”
“...your big thing But everyone is thinking Shut up and let Adele sing...”
“...to life played dirty wondering why Corden s wife married him My bad she blind Rebel killed in the end though serving up barbs for Schwimmer Your career s a mistake It s like Ross and Rachel It s on a break and Corden Carpool Karaoke you think it s...”
“What was supposed to be a match between Schwimmer and Corden became a three way fight when Rebel Wilson showed up completely unannounced Corden mined Friends and even The People v O J Simpson American Crime Story for material against Schwimmer and in turn the actor who brought Ross Geller...”
“James Corden vs. David Schwimmer vs. Rebel WilsonAfter the first round went so well, Corden and co. whipped up another segment just the next day, and included some surprises.”
“Winner: Anne Hathaway2.”
“Corden teased the actress for her turn as Oscars host, and Hathaway mused that the late night host’s wife watches Seth Meyers instead.”
““Yeah, I did do Star Wars / I bet that made you mad / Too bad they weren’t tryin’ to cast Jabba the Hutt’s dad,” Ahmed rapped back.”


It was a close match, but Ahmed's last passionate remark came in: "you've spent all your jokes on the microphone / I saw you in cochella / you're a big white tent."
"Both players had to give it to another player, Hathaway, who nodded reluctantly. After a" good "jab, Corden noticed that her dissatisfaction with his one-way match" was actually mean. " Finally, the applause from the audience clearly showed who was in charge of the round
"Winner: Rebel Wilson 3."
“… You're a big event, but everyone's thinking shut up and let Adele sing... "
“… Play dirty on life wonder why Corden's wife married him my bad her blind traitor killed in the end although serving for schweimer barb your career is a mistake it's like Ross and Rachel it's resting with Corden carpooling karaoke you think it's... "
"It should have been a contest between Schwimmer and Corden that turned into a tripartite contest. At that time, the rebel Wilson appeared Corden's friends without any announcement, and even the anti Schwimmer materials in the people's daily and the Simpson American crime story, which in turn brought Ross Geller as an actor..."
"The first round of James cordon vs. David Schwimmer vs. rabel Wilson went well, and the next day cordon and his company launched another stage, including some surprises."
"Winner: Anne Hathaway 2."
Cordon made fun of the actress as an Oscar host, while Hathaway believed that the late night host's wife was watching Seth Meyers instead
"Yes, I did play Star Wars / I bet that would drive you crazy / it's a pity they didn't try to play Jabba the Hutt's father," Ahmed replied



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Empire” airs Wednesdays at 8/7c on Fox.”
“Also Read: Paz de la Huerta Files Sexual Battery Lawsuit Against Harvey WeinsteinWatch the clip above.”
“Meanwhile, Candace becomes vindictive after feeling betrayed by Cookie and Giselle uncovers a key to her future.”
“Kai (guest star Toby Onwumere) becomes upset when Jamal announces their engagement on live TV and Tiana hits a crossroad with Hakeem, who refuses to set aside his beef with Blake.”
“When Kingsley pulls a power move of his own that has major financial repercussions for Lucious, Cookie thinks back to their early struggles.”
“Here’s the official description for Wednesday’s episode, titled “Master of What Is Mine Own”:The cost of running Lyon Family Management starts to put pressure on Cookie and Lucious’ relationship.”
“And now we might know why, seeing as Cross is already trying to put the moves on Cookie from the moment they first meet at a hotel bar.”
“Also Read: 'Empire' Season 5: The Lyons Sit Down for a Really Awkward Family Dinner With Jeff Kingsley (Exclusive Video)Fans will remember a flash-forward showed Lucious, while mourning at the mysterious funeral, looking at some cozy pics of Cross and Cookie.”
“She storms out and that’s when we see her first encounter with Damon Cross (Wood Harris), the shady money manager who has been up to no good in the present day.”
“Lucious makes the mistake of alluding to Cookie being the reason the record company fell through their fingers, and she is not having it.”


Empire was on Fox 8 / 7 on Wednesday
"Read also: Paz de la holta filed a sexual assault lawsuit against Harvey Weinstein, see the clip above."
"At the same time, Candace began to revenge after feeling betrayed by biscuits, Giselle revealed the key to her future."
"When Jamal announced his engagement live on TV, Kay (guest star Toby aunomir) became very unhappy, while Tina and Hakim came to the crossroads, and Hakim refused to give up his grudge with black."
"When Kingsley took his own power measures and had a significant financial impact on Lucius, Kutch recalled their early struggle."
"Here's the official description of Wednesday's show, titled 'my own master': the operating costs of Lyon family management are beginning to put pressure on Cookie's relationship with lucious."
"Now we may know why, because cross has been trying to work on cookies since the moment they first met in a hotel bar."
"You can also read: 'empire' season 5: Lyon sit down with Jeff Kingsley (exclusive video) fans will remember a flash showing Lucius while mourning at the mysterious funeral, looking at some cosy photos of cross and biscuits."
"She rushed out, it was the first time she met Damon Cross (wood Harris), a dark money manager, who didn't do well today."
"Lucius made a mistake, implying that cookies were the reason the record company fell off their fingers, and she didn't."



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Story continuesRead more from Yahoo Entertainment:”
“KAOr206YS5 christine teigen chrissyteigen July 15 2018 No word yet on when the spinoff will hit Instagram...”
“...by far the dumbest thing we have ever done christine teigen chrissyteigen July 16 2018 we are such losers pic twitter com liNRIpPnBr christine teigen chrissyteigen July 16 2018 John and I are pretending to be on below deck aka one of the best shows on television pic twitter com...”
“Teigen joked about the ridiculousness of the clip, but her followers approved.”
“Some of them imitate the Bravo fan favorite, like when celeb stylist Jen Atkin pretends to get sick over the side of the boat as a nod to the seasick cast member — make that mate — Kasey, on Below Deck Mediterranean.”
“Everyone aboard hilariously poses for the camera as their name flashes on the screen, just like actors often did for seemingly every TV show in the ’80s.”
“Cookbook author Teigen situates herself in the kitchen, where she fills the ship’s position as “chief stew,” or stewardess.”
“As Legend’s version of the Love Boat theme song plays in the background, he appears as the captain.”
“This version, called Love Boat: Malibu, starring none other than the model herself, her husband John Legend, and their friends on a yacht.”
“On Monday, she shared a gem: a parody of the opening credits of the cheesy, long-running TV rom-com The Love Boat intermixed with scenes and characters from the Bravo reality series Below Deck.”


"The story continues to read more about Yahoo Entertainment:
"Kaor206ys5 Christine Teigen Christine Teigen on July 15, 2018, there is no news about when instagram will be available..."
“… By far, the stupidest thing we've ever done Christine tigan Christine tigan July 16, 2018 we're such losers pic twitter com linrippnbr Christine tigan Christine tigan Christine tigan July 16, 2018 John and I pretended to be under the deck, one of the best shows on aka TV pic twitter com... "
Tegan joked that the video was ridiculous, but her followers agreed
"Some of them imitate Bravo fans' favorites, such as when Celebrity Stylist Jen Atkin pretends to be sick at the side of the boat, nods to the seasick actor - and makes that partner, Kathy, under the deck of the Mediterranean."
"When their names flashed on the screen, everyone on the boat would pose funny to the camera, just like every actor on TV in the 1980s."
Tygan, the author of the cookbook, puts herself in the kitchen, where she works as the "chief stew" or stewardess on board
"As the background of the legendary love boat theme song, he appeared as a captain."
The film is called "the boat of love: Malibu", and the protagonists are the model herself, her husband John Legend and their friends on the yacht
"On Monday, she shared a treasure: the prologue of an old-fashioned TV series love boat, with scenes and characters from the reality TV series under the deck."



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Call Me by Your Name” picked up four Oscar nominations including best picture, lead actor for Chalamet, adapted screenplay for James Ivory, and original song for “Mystery of Love” by Sufjan Stevens.”
“The drama, based on the novel of the same name by André Aciman, explores the romantic relationship that develops between 17-year-old Elio and visiting research assistant Oliver.”
“The movie includes interior shots of the rustic property, mainly the conjoined room Chalamet and Hammer’s characters share, as well as the grassy exterior where the men playfully flirt.”
“Guadagnino told the New York Times that he briefly considered buying the villa before he came across the “Call Me by Your Name” script.”
“According to Elle Decor, the building, which has 14 bedrooms and seven bathrooms, was originally a fortress before it was converted into a home.”
“The listing dates the construction of the villa around the 16th century.”
“The property is where Elio and Oliver, played by Timothée Chalamet and Armie Hammer respectively, meet and fall in love in the movie.”
“The Perlman family home, located in Lombardy, Italy, is on the market for $2.7 million, according to a listing on Home & Loft.”
“The house that serves as the central setting for Luca ’s Oscar-nominated “Call Me by Your Name” is up for sale.”


"Call me your name" won four Oscar nominations, including best picture, Charlotte's hero, James Ivory's adaptation and Sufjan Stevens's original song "the mystery of love"
Based on Andre asiman's novel of the same name, the play explores the romantic relationship between 17-year-old Elio and visiting research assistant Oliver
"The film includes pictures of the interior of the rural estate, mainly the conjoined room shared by the characters of chalamit and hammer, and the exterior of the grass where men play and flirt."
Guadanino told the New York Times that he had briefly considered buying the villa before seeing the script "call me your name."
"According to Elle decor, this building with 14 bedrooms and seven bathrooms was originally a fortress before it was converted into a residence."
"The listing date is about the 16th century."
"This property is where Elio and Oliver meet and fall in love in the film, played by Timothy chalamit and Amy hammer respectively."
"According to a list from home & loft, the market price of the palman family home in Lombardy, Italy, is $2.7 million."
The house at the heart of Luca's Oscar nominated "call me your name" is on sale



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s a notorious workaholic, so balancing both that work – which is extremely important to him – and the rigors of the tour every night, it really wore him out.””
““He’s been working around the clock on fashion design, both on his own line and the Adidas line.”
““He’s just exhausted,” a source told PEOPLE at the time of his tour cancellation.”
“Image zoom Credit: Splash NewsThe news came after the father of two canceled the remaining concerts on his Saint Pablo Tour in November 2016.”
“Image zoom Credit: Splash (3)In early September, West made the shocking move to cancel his reveal of Yeezy Season 6 which he had planned to do as an off-schedule show during New York Fashion Week.”
“Kardashian’s Yeezy reveal continues to fuel mystery and anticipation as the rapper and designer has yet to announce when he will be showing the sixth installment – though Kardashian’s tweets seem to indicate that she serves as both muse and model, and there won’t be a further show.”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Kardashian thanked the editor on Twitter after tweeting out photos from her fashion parade, and added, “And I love [my hometown of] Calabasas for being my runway!”Image zoom Credit: SplashImage zoom Credit: Splash NewsLooking for more style content?”
“Lest you think Kim tired herself out styling all those looks, don’t worry: She had an assist from CR Fashion Book editor Carine Roitfeld, long a friend of the family’s.”
““For each look, I wanted to stick with neutral vibes,” she added.”


"He's a notorious workaholic, so balancing work - which is very important to him - and a strict tour every night really exhausts him."
"He works day and night in fashion design, whether it's his own product line or Adidas's product line."
"He's just exhausted," one source told people when he cancelled the tour
"Image scaling credit: splash news this news was released after the father of two cancelled the rest of his San Pablo tour in November 2016."
"Credit for image zooming: splash (3) in early September, West made a shocking move to cancel his show of season 6 of yeezy, which he had planned to do as an unplanned show during New York Fashion week."
"The revelation of Kardashian's yeezy continues to inspire mystery and expectation, because the rapper and designer has not yet announced when he will show the sixth film - although Kardashian's Twitter seems to show that she is both a muse and a model, and will not perform any more."
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
After tweeting photos of her fashion parade, Kardashian thanks the editor on twitter, adding: "I love Calabasas (my hometown) because it's my runway! "Image scaling credit: splash image scaling credit: splash news find more style content?"
"Lest you think Kim is tired of all these looks, don't worry: she has the help of Carine roitfeld, the editor of Cr fashion books, who has always been a friend of her family."
"For every look, I want to be neutral," she added



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more updates be with us Dodoodad.com.”
“...and is a part of me Corden joked and said See I thought you were just going to say I ve stopped smoking weed...”
“...nothing but become a fun Halloween costume for people She added I think there was something when I first you know kind of stopped doing Hannah Montana saying I m not that I want you to know who I really am but I love that was me and is me...”
“She said I realized if that many people were going to talk about something that I did or something that I do then I should make it a good thing and I should make it something that can change people s lives rather than be a controversial conversation that does...”
“[ CAPTION: Miley Cyrus ] [ SOURCE: Pinterest ]Miley took a moment to reflect on those twerk-filled VMA performances and said that they made her the activist she is today.”
“Don’t you think so?”
“So I did a hit and run.”And this defines how terrible driver she is.”
“She shared:“I once backed my car into some stairs on the sound trailer, breaking the sound trailer and shattering her back windshield, “but I didn’t tell anyone, I just left.”
“Because she revealed herself that she is a terrible driver on the set of The Voice.”
“Yes, Miley is a terrible driver.”


"For more updates, please contact us Dodoodad.com .”
“… It's part of me, cordon joked. "Look, I thought you'd say I've quit smoking..."
“… Just to be a fun Halloween Costume person, she added, I think when I first you know a little stop doing Hannah Montana said I'm not I want you to know who I am, but I love that it's me, it's me... "
"I realized that if a lot of people want to talk about what I've done or what I've done, then I should turn it into a good thing, I should turn it into something that can change people's lives, not into a controversial conversation, not a controversial conversation..." she said
"[caption: Miley Cyrus] [source: pintrist] Miley took a moment to think about the twirk filled VMA shows and said they made her an activist today."
"Don't you think so?"
"So I did a hit and run." It shows how bad a driver she is
She shared: "once I backed my car up the stairs of the audio trailer, broke the audio trailer and broke her windshield," but I left without telling anyone
"Because she revealed on the set that she was a bad driver."
"Yes, Miley is a poor driver."



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“#NBAAllStar pic.twitter.com/SDP0CI160F — LisaMarie (@indianaoldsoul) February 19, 2018Barr herself also weighed in:”
“Fergie: "Hold my beer."”
“Fergie with the worst rendition ever.”
“— CAVS (@jackie_kisley) February 19, 2018My ear after listening to Fergie "sing" that pic.twitter.com/w4pgp1PU6W — Roff-A (@MJK_NY31) February 19, 2018Literally dying at these reactions.”
“...first ever unanimous MVP and going 73 9 in the regular season...”
“NBAAllStar pic twitter com FuhKVMIoNX Chovan thechovanone February 19 2018 Don t let Fergie s National Anthem performance distract you from the fact that the Golden State Warriors blew a 3 1 lead in the NBA Finals despite having the...”
“I am screaming.”
“Neither Joel Embiid, Draymond Green nor Jimmy Kimmel were enjoying one bit of Fergie's rendition of the National Anthem.”
“Omg.”


“#NBAAllStar” pic.twitter.com/SDP0CI160F -Lisa Marie (@ indianaoldsoul) on February 19, 2018b, she also called herself weight:
Fergie: take my beer
"The worst performance ever."
"Cavaliers (@ Jackie)_ On February 19, 2018, I heard Ferguson sing that song in my ears pic.twitter.com/w4pgp1PU6W -Roff-A（@MJK_ Ny31) died of these reactions on February 19, 2018
“… For the first time in history, he won the MVP and scored 739 points in the regular season... "
"Nbaallstar pic twitter com fuhkvmionx chovan the chovanone February 19, 2018 don't let Ferguson's national anthem performance distract you, because the Golden State Warriors broke the 31 lead in the NBA Finals, despite..."
"I'm screaming."
"Joel enbid, Raymond Green and Jimmy Kimmel don't like the National Anthem Fergie plays."
"My God."



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s like there are two standards for how to deal with someone who has this kind of issue in their past, you know?””
“He was sued in 2010 by two women who worked on the film I’m Still Here for sexual harassment; both cases were settled out of court.”
“Parker, who directed and starred in The Birth of a Nation, appeared destined for Oscar glory after his film received a rapturous response upon its Sundance Film Festival premiere in 2016.”
“However, an allegation of rape made against him during his time at Penn State, in 1999, was made public months later.”
“Parker was acquitted in 2001, but another man involved, his roommate Jean Celestin, was initially convicted.”
“(The verdict was later overturned on appeal.)”
“The alleged victim later dropped out of school, before dying by suicide in 2012.”
“Parker apologized and expressed regret for his accuser’s death, but drew criticism for attempts to deflect attention from the topic.”
“Hammer who costarred in The Birth of a Nation claimed Parker s alleged rape making the headlines as Oscar season approached was orchestrated for sure He added There was another person in the industry who had a competing film for the Academy Awards who decided to release all of the...”
“...phone records and information Hammer explained several people have told him who the person was but declined to identify him...”


"It's like there are two criteria for dealing with people who have such problems in the past, you know?"
"In 2010, he was sued for sexual harassment by two women working for the film I'm still here; both cases were settled out of court."
"Parker directed and starred in the birth of a country, and his film received a strong response at the 2016 Sundance Film Festival premiere. It seems that he is destined to win an Oscar."
However, he was raped at Penn State University in 1999 and the charges were made public a few months later
"Parker was acquitted in 2001, but another man involved, his roommate Jean celestine, was initially found guilty."
(the verdict was later overturned on appeal.)
"It is said that the victim later dropped out of school and committed suicide in 2012."
Parker apologized and regretted the plaintiff's death, but was criticized for trying to divert attention from the topic
"Hamer, who plays the leading role in the birth of a country, claims that Parker's alleged rape made headlines as the Oscars season approached, which is well planned. He added that there was another person in the industry who had a film competing for an Oscar, and he decided to release all of them... "
“… Telephone records and information hammer explained that several people told him who he was, but declined to identify him... "



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Пусть начнется время!”
“От долгого участника Наоми Кэмпбелл к председателю Анне Винтур здесь представлены все ваши первые гала-выступления ваших любимых стилей в паре с их последним.”
“Именно из-за этих фотографов мы можем оглядываться на летние выступления «Встречных Гала» от господствующих модников Голливуда.”
“После 46 лет существования бесчисленные халаты пробились вверх по знаковой лестнице с красной ковровой дорожкой, скрепленной в летописях моды благодаря толпам стоящих фотографов.”
“По мере того, как это событие росло от ориентированного на Нью-Йорк окружения к блестящей голливудской битве, ансамбли одинаково расширялись в творчестве и впадинами.”
“Как и ежегодный саммит по сбору средств, стили и звезды развивались со временем.”
“На следующей неделе мы готовимся к еще одной Встречной Гале, легко забыть, как изменилась мода и знаменитые люди, которые ее качают.”
“.”
“В мае было много первых понедельников.”


“Пусть начнется время!”
“От долгого участника Наоми Кэмпбелл к председателю Анне Винтур здесь представлены все ваши первые гала-выступления ваших любимых стилей в паре с их последним.”
“Именно из-за этих фотографов мы можем оглядываться на летние выступления «Встречных Гала» от господствующих модников Голливуда.”
“После 46 лет существования бесчисленные халаты пробились вверх по знаковой лестнице с красной ковровой дорожкой, скрепленной в летописях моды благодаря толпам стоящих фотографов.”
“По мере того, как это событие росло от ориентированного на Нью-Йорк окружения к блестящей голливудской битве, ансамбли одинаково расширялись в творчестве и впадинами.”
“Как и ежегодный саммит по сбору средств, стили и звезды развивались со временем.”
“На следующей неделе мы готовимся к еще одной Встречной Гале, легко забыть, как изменилась мода и знаменитые люди, которые ее качают.”
“.”
“В мае было много первых понедельников.”



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“So, does Cordelia know that Dinah helped Michael murder all her girls?”
“But she doesn’t appear to be on his side after the apocalypse — though she declares also that she won’t take the witches’ side either.”
“And we only just saw the very first planning meeting with Michael and the Illuminati at the close of tonight’s episode.”
“When Mutt and Jeff were recruiting Venable to be the leader of Outpost 3, Mutt said it would be a year or two before it happened.”
“Whatever the answer, we’re still a ways away from the nukes falling.”
“But we can presume that at least some months have passed since then, and it could plausibly be a year or two.”
“It’s unclear how much time has passed since then — the flashbacks began with Michael being recruited by the warlocks.”
“So way back in the fourth episode, when the flashback portion of the season got underway, there was a title card that declared we were watching events three years before the apocalypse.”
“How much time is left until the apocalypse anyway?”
“Even if the finale is extra long, which it no doubt will be, there’s a ridiculous amount of ground to cover before this is over.”


"So, does Cordelia know that Dinah helped Michael murder all her daughters?"
"But after the end of the world, she doesn't seem to be on his side - even though she claims she won't be on the witch's side."
"We just saw the first planned meeting with Michael and the Illuminati at the end of tonight's show."
"When mut and Jeff recruited venebour as the leader of post 3, mut said it would take a year or two."
"No matter what the answer is, we are still a long way from nuclear weapons falling."
"But we can assume that at least a few months have passed since then, and it could be a year or two."
"It's not clear how much time has passed since then - the recollection started when Michael was recruited by warlocks."
"So back in Episode 4, when the flashback of the season started, there was a title card saying we were looking at events three years before the end of the world."
"How long is it before the end of the world?"
"Even if the ending is super long, there is no doubt that it will be, there is a ridiculous amount of ground coverage before it is over."



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’ve been in the position where people have tried to take away my legitimacy for being on a team and I would never want to do that to another athlete, so I think these three girls going into the Olympics, Team USA has a great team going,” she said.”
“Judges decided to seat her on the Olympic team based on her body of work at the time.”
““What you see is what you get with me, and I pride myself on being honest and open,” the 2014 Olympic bronze medalist said on TODAY in her first interview since missing a spot on U.S. team heading to the South Korea Games.”
“Wagner openly expressed her unhappiness over placing fourth at the U.S.”
“Figure Skating Championships last week.”
“She told reporters after the competition that she was angry over the low scores she received.”
“"I'm absolutely furious,” she told reporters last Friday.”
““I absolutely left one jump on the table, but for me to put out two programs that I did at this competition as solid as I skated and to get those scores, I am furious, and I think deservedly so."”
“In her exclusive sitdown with TODAY Wednesday, the 26-year-old skater said she’s had some time to process what happened and she still feels “really proud” of her performances, but would not take back anything she said about her reaction.”
““I found out that my Olympic dreams had come to an end and I think that I was just heartbroken.”


"I've always been in a situation where people are trying to take away my legitimacy as a team and I never want to do that to other athletes, so I think these three girls are in the Olympics and the U.S. team has a great team," she said
"Based on her performance at that time, the judges decided to let her into the Olympic team."
"What you see is what you get from me, and I'm proud of my honesty and openness," the 2014 Olympic bronze medalist said in his first interview today after the defeat of the U.S. team at the South Korea Olympics
"Wagner has publicly expressed her dissatisfaction with ranking fourth in the United States."
"Last week's figure skating championships."
"She told reporters after the game that she was angry about her low score."
"I'm very angry," she told reporters on Friday
"Of course, I only left one platform, but for me, I took out two events. I did a solid job in this competition because I skated and got these scores. I was angry and I took it for granted."
"In an exclusive interview on Wednesday, the 26 year old skater said she had a period of time to deal with what happened and that she was still" very proud "of her performance, but would not retract anything about her reaction."
"I find my Olympic dream is over. I think I'm just heartbroken."



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It’s a relationship that works for her.””
“Suri, her 12-year-old daughter with Cruise, was with her, as was a friend and their nanny.”
“But it’s questionable whether the “Dawson’s Creek” alum has found that with Jamie Foxx, with multiple reports suggesting that the Oscar-winning actor hasn’t been able to let go of his flirtatious, bachelor ways.”
““No one understands why Katie loves a man who can’t seem to commit or why he’s publicly humiliating her like this,” an insider told Us magazine.”
““Everyone just wants her to take care of herself and to be happy.”
“But she won’t let go of Jamie.”Foxx, 50, sparked breakup rumors earlier this month when he was spotted partying in Miami with multiple women, while Holmes, 39, was in Paris for Fashion Week.”
“Foxx also was seen getting close to his ex-girlfriend Kristin Grannis on July 4 when they watched fireworks together in Malibu.”
“On top of that, the “Ray” actor was hit with allegations that he got rough with a woman during a sexual encounter in Las Vegas 2002 and tried to force her to have oral sex with him.”
“While TMZ reported that Foxx won’t face charges in that case because the statute of limitations had run out, Holmes is reportedly unhappy with his other behavior around women, Us magazine reported.”
“Nonetheless, Holmes is not ready to give up on the relationship, because she’s “absolutely smitten” with him, the insider told Us.”


"It's a relationship that works for her."
Her 12-year-old daughter Suri, who was with cruise, was with one of her friends and their nanny
"But whether the alumni of Dawson Creek found out about Jamie fox is questionable. Many reports show that the Oscar winning actor has not been able to get rid of his frivolous and single style."
"No one understands why Katie loves a man who doesn't seem to be able to promise, or why he publicly humiliates her like this," one insider told America magazine
"Everyone just wants her to take care of herself and be happy."
"But she won't let Jamie go." Earlier this month, fox, 50, was found gathering with women in Miami, while Holmes, 39, was in Paris for fashion week, sparking rumors of a breakup
"On July 4, Fox and his ex girlfriend Christine Grannis were watching fireworks together in Malibu, and they were also seen approaching."
In addition, the "Ray" actor was accused of having sex with a woman during a one-time encounter in Las Vegas in 2002 and trying to force her to have oral sex with him
While TMZ reported that Foxx would not face charges because the statute of limitations had passed, Holmes was reported to be dissatisfied with his other behavior around women, according to US magazine
"Despite this, Holmes is not ready to give up the relationship because she is" totally obsessed "with him, the person told us



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Season 6 averaged 23.3 million multiplatform viewers, according to the service.”
“It’s something I’m not opposed to.”
““We’ll take as much or as little time as the writers need and, as with all our development, we will evaluate what we have when the scripts are in,” a spokesperson said.”
“The four writers are Max Borenstein (“Kong: Skull Island”), Jane Goldman (“Kingsman: The Golden Circle”), Brian Helgeland (“Legend”), and Carly Wray (“Mad Men,” “The Leftovers”).”
“Goldman and Wray will each be working individually with novelist and “Game of Thrones” creator George R. R. Martin.”
““Game of Thrones” executive producers and showrunners Dan Weiss and David Benioff will be attached to the four projects, as will Martin, but will not write on any of them.”
“A spinoff to “Game of Thrones” — the most watched series in HBO history — has been a source of speculation for years.”
“In recent months, HBO executive began to privately acknowledge that the network was searching for writers to develop ideas based on the series and Martin’s best-selling fantasy novels from which it is adapted.”
“Asked about a possible spinoff last year at the Television Critics Association summer press tour, HBO programming president Casey Bloys said, “We’ve talked about it.”
“But, of course, it has to make sense creatively.”


"According to the service, there were an average of more than 23.3 million platform viewers in the sixth quarter."
"I have no objection to that."
A spokesman said: "we will spend as much or as little time as possible according to the needs of the screenwriter. Like all our development, we will evaluate what we have when the script appears."
The four writers are Max bolenstein (King Kong: Skull Island), Jane Goldman (Golden man: golden ring), Bryan hergrand (legend) and Carly ray (advertising maniac and leftover girl)
Goldman and ray will work with the novelist and the creator of game of thrones, George R. R. Martin, respectively
Dan Weiss and David Benioff, executive producers and entertainers of game of thrones, will join Martin in the four projects, but will not publish on any of them
Game of thrones, the most watched Series in HBO history, has been a source of speculation for many years
"In recent months, HBO executives have privately admitted that the station is looking for writers to develop ideas based on the series and Martin's best-selling fantasy novels."
Asked about a possible breakup during last year's TV Critics Association summer press tour, HBO program chairman Kathy bloys said: "we've talked about that already."
"But, of course, it has to be creative."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CNN’s Jason Kravarik contributed to this story...”
““I was already Blac Chyna before the Kardsahians,” she said.”
“The reality star appeared in court Monday morning with her attorneys as she sought to stop what she alleges is cyber-bullying by Kardashian.”
“Kardashian posted personal information last week about his relationship with Chyna on his Instagram account, including sexually explicit images of his former fiancée whom he accused of cheating on him and using him for his fortune.”
“Outside of court, Chyna’s attorney Lisa Bloom said they were granted everything they sought in their petition.”
““As we have said all along, revenge porn is a form of domestic abuse,” Bloom said.”
““It is also a crime in California and 38 other states.”Attorney Robert Shapiro represented Kardashian, who did not appear in court.”
“Shapiro said his client stipulated to the restraining order and agreed to follow all the conditions.”
“The attorney said Kardashian’s concern now “is the health and welfare of the baby and both parents are going to work toward that goal.”“I, personally, on Mr. Kardahsian’s behalf apologized and offered our regrets as to what happened in the past couple of days,” Shapiro said.”
““Now we move forward to do one thing and one thing only, what ever is in the best interest of the child.”Chyna echoed that sentiment in a brief statement she made after the hearing.”


"Jason krawarik of CNN contributed to this story..."
"I was Blake chener before the cadessa," she said
"The reality star appeared in court Monday morning with her lawyer to try to stop what she called Kardashian's cyber bullying."
"Kardashian posted personal information about his relationship with Zina on instagram last week, including pornographic pictures of his ex fiancee, accusing her of cheating him and using him for wealth."
"Outside the court, ziner's lawyer, Lisa bloom, said everything they sought in the petition was approved."
"As we have always said, revenge pornography is a form of domestic abuse," bloom said
"It's also a crime in California and 38 other states." Attorney Robert Shapiro, representing Kardashian, did not appear in court
"Shapiro said his client agreed to the injunction and agreed to comply with all the conditions."
"The lawyer said that Kardashian is concerned about the health and welfare of her children and that both parents will work towards that goal," Shapiro said "On behalf of Mr. Kardashian, I personally apologize and regret what happened in the past few days."
"Now we have to do one thing, and only one thing, to do what is best for the children." Gina made the same point in a brief statement after the hearing



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Jesse Grant/Getty Images]”
“Now, they’re not afraid to step out in the spotlight together, and Gomez isn’t shy when it comes to flaunting impressive date night outfits.”
“The 24-year-old singer was photographed in a black dress on Tuesday that was made shockingly sheer under the camera flashes.”
“E!”
“News reported on Selena’s little black dress, which showed off her slim figure in ways she may not have anticipated.”
““The former Disney star rocked a skin-tight, see-through black dress that left little to the imagination.”All eyes were on the high-profile couple as Gomez walked to dinner with The Weeknd following his concert in New York City.”
“The site quoted a source who witnessed the couple dining at the popular Carbone restaurant as Selena’s outfit is said to have turned heads.”
““A source dished some details about the couple’s evening and couldn’t help but comment on Gomez’s style, noting that ‘what she was wearing turned heads when she walked in and out.”
“'”TMZ also picked up on the headline as the site told Gomez to “beware the camera flash (NSFW)” as it was apparent she opted to go braless during this particular date night.”
“Looks like the only support Selena Gomez is getting these days is from her bf The Weeknd based on the braless shots of her leaving dinner in NYC TMZ went on to mention another time Gomez was spotted in a sheer black ensemble back in 2015 as she must now...”


"[Jesse grant / Getty pictures]
"Now they're not afraid to go into the spotlight together, and Gomez is not shy about showing off his impressive date night clothes."
"The 24-year-old singer was photographed wearing a black dress on Tuesday and was very transparent in the flash."
“E！”
"The news reports on Serena's little black dress, which shows her slim figure in unexpected ways."
"It's almost inconceivable that the former Disney star is wearing a tight, transparent black dress." When Gomez finished his concert in New York, all eyes were focused on the eye-catching couple. He walked to the weekend dinner
"The website quoted a source as saying that he witnessed the couple dining at the popular Cabernet restaurant and that Selena was said to be dressed in astonishing clothes."
"A source revealed some details of the couple's evening and couldn't help commenting on Gomez's style, pointing out that" the clothes she wore in and out were dizzy. "
"TMZ also noticed the title because the website told Gomez to" watch out for the flash (nsfw) "because it was clear that she chose not to speak up on this particular date night."
"It seems that the only support Serena Gomez can get these days is her boyfriend. According to the expressionless photos of her leaving New York for dinner, this week TMZ went on to mention that Gomez was found wearing a pure black dress again in 2015, and she must now... "



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Result 2017 2017 MTV Europe Music Awards 74 Best UK Ireland Act Himself Won...”
“It’s quite minimal in the production; it's something that, even melodically, is quite different to something I would normally do.”
“...producer Digital Farm Animals...”
“It was written by Tomlinson, Digital Farm Animals, Pablo Bowman, Richard Boardman, and Sarah Blanchard, while the production was handled by Digital Farm Animals and Tommy Danvers.”
“The single was released on 21 July 2017;[1] its accompanying music video premiered the same date.”
“Background and release [ edit ]"Back to You" is the second solo single released by Louis Tomlinson after the announced hiatus of One Direction.”
“The song was released via his own label, 78 Productions.”
“[2] It was later confirmed Tomlinson signed a solo recording deal with Epic Records.”
“[3]On 26 June, it was announced via two consecutive tweets from Tomlinson's Twitter that the song would be released at the end of July.”
“[4][5] The release date was later confirmed as 21 July.”


"As a result, MTV Europe Music Award 2017 74 best British Irish performance won by itself..."
"In the production process, it's very simple; it's a very different thing from what I usually do, even in melody."
“… "Digital farm animal producers..."
"It's written by Tomlinson, digital farm animals, Pablo Bowman, Richard Bowman and Sarah Blanchard, and production is handled by digital farm animals and Tommy Danvers."
"The single was released on July 21, 2017; [1] the music video of its accompaniment premiered on the same day."
"Background and distribution [editor]" back to you "is Louis Tomlinson's second single released after he announced the suspension of the single
"The song was released through his own record company 78 productions."
"[2] it was later confirmed that Tomlinson had signed a personal recording agreement with epic records."
"[3] on June 26, Tomlinson's Twitter announced in two consecutive tweets that the song would be released at the end of July."
"[4] [5] the release date was later confirmed as July 21."



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s wrapped up in something really fucking horrible.””
“Like, my entire career, fuck it, take it.”
“That’s why I came, that’s why I made ‘Clerks.’ And no fucking movie is worth all this.”
“I just wanted to make some fucking movies, that’s it.”
““It’s been a weird fucking week.”
““My entire career is tied up with the man,” Smith said on his podcast, recorded in front of a live audience.”
“Jay and Silent Bob star announced on his podcast Hollywood Babble On that he would donate future residuals from all his Weinstein linked projects to Women in Film a nonprofit that supports female filmmakers...”
“Yet after a seriesof reports detailed Weinstein s decades of sexual misconduct in recent weeks Smith tweeted that he was ashamed to be profiting from his relationship with the producer while others were in terrible pain Over the weekend the...”
“The director got his big break in the early ’90s when Miramax, which Weinstein co-founded with his brother, bought the distribution to his low-budget indie film “Clerks” after the producer viewed it at the Sundance Film Festival.”
“Filmmaker Kevin Smith owes his career to Harvey Weinstein.”


"It's wrapped in something damn terrible."
"Like, my whole career, screw it, accept it."
"That's why I'm here. That's why I'm shooting" clerks. ". No damn movie is worth it. "
"I just want to make some fuckin 'movies, that's it."
"It's been a fuckin 'weird week."
"My whole career has been about this man," Smith said on his podcast, which was recorded in front of a live audience
"Jay Chou and the Silent Bob star announced in his podcast Hollywood chatter that he would donate the rest of all his Weinstein related projects to women in the film industry, a non-profit organization supporting female filmmakers..."
"However, in recent weeks, after a series of detailed reports on Weinstein's decades of sexual misconduct, Smith tweeted that he was ashamed to profit from his relationship with the producer, while others were in terrible pain over the weekend..."
In the early 1990s, Miramax, co founded by Weinstein and his brother, bought the distribution rights of the low-cost independent film clerks, which he watched at the Sundance Film Festival, which made a major breakthrough for the director
"Kevin Smith, the filmmaker, owes his career to Harvey Weinstein."



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Referencing the three most popular social media websites Instagram Twitter and Facebook she added We are constantly distracted from being our true selves in a world that is fuelled by inst tweet bookface as I like to call it Whilst she acknowledged that being a teenager is becoming harder than...”
“Today, social media robs so many of us of just basic conversation,’ she said.”
“Locked me in the cupboard'But ultimately she prevailed: 'I didn't lock myself away and give up on my dream.”
“Teased me for wanting to act.”
“They called me Blubber.”
“UK shirt and spectacles Horrible experience She revealed you see I had been bullied at school...”
“Life history The hugely successful actress revealed that despite being bullied at school for her appearance where she was regularly called Blubber she never gave up on her dreams Casual Kate looked in high spirits as she got the crowd going with her inspiring speech while donning a WE day...”
“She admitted that she wallowed in self-pity, thinking she 'wasn't good enough' and 'didn't have the perfect body' because she didn't 'fit into someone else's idea of perfect'.”
“You’re just not really what we're looking for Kate.'”
“'And I was even told that I, "might be lucky with my acting, if I was happy to settle for the fat girl parts”.”


"Referring to instagram, twitter and Facebook, the three most popular social media sites, she added that in a world driven by inst tweet book face (I like to call it book face), we are often distracted from being who we really are, and she admitted that being a teenager is better than It's more difficult. "
"Today, social media deprives a lot of us of basic conversation," she said
"Lock me in the cupboard" but in the end she won: "I didn't lock myself up and give up my dream."
"I want to play."
"They told me to cry."
"The terrible experience of British shirt and glasses, she revealed that you see I was bullied at school..."
"Life history" the very successful actress revealed that she never gave up her dream even though her appearance at school was often stung. Kate wore a "we day" dress and attracted the audience with her inspiring speech. She seemed to be in a high mood... "
"She admits that she is addicted to self pity and thinks that she is' not good enough 'and' has no perfect body 'because she' does not conform to other people's idea of perfection. '"
"You're not Kate we're looking for."
"I was even told that if I were willing to accept the role of a fat girl, my acting might be very lucky."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“You want to share the experience.”
“The Wind River star covers the latest issue of Men's Journal, where he candidly addresses the challenges he sees in growing his family.”
“Men's JournalMORE: Jeremy Renner Treats His Daughter Ava to Spa Day – See the Adorable Pics!”
“"I’d like to have eight running around,” the 46-year-old actor says of possibly making his 4-year-old daughter Ava a big sister, "But at this point ... that’s not in my future."”
“Renner and Ava's mom, Sonni Pacheo, divorced in 2015 after just 11 months of marriage.”
“And in the interview, he seems to confess a fear of never getting backed to that point of a shared partnership in child-raising.”
“WATCH: Jeremy Renner Says His Daughter Is ‘The Only Thing That Matters’"It takes two," he says.”
““Doing it alone is not fun.”
“You kind of want a partner."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"You want to share experiences."
In the latest issue of men's magazine, Fenghe star published an article about the challenges he faced in his family growth
Men's Daily: Jeremy Reiner invited his daughter EVA to a hot spring - look at the lovely pictures
"I want eight people to run around," said the 46 year old actor, who might make his 4-year-old daughter EVA a big sister, "but at this point... This is not my future. "
"Renner and Ava's mother, sonni pacheo, divorced in 2015 just 11 months after their marriage."
"In the interview, he seemed to acknowledge a fear that he would never return to the stage of raising children together."
"Observation: Jeremy Reiner says his daughter is' the only thing that matters'" "it takes two people," he said
"It's not fun to do it alone."
"You want a partner."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Both Goodwin and his wife attended the University of Texas at Austin and they wed in February of 2016.”
“Goodwin’s teammates huddled around him following the play to offer their support as a kind sentiment.”
“Please Pray for the Goodwin family.”The 49ers didn’t secure a team win on Sunday but the star scored a touchdown and knelt in the endzone as he craddled the football in his arms.”
“The pain (physically, mentally, & emotionally) that she has endured is unbelievable.”
“Goodwin continued, “Although we are hurt, I am grateful for the experience and grateful that God blessed me with a wife as courageous and resilient as Morgan.”
““Unfortunately we lost our baby boy due to some complications, and had to prematurely deliver him early this morning around 4am,” he wrote to caption a photo of his finger and his baby boy’s tiny hand.”
“The football star took to Instagram to share that their newborn son died Sunday morning due to pregnancy complications.”
“Just hours before San Francisco 49ers wide receiver Marquise Goodwin was scheduled to suit up and face the New York Giants, he and his wife, Morgan Goodwin, suffered a devastating loss.”


"Goodwin and his wife are both studying at the University of Texas in Austin, and they got married in February 2016."
"Goodwin's teammates surrounded him at the end of the game and it was a kind feeling to support him
"Pray for the Goodwin family." The 49ers failed to win on Sunday, but the star scored a touchdown, knelt in the penalty area and held the football in his arms
"The pain she endured (physically, mentally and emotionally) was incredible."
Goodwin went on, "although we have been hurt, I am grateful for this experience and God's gift of a brave and resilient wife like Morgan."
"Unfortunately, due to some complications, we lost our baby boy and had to give birth prematurely around 4 a.m. today," he wrote in a photo of his fingers and baby boy's little hands
"The football star shared on instagram the news that their newborn son died of pregnancy complications on Sunday morning."
"Just hours before the San Francisco 49ers wide-angle catcher Marquis Goodwin was put on a suit against the New York Giants, he and his wife Morgan Goodwin suffered devastating losses."



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The two were rumored to have a thing before Eazy came into the picture.”
“Keen-eyed fans and excited photographers were quick to notice that Eazy was nowhere in sight, but Machine Gun Kelly and Halsey were spotted hanging out.”
“Halsey made her way over to Poppy, a popular club in Hollywood, after the show for an after party.”
“That occurrence alone is odd, since the two were basically inseparable in public.”
“Halsey was in the audience for the show, but she and G-Eazy were not spotted together after the concert.”
“Post Malone performed at the Hollywood Bowl last week, and during his performance, he called G-Eazy on stage.”
“According to TMZ, the Halsey/G-Eazy break up was anticipated by friends close to the couple.”
“Now, it appears as if Halsey may have her eyes on another tall wild boy, Machine Gun Kelly.”
“Thanks for respecting our privacy at this time."”
“I wish him the best.”


"There's a rumor that they had an affair before eazy appeared."
"Sharp eyed fans and excited photographers soon noticed that eazy was missing, but machine gun Kelly and Halsey were found hanging out."
"After the performance, Halsey went to a party at Bobbie, a popular club in Hollywood."
"It's very strange in itself, because they are basically inseparable in public."
"Halsey took part in the performance, but no one found her with geezy after the concert."
"After Malone performed at the Hollywood Bowl last week, he called g-eazy on stage during the show."
"According to TMZ, the Halsey / geyzee breakup was anticipated by the couple's close friends."
"Now it seems that Halsey may be targeting another big wild boy, machine gun Kelly."
"Thank you for respecting our privacy at this time."
"I wish him all the best."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whatever led Michael Douglas to speculate about my health, he's a loving and devoted friend to a privileged group of talent people around the world, and I'm sure he meant no harm.”Douglas himself is a cancer survivor having recovered from stage four oral cancer in 2013.”
“"I hope this puts to rest any further concerns about my health by publications that have no respect for the truth.”
“But now it seems that Hollywood star Val Kilmer has admitted that he has fought the disease.”
“It comes after the 57 year-old took part in a Reddit Q&A called Ask Me Anything, last week.”
“One user enquired: "A while ago, Michael Douglas claimed you had terminal cancer.”
“What was the story behind that?"”
“(Image: Getty)Responding, Val said: "He was probably trying to help me cause press probably asked where I was these days, and I did have a healing of cancer, but my tongue is still swollen altho healing all the time (sic).”
“"Because I don’t sound my normal self yet people think I may still be under the weather."”
“His turn of phrase - "a healing of cancer" - is likely related to Scientology, of which he's a subscriber.”
“The church believes that poor health can be healed through prayer because it's essentially a mental error.”


"No matter how Michael Douglas guesses about my health, he is a close friend of a group of privileged people all over the world, and I believe he has no malice." Douglas himself, a cancer survivor, recovered from stage IV oral cancer in 2013
"I hope this will remove further concerns about my health from publications that don't respect the facts."
"But now it seems that Hollywood star Val Kilmer has admitted that he has overcome the disease."
"Before that, the 57 year old participated in a reddit Q & A activity called" ask me what "last week."
"Not long ago, Michael Douglas claimed that you had terminal cancer," one user asked
"What's the story behind that?"
“（ Image:Getty ）In response, Val said: "he may be trying to help me, because the media may ask me where I am these days, my cancer has really healed, but my tongue is still swollen, even though it has been healing (SIC)."
"Because I don't sound normal, but people think I might still be sick."
What he said about "curing cancer" is likely to have something to do with Scientology, which he's a subscriber to
"The Church believes that bad health can be cured through prayer, because it is essentially a mental error."



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“EXCLUSIVE: 'The Bachelorette' Rachel Lindsay Will Have the 'Race' Discussion on Night One This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Check out the video below to hear more.”
“I'm honored to be the first [black Bachelorette]."”
“"I'm happy to address it.”
“"I always say, it's something that should be talked about," Lindsay explained.”
“ET caught up with Lindsay earlier this month where she opened up how she planned on addressing the topic during the show.”
“WATCH: 'Bachelorette' Rachel Lindsay: 14 Things to Expect About Her Groundbreaking SeasonLindsay made Bachelor Nation history this season when she became the first black Bachelorette in the show's 13-season history.”
“It's a great look for the stunning Bachelorette, whose hair always looks flawless no matter what style.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Exclusive: 'Bachelor' Rachel Lindsay will have a 'contest' discussion on the first night. This video is not available because we can't load the information from the sponsor."
"See the video below for more information."
"I'm honored to be the first [black bachelor]."
"I'm happy to solve this problem."
"I always say that this is something to talk about," Lindsay explained
"Earlier this month, et interviewed Lindsay, who revealed how she planned to talk about it on the show."
"Look: 'Bachelor' Rachel Lindsay: 14 things, looking forward to her groundbreaking season. Lindsay created the history of the bachelor nation when she became the first black Bachelor in the history of the show's 13 seasons."
"It's a great look for an amazing single woman. No matter what hairstyle, her hair always looks perfect."



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“WATCH: The 10 Best GRAMMY DuetsPICS: Meet All 75 Swoonworthy Guys in Charli XCX's 'Boys' Video -- From Joe Jonas to KAYTRANADA”
“On the morning that nominations were announced, fans were quick to point out a 2014 tweet where a then-15-year-old Khalid declared, “I want to go to the Grammys one day.”I want to go to the Grammys one day.”
“Judging by his Rolodex, the young star has certainly earned the recognition of his peers, even before GRAMMY nods were announced.”
“To be recognized and accepted by my musical peers is truly an honor."”
“"This journey so far has been truly amazing, and I'm so grateful to have this platform to share my art and who I am as an individual.”
“I don’t know if it ever will,” Khalid said of the nominations.”
“"It definitely has not sunk in yet.”
“...as Song of the Year and Best Music Video for his feature spot on Logic s 1 800 273 8255”
“Khalid thegreatkhalid January 27 2014 On Jan 28 2018 nearly four years to the day after sending that tweet the singer will attend the awards ceremony as a nominee in five categories Best New Artist Best Urban Contemporary Album for American Teen Best R B Song for Location as well...”
“...shot when it comes to the GRAMMYs...”


"Watch: Grammy's top 10 duets: meet all 75 dizzy guys in Charlie xcx's' boys' Video - from Joe Jonas to Kate Landa"
"On the morning of the nomination announcement, fans quickly pointed out a tweet from 2014, when 15-year-old Khalid tweeted:" I want to go to the Grammy Awards one day, I want to go to the Grammy Awards one day. "
"Judging from his Rolodex, the young star must have won the recognition of his peers, even before the Grammy Awards were announced."
"It's an honor to be recognized and accepted by my music peers."
"It's been a great journey so far, and I really appreciate the platform to share my art and my self as an individual."
"I don't know if it will," Khalid said of the nomination
"I'm sure it hasn't sunk yet."
“… As the song of the year and music video of the year, his feature program on logics 1 800 273 8255
"Khalid the greatkhalid on January 27, 2014, January 28, 2018, in the nearly four years after posting this microblog, the singer will attend the award ceremony as the nominator of five categories of best rookie and best city contemporary album, and win the position award of American teenagers' best RB song...."
“… Shot at the Grammy Awards



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here's wishing Idina and Aaron many years of happiness!”
“The couple starred together in the 2005 screen adaptation of "Rent," the Broadway musical that rocketed the actress to fame.”
“Wanted to let you know... Married the love of my life #aaronlohr this weekend @ our home.”
“Dad & son walked me down aisle.”
“It was magical.”
“— Idina Menzel (@idinamenzel) September 25, 2017"Wanted to let you know...Married the love of my life #aaronlohr this weekend @ our home," the 46-year-old Broadway actress and "Frozen" star tweeted on Monday.”
“"Dad & son walked me down aisle.”
“It was magical."”
“Then after a pause, she shared photos with her eager fans!”
“Thank you to everyone who helped make my wedding day so special.”


"Happy years to Edina and Aaron!"
The couple co starred in the 2005 Broadway musical rent, which made the actress famous
"I want you to know... This weekend, I married the love of my life, aaronlohr, in my family
"Dad and son walked me down the aisle."
"It's amazing."
"Idina Menzel (@ Idina Menzel) September 25, 2017," the 46 year old Broadway actress and "frozen" star tweeted on Monday, "to let you know This weekend, I married the love of my life in my family
"Dad and son walked me down the aisle."
"It's amazing."
"And then there was a pause, and she shared the photos with the enthusiastic fans!"
"Thanks to all the people who helped make my wedding so special."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I view it not only as a victory for myself personally, but for artists’ rights overall.””
“” Although this judgement is not the full amount that I was seeking, I am very grateful that the jury decided in our favor in this matter.”
“The lawsuit, which Jones filed in 2013, stemmed from Jones’ claim that he was owed royalties for a series of projects that were released after Jackson died, including the music used in two Cirque du Soleil productions and music featured in the This Is It concert film.”
“Jones said he was owed $30 million.”
“Last week, Jones took the witness stand and claimed he was “cheated out of a lot of money” by the Jackson estate.”
“During the two-week trial, lawyers debated over interpreting the contract language that determined how Jones’ royalties should be computed, particularly the contracts from Off the Wall, Thriller and Bad.”
“Attorneys for Jones argued that those contracts entitled Jones to royalties from the posthumous This is It along with proceeds from the two Cirque du Soleil shows.”
“Meanwhile, Howard Weitzman, who represented the Jackson estate, argued that Jackson made the major contributions to the sound of each song.”
“While the jury denied Quincy Jones 21 million or more than two thirds of what he demanded from The Estate of Michael Jackson we still believe that giving him millions of dollars that he has no right to receive under his contracts is wrong Weitzman and Zia Modabber attorneys for...”
“The Estate of Michael Jackson said in a statement...”


"I think this is not only a victory for me personally, but also a victory for the overall rights of artists."
"Although this verdict is not the full amount I asked for, I am very grateful to the jury for being in our favor in this matter."
"Jones' lawsuit in 2013 stems from Jones' claim that he is owed royalties for a series of projects released after Jackson's death, including music used in two Cirque du Soleil productions and that this is music from concert movies."
"Jones said he was owed $30 million."
Jones testified in court last week, claiming that he was "cheated out of a lot of money" by Jackson's legacy
During the two-week trial, lawyers debated how to interpret the contract language that determines Jones' royalty calculation, especially those from outside the wall, shudder and bad
"Jones's lawyers argue that these contracts give Jones the right to receive royalties from his posthumous work, which is the proceeds of his two performances as well as Cirque du Soleil."
Meanwhile, Howard weizman, who represents Jackson's legacy, believes that Jackson has made a significant contribution to the sound of every song
"Although the jury rejected Quincy Jones' claim of $21 million or more from Michael Jackson's estate, we still believe that it was weizman's and Zia modabe's wrong lawyers to give Quincy Jones the millions of dollars he was not entitled to under the contract..."
"Michael Jackson's legacy said in a statement



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Getty ImagesWhen She And Jimmy Fallon Dressed Up As Dolly Parton And Kenny RogersMiley channeled godmother and singer extraordinaire Dolly Parton while Jimmy dressed as Kenny Rogers for a jovial duet of the '80s classic "Islands in the Stream."”
“Getty ImagesWhen She Cried Writing A Thank-You Note To Hillary ClintonMiley tried to hold back tears as she penned a thank-you note to the former presidential candidate, whom she described as "a role model and an inspiration" for her and for young women everywhere.”
“NBCWhen She Paid Tribute To Tom PettyMiley was accompanied onstage by her guitar-toting country-star dad, Billy Ray Cyrus, as the two performed a breathtaking rendition of the late Tom Petty's "Wildflowers."”
“Here, the best moments thus far.”
“From pranking fans to singing soulful tunes (one about fiancé Liam Hemsworth, we’re convinced), she made for arguably one of the most memorable guests ever to appear on the show.”
“It’s Miley Week on The Tonight Show, which means Miley Cyrus has taken over Jimmy Fallon’s program for a residency of fun-filled antics and electric performances you’d expect from the pop superstar.”


Getty imagines when she and Jimmy Fallon dress up as Dolly Parton and Kenny Rogers, Millie channeling for godmother and outstanding singer Dolly Parton, and Jimmy dressed up as Kenny Rogers for the '80s classic "island in the stream" gleeful duet
As she weeped to write a thank-you note to Hillary Clinton, Millie tried to hold back her tears and wrote a thank-you note to the former presidential candidate, describing her as a "role model and inspiration" for her and young women around the world
When she paid homage to Tom petimili, her guitar country star father, Billy Ray Cyrus, accompanied her on stage. They performed a thrilling performance of the late Tom petimili's wildflowers
"Here, it's the best moment yet."
"From a fan of pranks to singing affectionate songs (one of which we're sure is about fiancee Liam Hemsworth), she became one of the most memorable guests of all time."
"Tonight's show is Miley week, which means that Miley Cyrus has taken over Jimmy Fallon's show, providing you with a home for fun antics and electronic performances, and you'll be looking forward to this pop star."



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Surely she’ll still be thinking about the big day.”
““I know I will never get pictures with this kind of scenery ever again,” Lipinski captioned a slideshow of photos on Instagram.”
“New Bride Tara Lipinski Shows Off Her Slim Figure in the MaldivesTara Lipinski has found the love of her life — and now she’s found paradise, too.”
“The 35-year-old Olympian and new husband Todd Kapostasy, 33, are currently on a 40-day whirlwind honeymoon adventure around the globe after saying their “I dos” in an ultra-romantic affair last Saturday.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“With stops including Switzerland and Greece on the agenda, Lipinski will have no shortage of photo ops.”
“But she took advantage of the tropical weather and stunning beach views in her first location — Maldives — for an ultra-sexy photoshoot.”
“The pictures, snapped by Kapostasy and posted to Lipinksi’s Instagram page on Wednesday, don’t just show off the crystal clear waters and white sand beaches of the South Asian island country — they also show off Lipinski’s trim beach body.”
“Wearing a two-piece pink printed bikini and coordinating flowing wrap beach coverup, the blonde beauty looks relaxed and happy as the wind blows through her hair and coverup amid a beautiful backdrop.”
““This … place is all the things.”“The way I see it, I found paradise or maybe I’m just madly in love,” she wrote on another of her three posts.”


"She must still be thinking about that important day."
"I know I'll never take pictures of this landscape again," libinski wrote on a slide on instagram
"The new bride Tara Lipinski is slim in the Maldives. Tara Lipinski has found the love of her life - and now she has found heaven."
Olympia, 35, and her new husband, Todd kapostasy, 33, said "I do" in a super romantic relationship on Saturday and are on a 40 day whirlwind honeymoon expedition around the world
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"As sites including Switzerland and Greece are put on the agenda, libinski will take photos."
"But in the first place, Maldives, she used the tropical climate and charming beach scenery to take a super sexy picture."
"The photos, taken by kapostasy and posted on lipinksi's instagram website on Wednesday, show not only the clear water and white sand beaches of this South Asian island country - they also show Lipinski's self-cultivation body on the beach."
"Wearing a two-piece pink printed bikini and a flowing beach smock, the blonde looks relaxed and happy in the beautiful background with the wind blowing through her hair and smock."
"Well Place is everything. " "In my opinion, I found heaven, maybe I just fell in love madly," she wrote in another of her three blog posts



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She later dated JJ Lane from Kaitlyn Bristowe’s season 11 of The Bachelorette.”
“!”Kinney was previously wed to Dustin Kinney from 2010 until he died by suicide in 2013.”
“The Bachelor alum Juelia Kinney is engaged to Aaron Bass, the brother of former Bachelor in Paradise star Evan Bass.”
“Kinney, 34, announced the news via Instagram on Wednesday, July 25, with a picture (taken by photographer Monica Lopez) of herself kissing her new fiancé on a beach near Secrets Playa Mujeres Golf & Spa Resort in Cancún, Mexico.”
““This man.”
“From the time I met him last year in Mexico I thought to myself he is hot – and would make such a good husband from all the good energy I felt from his heart.”
“I didn’t think much more of it because I lived in San Diego and he lived in Nashville,” wrote the esthetician, who vied for Chris Soules’ heart on season 19 of The Bachelor in 2015 before appearing on season 2 of Bachelor in Paradise later that year.”
““Little did I know he was going to come visit me and little did I know I would feel sick to my stomach when he left to go back home.”
“I knew I hadn’t felt that special or that close to someone in pretty much ever, and had no idea how it would work out,” she continued.”
“I am so happy that our relationship not only developed so much over the next couple months but flourished Kinney admitted that it was hard having a long distance relationship with Aaron as they learned to navigate the ups and downs but they are now stronger and happier than ever...”


"She went on a date with JJ lane of katerin Bristol's singles Season 11."
"!" Ginny began to marry Dustin Ginny in 2010 and died of suicide in 2013. "
"The single alumnus, Yulia Ginny, is engaged to Allen bass, the brother of Evan bass, a former" Bachelor of heaven "star
"On Wednesday, July 25, Ginny, 34, announced the news through instagram as she kisses her new fiance (photographed by Monica Lopez) on a beach near the secret Playa mujerez Golf and Spa Resort in Cancun, Mexico."
"This man."
"Ever since I met him in Mexico last year, I've been thinking that he's Sexy - all the good energy I feel from his heart can make him a good husband."
"I didn't think too much, because I live in San Diego and he lives in Nashville," wrote the aesthetician, who competed for Chris sules' heart in singles season 19 in 2015 and then appeared in singles in paradise Season 2 later that year
"I had no idea that he was coming to see me. I had no idea that I would feel sick when he came home from home."
"I know that in the past few years, I've never felt that special or intimate with anyone else, and I don't know what the outcome will be," she added
"I'm glad that our relationship has not only developed so much in the coming months, but also flourished. Ginny admits that when they learned to ride the ups and downs, it was difficult to maintain a long-distance relationship with Allen, but they are stronger and happier now than ever before. "



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple remained committed to each another in the wake of the scandal, though The Girls Next Door cast member famously flushed her wedding ring down the toilet and they appeared on Marriage Boot Camp: Reality Stars Edition to flush out their problems.”
“Their marriage was rocked by scandal in 2014 when Baskett, a former football player, allegedly had an affair with a transgender model while Wilkinson was eight months pregnant.”
“Less than a week after filing for divorce from her husband-of-eight-years, the 32-year-old Kendra on Top star was “getting back to being Kdub” by finding support in a group of famous friends, including the cast of Jersey Shore and Tori Spelling.”
““So thankful for friends right now," Wilkinson wrote on an Instagram post on Tuesday, which included a series of pictures and videos of her day out.”
““Laughter is the best medicine and yesterday i overdosed.”
“[Laugh out loud].”
“Getting back to being Kdub again [and] feels good."”
“The former Playboy model and reality television personality spent the day clinking wine glasses with the cast of Jersey Shore, including Nicole "Snooki" Polizzi and Deena Cortese, before hanging out with fellow reality star and Beverly Hills, 90210 alum Tori Spelling.”
“The two later attended the Millennial Mamas' Mom's Night Out event in Calabasas, joined by Wilkinson’s BFF and co-star Jessica Hall, Beverly Hills, 90210 alum Ian Ziering’s wife Erin Ziering, 7th Heaven alum Beverley Mitchell, and American Idol alum Kimberly Caldwell, E!”
“News reports.”


"After the scandal, the couple are still loyal to each other, but the famous thing is that the actress next door flushed her wedding ring into the toilet, and they solved their problems by appearing in" marriage boot camp: Reality TV star version. "
"In 2014, their marriage became a sensation because of the scandal. It is said that former football player Basquet had an affair with a transgender model when Wilkinson was eight months pregnant."
"Less than a week after divorcing her husband of eight years, the 32 year old Kendra from top star is" re becoming kdub "by looking for support from a group of famous friends, including actors from Jersey shore and Tori Spelling
"Thank you very much to all of you today," Wilkinson wrote in an instagram post on Tuesday, which includes a series of photos and videos of her day out
"Laughter is the best medicine. I ate too much yesterday."
(laughter)
"It's good to be kdub again."
The former Playboy model and reality TV star spent a day clinking glasses with Jesse shoal's actors, including Nicole "snooky" politz and Dina Curtis, and then dating reality TV stars and 90210 Beverly Hills alumni
"The two later took part in the Millennium mom's night outing in Calabasas, Wilkinson's BFF and co stars Jessica hall, Beverly Hills, 90210 alum, Ian Zilin's wife Irene Zilin, seventh heaven alum Beverly Mitchell and American Idol alum Kimberly Caldwell, e!"
"News coverage."



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I get it — I've f***ed Jax.”
“Kristen Doute, meanwhile, said: 'Jax is still the same piece of s*** liar that he always has been.”
“She was then shown in tears in a confessional, saying: 'I wish so bad that I could just stop loving him.”
“I just wanted affection, I guess.'”
“Moving on: Katie Maloney supported Brittany as she planned a Las Vegas getawayThen Brittany admitted to doing 'something really stupid' in 'a moment of weakness' — telling her friends: 'We had sex today.”
“But she was seen back at SUR, awkwardly avoiding Jax who admitted they were still living together, with him insisting he thought she did not want him to leave.”
“Brittany initially appeared determined to move on from Jax, telling Katie she was flying to Las Vegas and insisting: 'I am a single person and I'm going to act like a single person, and he is going to regret the day he f***ed me over.'”
“...that I know who else has he done it with...”
“Quick admission Jax after denying having sex with former SUR server Faith admitted cheating Angry reaction Brittany told Jax that he could rot in hell And having called Faith someone who I thought was a friend of mine she asked Katie If he s gonna do it with Faith someone...”
“Despite saying she 'really liked knowing I was the one that changed Jax Taylor,' Brittany admitted to Katie Maloney: 'I always had gut feelings that he's done things, plenty of times.'”


"I see - I'm driving Jakes crazy."
Meanwhile, Christine Dutt said, "Jakes is still a liar as always."
"Then, in the confessional room, she cried and said," I wish I could stop loving him. "
"I think I just want affection."
"Go on: Katie Maloney supports Brittany because she plans to travel in Las Vegas. Brittany admits to doing "very stupid things" in "moments of weakness" - telling her friends: "we had sex today."
"But she was seen back in Sur, embarrassed to avoid Jax, who admitted they were still living together, insisting he didn't think she wanted him to leave."
"Brittany seemed determined to leave Jax at first. She told Katie she was flying to Las Vegas and insisted," I'm single. I want to act like I'm single. He'll regret the day he messed me up. "
“… I know who else he did it with... "
"Quickly admit that Jax admitted cheating after denying having sex with faith, a former sur server. Brittany told Jax that he would rot in hell, and called faith to someone I thought was my friend. She asked Katie if he would do it with faith..."
"Even though she 'really likes to know that I'm the one who changed Jakes Taylor,'" Brittany admits to Katie Maloney, "I always have a gut feeling that he's done a lot of things, a lot of times."



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Kids come first at all time but mama needs some fun rt now," the star said.”
“My mental, emotional n physical well being.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoKendra Wilkinson (R), Hank Baskett and son Hank attend the Los Angeles premiere of "Paddington" on January 10, 2015.”
“File Photo by Jim Ruymen/UPI | License PhotoKendra Wilkinson reached out to fans after filing for divorce from Hank Baskett.”
“File Photo by David Becker/UPI | License PhotoMay 15 (UPI) -- Kendra Wilkinson is looking for dating and sex advice in the wake of her split.”
“The 32-year-old television personality reached out to fans Monday on Twitter after filing for divorce from her husband, former NFL player Hank Baskett, after eight years of marriage.”
“Advertisement"What's your opinion... do i start dating/sex now or give myself more time?"”
“Wilkinson asked her 2.6 million followers.”
“"My heart is broken but i have needs.”
“Lmaoooo #gimmelovin #notgettingyounger #33hereicome," she added.”


"Kids always come first, but mom needs some fun now," the star said
"My mental, emotional and physical health."
"Information photo of Jim ruymen / UPI | license photo Kendra Wilkinson (right), Hank Baskett and his son hank attend the premiere of Paddington in Los Angeles on January 10, 2015."
"Information photo of Jim ruymen / UPI | license photo Kendra Wilkinson contacted fans after filing for divorce with hank Baskett."
"David Becker / UPI profile photo on May 15 - Kendra Wilkinson is looking for dating and sexual advice after the breakup."
The 32 year old TV celebrity, who divorced her husband and former NFL player Hank Baskett on twitter on Monday, reached out to fans after eight years of marriage
What do you think of advertising... Do I start dating / having sex now or do I give myself more time? "
"Wilkinson asked 2.6 million followers."
"My heart is broken, but I need it."
She added: "I don't want to be any younger."



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Evolution of Salma Hayek's Career in Film:”
“Jared Leto Will Play Hugh Hefner in Upcoming BiopicWatch the trailer of her newest film here... but make sure you have a box of tissues nearby.”
“Too Soon?”
“Stepmom Wonder Mirror Mirror Flatliners Hook Charlotte s Web Erin Brockovich The Pelican Brief Sleeping With the Enemy Mary Reilly Ocean s 11 Ocean s 12 and My Best Friend s Wedding...”
“Kate Winslet Boards James Cameron s Avatar Universe Roberts with the help of Corden acted out scenes from Notting Hill Mona Lisa Smile Larry Crowne Runaway Bride Steel Magnolias Charlie Wilson s War Mystic Pizza America s Sweethearts Eat Pray Love Closer Pretty Woman Valentine s Day Mother s Day...”
“The actress went to the James Corden show to promote her new movie “Wonder”, which hits theaters on Nov. 17 but the host wanted to make the most out of her visit and challenged her to revisit 26 of her previous roles in film in under 10 minutes.”
“Julia Roberts will forever be our Pretty Woman!”


"The evolution of Salma Hayek's film career"
"Jared Leto will play Hugh Hefner in the upcoming biopic trailer for her latest movie here... But make sure you have a box of tissue nearby. "
"Too early?"
"Stepmother miracle mirror plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane plane
"Kate Winslet is on James Cameron's Avatar universe. With the help of Corden, Roberts performs the scene of Notting Hill, Mona Lisa's smile, Larry crone's runaway bride, steel magnolia, Charlie Wilson's war mystery pizza, American sweetheart's eating, praying for more intimate beauty, Valentine's day, mother's Day..."
The actress attended James cordon's film exhibition to promote her new film miracle, which was released on November 17, but the host wanted to make the most of her visit and asked her to review her 26 previous roles in the film in less than 10 minutes
"Julia Roberts will always be our beauty!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Weinstein has denied all allegations against him.”
“Gwyneth Paltrow, Ashley Judd and Angelina Jolie are among his other accusers.”
“...ad preview Watch Michael B Jordan as Alexa in funny sexy spot She was one of the first of more than 50 women who have accused the former Hollywood mogul of sexual harassment assault or rape...”
“Related Articles TV tonight Al Davis vs the NFL recalls a bitter sports feud Super Bowl ad preview 49ers legends Montana Rice team up with Marshawn Lynch Golden Globes Bay Area actors honored but Zendaya snubbed Bay Area favorites H E R Raphael Saadiq receive Golden Globe nods Super Bowl...”
“McGowan herself floated the idea that Weinstein was retaliating against her for her naming him as her alleged rapist.”
“Prosecutors have also said they have additional evidence that were not included in the original charges filed against McGowan.”
“Judge Welsh said it would be premature to dismiss charges against McGowan prior to her March 21 preliminary date.”
““There is simply no point in time at which the evidence places Ms. McGowan and the cocaine together in the same place,” she wrote, according to the Daily News.”
“Carmichael also said five hours elapsed from when her client deplaned to the time that her wallet discovered.”
“It has been reported that Weinstein hired intelligence agencies to spy on his accusers.”


"Weinstein denied all the charges against him."
"Gwyneth Paltrow, Ashley Judd and Angelina Jolie are his other plaintiffs."
“… The ad previews watch Michael Jordan play Aleksa in an interesting sexy spot where she is the first of more than 50 women who accused a former Hollywood tycoon of sexual harassment, assault or rape
"Related article TV tonight, Alves vs NFL recalled a fierce sports feud, Super Bowl advertising notice 49 legendary Montana rice and Marshall Lynch golden ball award, Gulf actor honor, but cendaya ignored the Gulf region's favorite h Rafael Sadik won the golden ball award Super Bowl..."
"McGovern himself thinks Weinstein is taking revenge on her because she identified Weinstein as her so-called rapist."
"Prosecutors also said they had other evidence that was not included in the initial charges against McGovern."
"The Welsh judge said it was too early to dismiss the charges against McGovern before the trial date of March 21."
According to the daily news, she wrote: "there is no point in time at all when McGovern and cocaine were put in the same place."
"Carmichael also said that five hours had passed since her client got off the plane and her wallet was found."
"Weinstein is reported to have hired intelligence to keep an eye on his accuser."



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The historic market town, which is west of London, has a population of slightly more than 32,000.”
“Only 600 people were invited to the wedding of Harry, 33, and Markle, 36, but as many as 100,000 people from all over the world were expected to converge on Windsor.”
“The wedding dress was designed by British designer Clare Waight Keller from French fashion house Givenchy.”
“Markle arrived at Windsor Castle through the Cambridge Gate in a Rolls Royce Phantom IV at 11:48 a.m. She entered the chapel at one minute past noon to a special fanfare composed especially for the bride by the state trumpeters.”
“The Queen gave her permission for her grandson to get married in his uniform.”
“Prince Harry, and his older brother and best man Prince William, arrived at the venue at 11:35 a.m dressed in the frock-coat uniform of the Blues and Royals Household Cavalry.”
“The bride left the hotel just before 11:20 a.m. local time.”
“Global viewers got their first brief glimpse of the bride in her car as she left the nearby Cliveden House Hotel, where Markle and her mother, Doria Ragland, stayed overnight.”
“Other celebrity guests include Elton John; James Corden; Tom Hardy; Serena Williams and her husband, Reddit co-founder Alexis Ohanian; and British singer Joss Stone.”
“Indian actress Priyanka Chopra arrived alongside Markle’s “Suits” co-stars Gina Torres and Abigail Spencer shortly before 11 a.m. Other “Suits” actors Sarah Rafferty, Rick Hoffman and Gabriel Macht were close on their heels.”


Located west of London, this historic market town has a population of just over 32000
"Only 600 people were invited to Harry, 33, and markel, 36, but as many as 100000 people from all over the world are expected to come to Windsor."
"This wedding dress was designed by Claire white Keller, a British designer from Givenchy fashion house in France."
"At 11:48 a.m., markel arrived at Windsor Castle from Cambridge gate in Rolls Royce phantom 4. A minute after noon, she entered the church and began a special bugle written by the state trumpeter for the bride
"The queen allowed her grandson to marry in his uniform."
At 11:35 a.m., Harry and his brother, the best man, Prince William, arrived at the meeting in the uniforms of the blue army and the Royal cavalry
"The bride left the hotel before 11:20 a.m. local time."
"When the bride leaves the nearby Cliveden House Hotel, for the first time, viewers around the world catch a glimpse of the bride in the car. Markle and her mother Doria ragland spend the night in the hotel."
Other celebrity guests include Elton John, James Colden, Tom Hardy, Serena Williams and her husband, reddit co-founder Alexis o'hanian and British singer Jos stone
Shortly before 11 a.m., Indian actress Priyanka Chopra arrived with Marcel's "suit" co stars Gina Torres and Abigail Spencer. Other "suit" actors Sarah Lafferty, Rick Hoffman and Gabriel Macht followed



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Dancing’s over, that’s a bummer, but I’m really looking forward to the future and definitely spending more time with the business and Vanessa.””
“...report didn’t mention that “Star Trek” legend William Shatner, a rabid, high-profile “Dancing WIth the Stars” fan, campaigned against Viall.”
“The recent “Bachelor” star said the right things before the cameras, gushing about Murgatroyd and the whole “DWTS” experience, saying, “I had such an amazing time with Peta.”
“She’s a fantastic partner; we had fun all the time.”But behind the scenes it might have been a different story, with Viall reportedly attributing his failure to win enough votes from viewers to people and situations beyond his ballroom dance abiilty, according to the tabloid OK!”
“Viall felt that Murgatroyd, who gave birth earlier this year, didn’t give it her all.”
“He also was telling other cast members that he thought he was facing backlash over the recent arrest of fellow “Bachelor” alum Chris Soules, a source told OK!”
“Soules, who competed on Season 19 of “The Bachelor” in 2015, was arrested last week in connection with a truck crash in Iowa that killed a 66-year-old farmer.”
“Soules has been charged with leaving the scene of a traffic fatality and is being investigated for possibly driving under the influence at the time of the crash.”
““He was not in a good mood after being eliminated and told cast members that he felt like Chris Soules’ incident had an impact on him,” an insider told OK!”
““Basically, he was blaming everyone else but himself.”The OK!”


"I'm depressed that the dance is over, but I'm really looking forward to the future and will definitely spend more time with the business and Vanessa."
“…… There is no mention in the report of Star Trek legend William Shatner, a fanatical, high-profile fan of dance with the stars, who launched a campaign against Villar
The recent "Bachelor" star said the right thing in front of the camera, talking endlessly about mugartroyd and the whole "DWTS" experience, saying, "I had a wonderful time with PETA."
"She's a great partner and we've always been happy." But according to the tabloid "OK!"
"Villar feels that mugartroyd, who gave birth earlier this year, didn't give her everything."
He also told other actors that he thought he was facing a backlash because of the recent arrest of colleague "Bachelor" alumni Chris sules, a source told OK
"Sules, who competed in season 19 of Bachelor in 2015, was arrested last week in connection with a truck collision in Iowa that killed a 66 year old farmer."
"Sules has been charged with leaving the scene of the accident and is under investigation for possible drunk driving at the time of the accident."
"He was in a bad mood after he was eliminated and told the crew that he felt the Chris sules incident had an impact on him," an insider told OK
"Basically, he's blaming others, not himself."! "



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"It's completely surreal.”
“The American Horror Story star turned 26 on Tuesday, taking to Instagram to thank fans for all the well wishes.”
“She also shared a video of how her beloved mom used to honor her on her special day.”
“Dressed in a vibrant crop top with a printed skirt, the birthday girl smiled as she waved her hands above her head and conducted her friends and family to start belting out "Happy Birthday."”
“"Feeling #beyondblessed by all of yesterday's birthday love," she captioned it.”
“"Side note: this is how my mom used to sing happy birthday (she thought the real version was mildly irritating and took too long)."”
“"As always, I'm totally on her page," she added.”
“Fisher died at age 60 on Dec. 27, 2016, just one day before Lourd's grandmother, Debbie Reynolds, died at age 84 as a result of a stroke.”
“There’s no way to really explain it," Lourd said in an interview with Ellen DeGeneres last Septemeber.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"It's totally surreal."
"The American horror novel star turned 26 on Tuesday and he was on instagram thanking fans for their blessings."
"She also shared a video about how her beloved mother paid her respects on her special day."
Dressed in a vibrant jacket and printed skirt, the birthday girl smiles, raises her hands over her head and leads her friends and family to shout "happy birthday."
"Feel blessed by all the love of yesterday's birthday," she wrote with the title
Sidenote: This is the way my mom used to sing happy birthday (she thought the real version was a bit annoying and took too long)
"As always, I'm totally behind her," she added
"Fisher died on December 27, 2016, at the age of 60, the day before Lloyd's grandmother Debbie Reynolds died of a stroke, at the age of 84."
"There's no way to really explain that," Lauder said in an interview with Alan DeGeneres last September



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What an incredible, insane night.”
“Image zoom From left: Catherine Giudici, Arie Luyenduk Jr. and Sean Lowe | Credit: Arie Luyendyk Jr./InstagramSean could not have been more right.”
“I fell head over heels in love with Emily, and haven’t been in love since.”
“For the first time in my adult life, I was able to drop the craziness of being a traveling race car driver and focus on love — and it worked.”
“Then, I met Emily and had one of the most transformative experiences of my life.”
“Initially I went on the show for a new adventure and a fun story and was really skeptical of the idea that you could actually fall in love on a TV show.”
“I was never on the show to be famous or to get big on social media.”
“After being on Emily’s season of The Bachelorette, I went back to my regular life.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“So, trust me, I get that when many people saw my name announced as the new Bachelor, they said, who?”


"What an incredible, crazy night."
"Image zooming from left to right: Catherine giudici, Arie luyenduk Jr. and Sean Lowe | image source: Arie luyenduk Jr. / instagramsean is absolutely right."
"I fell in love with Emily so deeply that I never fell in love again."
"For the first time in my adult life, I was able to get rid of the madness of being a travel racer and focus on love - and succeed."
"Then I met Emily, one of the most transformative experiences of my life."
"At first I was on the show for a new adventure and an interesting story. I really doubt the idea that you can really fall in love on TV."
"I've never been on the show to be famous, or to make a big contribution to social media."
"After participating in Emily's single season, I'm back to my normal life."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"So, believe me, when a lot of people see my name announced as a new bachelor, they say," who? "



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“UK & stream Thursdays on hayu...”
“I wasn t anticipating him picking up so much from my mom Face to face The star was seen with Henry in a home by the beach A challenge lays ahead And that is a situation that literally just happened I think it was two days ago she started transitioning...”
“Fox added her mother is 'really relationship-based,' but she needs to get on with her life by herself.”
“'And that is a situation that literally just happened - I think it was two days ago, she started transitioning out of a relationship,' the actress remarked.”
“'I wasn't anticipating him picking up so much from my mom.”
“At one point it appears as if her bottom lip is quivering and she's about to cry.”
“...who is married to Brian Austin Green, is thrown off.”
“Fox.”
“They're having me like acknowledge like transition, movement, change.'”
“They're putting this like over the course of...for some reason like the next month.”


"England and stream are in hayou on Thursday..."
"I didn't expect that he would get so many things from my mother, face-to-face to see the star and Henry at a home on the beach, a challenge in front of him. This situation really just happened, I think she started to change two days ago..."
Fox added that her mother was "the real emotional foundation," but she needed to move on
"It's a situation that just happened - two days ago, I think, she started to transition from a relationship," the actress said
"I didn't expect him to get so much from my mother."
"Once, her lower lip seemed to be shaking and she was about to cry."
“…… Whoever marries Brian Austin Green gets dumped. "
"Fox."
"They make me change, move, change like I know."
"For some reason, they put it in the Throughout the process. "



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Marston was sentenced to 52 weeks in a domestic violence program, according to TMZ.”
“Nudity was never the problem because nudity isn’t a problem.”
“...went out to dinner in Brentwood California and were photographed raising a glass presumably in their deceased father s honor...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Although all four of Hefner’s children were present at the Japanese restaurant Katsuya — Christie, 64, David, 62, Marston, 27, and Cooper, 26 — Hefner’s wife Crystal Harris, 31, did not join them.”
“Hefner, 91, died Wednesday from natural causes at home in The Playboy Mansion, surrounded by loved ones.”
“““My father lived an exceptional and impactful life as a media and cultural pioneer and a leading voice behind some of the most significant social and cultural movements of our time in advocating free speech, civil rights and sexual freedom,” Cooper said in a statement after Hefner’s death.”
““He defined a lifestyle and ethos that lie at the heart of the Playboy brand, one of the most recognizable and enduring in history.”
“He will be greatly missed by many including his wife Crystal my sister Christie and my brothers David and Marston and all of us at Playboy Enterprises Image zoom Credit Mega Image zoom Credit Mega Cooper son of Henfer and his second wife Kimberley Conrad is the chief creative officer...”
“...of Playboy Enterprises making the decision in February to bring nude photos back to the magazine after a 2015 decision to stop publishing them...”


According to TMZ, Marston was sentenced to 52 weeks in a domestic violence program
"Nudity is never a problem, because nudity is not a problem."
“…… I went to bruntwood, California for dinner, and I was photographed toasting, probably in memory of their late father.... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Although Hefner's four children are in a Japanese restaurant, Katsuya Christie, 64, David, 62, Marston, 27, Cooper, 26 - Hefner's wife, Christo Harris, 31, did not join them
"Hefner, 91, died on Wednesday in his Playboy mansion, surrounded by relatives."
"My father, as a media and cultural pioneer, advocated freedom of speech, civil rights and sexual freedom behind some of the most important social and cultural movements of our time. He led an unusual and far-reaching life," Cooper said in a statement after Hefner's death
"He defines a lifestyle and ethos that is at the heart of the Playboy brand, one of the most recognized and enduring brands in history."
"A lot of people will miss him very much, including his wife Christo, my sister Christie, my brothers David and Marston, and the owner of our Playboy business, the son of humph, whose second wife Kimberly Conrad is the Chief Creative Officer..."
“…… After Playboy decided to stop publishing nude photos in 2015, it decided to take them back to magazines in February... "



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Reid, who was an 18-year-old virgin, asked if they could just kiss but he used his hand to push her head to her groin and she eventually gave in, she said.”
“They sat down on her living room sofa and he exposed himself, put her hand on his crotch and asked for oral sex, she alleges.”
“Ratner meanwhile via his attorney Martin Singer has disputed the accounts of sexual misconduct he s faced from at least 10 other women including the six women the Times identified in its Nov 1 story and the four additional women who accused Ratner of sexual misconduct in Sunday s Times...”
“In a statement received by THR, Simmons added, "I completely and unequivocally deny the horrendous allegations of non-consensual sex against me with every fiber of my being."”
“Abusing women in any way, shape or form violates the very core of my being,” he said in statements obtained by the Times and The Hollywood Reporter.”
“In a statement to the Times, Simmons said Khalighi’s claim “does a disservice to those who have been true victims of sexual harassment.”“Let me be crystal clear and very direct.”
“Simmons' attorney, Brad D. Rose, meanwhile, says the apology was in the “context for the embarrassment and upheaval the weekend caused her" connected to her “infidelity.” She disputes that account.”
“Khalighi said that she saw Simmons at the Soho House in West Hollywood last year, where he approached her and delivered a "really touching, remorseful apology" for his behavior.”
“Simmons strongly disputed Khalighi's account in a statement claiming, “Everything that happened between us 26 years ago was completely consensual and with Keri’s full participation."”
“She jerked away and then he left, she says, saying of the experience, "it hurt so much."”


"Reed, an 18-year-old virgin, asked if they could kiss, but he pushed her head into her groin with his hand and she finally gave in," she said
"They sat on her living room sofa, he exposed himself, put her hand on his crotch and asked for oral sex, she claimed."
"At the same time, Ratner, through his lawyer Martin singer, refuted the sexual misconduct of at least 10 other women he faced, including six women mentioned in the times report on November 1, and four other women accused of Ratner's sexual misconduct by the Sunday Times..."
In a statement received by thr, Simmons added: "I totally and unequivocally deny the terrible accusation of involuntary sex on every fiber of my body."
"Abusing women in any way, in any form or in any form violates the core of my life," he said in a statement obtained by the times and the Hollywood Reporter
In a statement to the times, Simmons said harigi's statement "is a kind of injury to those who are really victims of sexual harassment" and "let me be clear, very direct."
Meanwhile, Simmons' lawyer Brad D. rose said the apology was made in the context of "the embarrassment and turmoil that caused her" derailment "at the weekend. She refuted the claim
Haligi said she met Simmons at SOHO building in West Hollywood last year. Simmons found her and expressed "a very moving and regretful apology" for his actions
In a statement, Simmons strongly refuted harigi's statement, claiming that "everything that happened between us 26 years ago was completely voluntary, and Kerry was fully involved."
"She walked away abruptly, and then he left," she said, referring to the experience, "too painful."



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Olivia and Meredith, her cats, have become part of her brand.”
“Note the cat mask Swift is wearing: Swift is obviously a huge fan of cats.”
“She here is mocking people who think she's just materialistic and after money from the streaming companies.”
“Swift most notably stayed off Spotify for years because she thought it could hurt album sales.”
“Apple promptly reversed their policy.”
“"I find it to be shocking, disappointing, and completely unlike this historically progressive and generous company," she wrote at the time.”
“Swift wrote an open letter to Apple in 2015 because of their refusal to pay new artists royalties during their three-month trial period.”
“...t giving her and other musicians enough royalties...”
“Swift s Taking Her Music Off Streaming Companies Swift in her streaming co headquarters where she s breaking in to try to get some of their money is alluding to her removing her music from streaming companies because they weren...”


"Olivia and Meredith, her cat, have become part of her brand."
"Pay attention to Swift's cat mask: Swift is obviously a big fan of cats."
"She's mocking people who think she's just materialistic, chasing money from streaming companies."
"What's striking about swift is that she hasn't been in touch with spotify for years because she thinks it might affect album sales."
"Apple quickly changed their policy."
"I think it's shocking and disappointing, not at all like this progressive and generous company in history," she wrote at the time
"Swift wrote an open letter to apple in 2015 because Apple refused to pay royalties during the three-month probation period for new artists."
“… Don't give her and other musicians enough royalties... "
"Swift took her music from the streaming media company. Swift broke into her streaming media joint headquarters and tried to get some money from them, which implied that she took her music from the streaming media company because they were not..."



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Scott is jealous of Kourtney's relationship," a Kardashian source told Us Weekly in May, adding that "he's realizing that getting back with Kourtney isn't going to happen."”
“Many friends have wondered if Scott's behavior can be linked to Kourtney's new romance with model Younes Bendjima.”
“Well, Scott Disick may be testing that theory.”
“Splash NewsEarlier this week, Bella Thorne took to Snapchat to show off a large bouquet of flowers that she received.”
“A few hours later, Kourtney Kardashian took to Snapchat to show off a huge bouquet of flowers that she received.”
“Both sets of flowers looking quite similar in size, type and color.”
“According to multiple reports, the flowers were sent to both women by Scott — perhaps as a bit of mea culpa for his recent behavior.”
“TMZ (who has images of the flowers) reported on June 15 that Bella's flowers were indeed sent from Scott.”
“Bella shared the image in which her hair matched the color of the roses.”
“"Now I match z flowers," she said.”


"Scott envies Courtney's relationship," a Kardashian source told us weekly in May, adding that "he realizes it's impossible to get back together with Courtney."
"A lot of friends want to know if Scott's behavior has anything to do with Courtney's new relationship with model yones bengima."
"Well, Scott Disick may be testing this theory."
Earlier this week, Bella Thorne showed off a large bunch of flowers she received at snapchat
"A few hours later, Courtney Kardashian came to snapchat to show off the big bunch of flowers she had received."
The size, type and color of the two groups were very similar
"According to a number of reports, Scott gave the flowers to two women - perhaps because of his recent misdemeanor."
"TMZ (pictures of the flowers) reported on June 15 that Bella's flowers were indeed from Scott."
"Bella shared a picture of her hair matching the color of the rose."
"Now I have flowers," she said



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.2639593908629442
Correct number is  52
Total number is  197
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
